(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:'Thor: Ragnarok' Extended Scene: Jeff Goldblum's Grandmaster and the God of Thunder Meet (Exclusive)Jeff Goldblum Returns as Dr. Ian Malcolm in New 'Jurassic World: Fallen Kingdom' Teaser FeaturetteRicky Martin Mocks Death Hoax on InstagramRelated Gallery...”
“It was, 'Jeffrey, are you there?”
“Embed Code Restart Thor Ragnarok Extended Scene Jeff Goldblum s Grandmaster and The God of Thunder Meet Exclusive On Monday Goldblum sat down on Watch What Happens Live with Andy Cohen where he also reflected on the death hoax which has resurfaced several times in the years since it first...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“'Thor: Ragnarok' Extended Scene: Jeff Goldblum's Grandmaster and The God of Thunder Meet (Exclusive) This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“"Be careful about spreading something that you haven't sourced entirely or that's not factual."”
“"So be careful about gossip," he added.”
“Are you there?'"”
“And those were the days when I had a telephone landline and my answering machine and before I could call everybody, I got a couple of messages that I wasn't able to pick up, from like, my mother.”
“In reality, Goldblum told the New Zealand Herald in 2016 that not only has he never shot a film in the country, he's never even been there at all.”


"Embedded code restart related content: ' Thor:Ragnarok 'extended scene: Jeff Goldbloom's master meets Raytheon (exclusive) Jeff Goldbloom plays Dr. Ian Malcolm in the new Jurassic world: the fallen Kingdom, joking about tretch Martin's imitation of the death scam on instagram related gallery... "
"It was," Jeffrey, are you there? "
"Embedded code restarts Raytheon ragnaro extended scene. Jeff Goldbloom's master meets Raytheon exclusively Monday. Goldbloom sits down to watch what happened with Andy Cohen at the scene. He also reflects on the death scam that has reappeared several times, for the first time in years..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
“' Thor:Ragnarok 'extended scene: Jeff Goldblum's master meets Raytheon (exclusive) this video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's message.'
"Be careful to spread something that you don't have a complete source or that's untrue."
"So watch out for gossip," he added
"Are you there?"
"At that time, I had fixed line telephone and answering machine. Before I could call you, I received some messages that I didn't receive, such as my mother's
"In fact, Goldbloom told the New Zealand Herald in 2016 that he had not only never made a film in New Zealand, he had never even been there."



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s creating some very cute moments.””
“And Oliver [the father] — usually males have no part in raising of the young — [but] he’s actually been quite inquisitive and getting nose to nose with baby.”
“He’s very outgoing.”
“Very protective and very encouraging of her calf.”
““She’s been a phenomenal mother thus far.”
““Mom had a perfect delivery, perfect birthing,” he said.”
“Animal Adventure Park owner Jordan Patch appeared on Good Morning America Monday, April 17, and said both April and her newborn are thriving.”
“The event was livestreamed by approximately 1.2 million people after fans avidly watched for about two months prior in anticipation of the big day.”
“According to April’s official Twitter account, the baby weighed 129 pounds and measured 5 feet, 9 inches.”
“As previously reported, the internet-famous giraffe went into labor early Saturday morning after 16 months of pregnancy and gave birth to her fourth calf around 10 a.m.”


"It creates some very lovely moments."
"Oliver (father) - usually men aren't involved in raising children - (but) he's actually curious and deals with children."
"He's outgoing."
"Very protective and encouraging for her calf."
"So far, she's a great mother."
"Mom had a perfect delivery, a perfect delivery," he said
Jordan patch, owner of the Animal Adventure Park, said on Monday, April 17, Good Morning America that April 17, April 17, April, April 17, April, April 17, that April and her newborn are thriving
"After about two months of enthusiastic fans watching, about 1.2 million people watched the event live."
"According to April's official twitter account, the baby weighs 129 pounds and stands 5 feet 9 inches."
"As mentioned earlier, the famous giraffe on the Internet gave birth early on Saturday morning after 16 months of pregnancy, and gave birth to its fourth baby around 10am."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Also, as a point of reference, you’ll be hard-pressed to find anything “dusty or musty” about this woman:”
“Something tells me that’s a no.”
“But I do wonder if he ever used those words as pillow talk with his ex Khloé Kardashian or current girlfriend, Azalea.”
“We all know those types.”
“...of black men defending the rapper but don t color me surprised or shocked...”
“...respond to the young woman in the most obnoxious and disgusting way ever Advertisement Of course people were quick to point out that the rapper isn t anything but trash Advertisement Advertisement The sad thing is that there are tons...”
“Because how else would he come across this tweet So instead of texting Iggy Azalea and whining to her about being a subpar rapper and going about his own business he decided to put on his big boy pants and...”
“French Montana, who by all means could be considered a horrible rapper who has a fondness for appropriation and dating culture-vulture white women, apparently spends time on Twitter searching for his name.”


Also, as a reference, it's hard to find any "dusty or musty smell" about this woman:
"Something tells me it's impossible."
"But I do want to know if he ever used these words to have a pillow talk with his ex Kardashian or his current girlfriend Rhododendron."
"We all know these types."
“… Black people defend rappers, but don't surprise or shock me... "
“…… In response to this young woman in the most disgusting and disgusting way in the history of advertising, of course, people soon pointed out that rap singers are just junk ads, and sadly, there are several tons of... "
"Because otherwise, how could he see this microblog? Instead of texting ejie Azaria, complaining that she is an incompetent rapper and runs her own business, he decided to put on his big boy pants and then..."
"French Montana, in any case, can be considered a terrible rapper, who likes to possess and date white vulture women in culture, and obviously spends time searching for his name on twitter."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After his death, Playboy redirected every page of its website to a photo of Mr. Hefner, with a quotation attributed to him: “Life is too short to be living someone else’s dream.””
“It lent itself to a life in pajamas and slippers, and to the near-seasonless existence of Los Angeles.”
“This treadmill of night, day, indoor, outdoor, nightclub and bedroom lent itself to the endless metronome of magazine publishing and of TV production.”
““It was always exactly the same because that’s just how he likes to live his life,” Ms. Madison told BuzzFeed in 2015.”
“(There, all the “girls” would change into pajamas — flannel for them, not silk, she said.)”
“Wednesdays and Fridays, Mr. Hefner and his entourage would make the round of the clubs, and then, according to a memoir from his ex-girlfriend Holly Madison, would retire to chambers.”
“...vintage movie night etc In recent years he still had the kind of schedule that a particularly anxious adolescent would find comforting...”
“...one without end Each evening begins precisely at the same time each night of the week is dedicated to a different purpose Monday is new movie night Wednesday is poker night with the boys Friday is party night Sunday is...”
“In an essay comparing the heterosexually omnipotent but increasingly prosthetic manhood of the fictional James Bond and the very real Hugh Hefner Patrick O Donnell the academic describes Mr Hefner s schedule as he exhibited it in the 1980s as...”
“Like so many in California, Mr. Hefner entered an endless cycle of party, rinse, repeat.”


"After his death, Playboy turned every page of the website to Hefner's photos, quoting Hefner's words:" life is too short to live in other people's dreams. "
"It makes itself live in pajamas and slippers, making Los Angeles almost seasonless."
"This day and night, indoor and outdoor nightclub and bedroom treadmill provides an endless metronome for magazine publishing and TV production."
"It's all the same because that's the way he likes to live," Ms. Madison told buzzfeed in 2015
(there, all the "girls" would change into pajamas - flannel, not silk, she said.)
"On Wednesday and Friday, Mr. Hefner and his entourage will walk around the club, and then, according to the Memoirs of his ex girlfriend Holly Madison, he will retire to chambers."
“… In recent years, he still has a schedule that young people with special anxiety will feel comforted
“… A night without an end starts every night at the same time. Every night of the week is for a different purpose. Monday is the night of the new movie, Wednesday is the night of poker and boys, Friday is the night of the party, and Sunday is... "
"In an article comparing the fictional James Bond and the real Hugh Hefner Patrick o Donnell's heterosexual omnipotent but increasingly artificial masculinity, the scholar describes Hefner's agenda in the 1980s as...."
"Like many people in California, Mr. Hefner has entered an endless cycle of parties, rinsing and repetition."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Through the great outdoors, the charity helps build resilience in vulnerable teenagers, introduces rural employment to urban youth, and brings science to life.”
“We are currently focused on tackling plastic pollution and this support will help us move towards our vision of Plastic Free Coastlines.”The Wilderness Foundation UK promotes the benefits and enjoyment of wild nature.”
“...s urban slums by providing them with a trusted network where they are supported professionally and personally to help them grow as individuals and businesswomen...”
“Donations will help us to support more people to leave homelessness behind through our housing employment education and advice services across the country and to campaign for the changes needed to solve the homelessness crisis once and for all Myna Mahila Foundation is a charity which empowers women in Mumbai...”
“Homelessness is one of the most urgent issues of our time, but at Crisis we know what it takes to end it.”
“Jon Sparkes, Chief Executive of Crisis, said: “We are hugely grateful that Prince Harry and Ms. Markle are asking the public to support Crisis as they celebrate their wedding.”
“The charity helps people directly out of homelessness, working side by side with thousands of people each year to help them rebuild their lives and leave homelessness behind for good.”
“Crisis is the national charity for homeless people.”
“All donations will make a significant difference to our programmes of work and lead to direct improvements in the lives of these young people."”
“We are a very small charity and through our work we support over 1,000 young people living with HIV.”


"Through outdoor activities, charities help vulnerable youth build resilience, introduce rural employment opportunities to urban youth, and bring science into life."
"We are currently working on plastic pollution, and this support will help us move towards the vision of a plastic free coastline." The British wilderness foundation promotes the benefits and enjoyment of wild nature
“… By providing them with a trustworthy network, they get professional and personal support there to help them grow into individuals and businesswomen... "
"Through our nationwide housing and employment education and counseling services, donations will help us to support more people to leave the homeless and to carry out the necessary change campaigns to completely solve the homelessness crisis. The myna mahila foundation is a charity that empowers women in Mumbai... "
"Homelessness is one of the most pressing issues of our time, but in times of crisis, we know how to end it."
"We are very grateful to Prince Harry and Ms. markel for asking for public support for the crisis as they celebrate their wedding," said Jon sparks, chief executive of crisis
"Charities directly help people out of the plight of homelessness and work with thousands of people every year to help them rebuild their lives and get rid of homelessness forever."
"Crisis is a national charity for the homeless."
"All donations will have a significant impact on our work programme and directly improve the lives of these young people."
"We are a very small charity, and through our work, we support more than 1000 young people living with HIV."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They’re already beginning their family planning.”
“As for what’s next for the newly married couple?”
“Drew Scott and his wife Linda Phan opted for a nontraditional honeymoon nearly three months after their Italian destination wedding.”
“The newlyweds headed to Ecuador for a charitable trip through WE, an organization that is dedicated to creating “sustainable change” and encourages “travel that leaves a positive footprint on the planet,” according to their website.”
“The couple visited the small Kichwa village in the Amazon rainforest where thirteen families were trying to raise money to bring bathrooms to the town—an amenity they had never had before.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“They would have ten children most of these families have ten children and they all just go out in the bush Scott told reporters at the LOCKED IN Book Launch and Screening in L A We were working with them helping to make their dream a reality while we were...”
“...down there Scott added...”
“The pair has worked closely with WE over the years, and their honeymoon is not the first time the lovebirds have traveled for a good cause.”
“In September 2017, they spent a week in Kenya to work on sustainable projects with local communities.”


"They have started family planning."
"As for the newlyweds, what's next?"
"Drew Scott and his wife Linda pan chose an unconventional honeymoon nearly three months after their wedding in their Italian destination."
According to their website, the newlyweds went to Ecuador for a charity trip through our organization, which is committed to creating "sustainable change" and encouraging "travel that leaves a positive footprint on the planet."
"The couple visited the little kichiva village in the Amazon rainforest, where 13 families were trying to raise money to bring the bathroom to town, a facility they had never had before."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"They're going to have 10 children, most families have 10 children, and they're just going out in the jungle," Scott told reporters. After locking in book launches and showing in Los Angeles, we're working with them to help make their dreams come true, and we are... "
“… Scott added
"The couple have been working closely with us for many years, and their honeymoon is not the first time that they have traveled for a good career."
"In September 2017, they spent a week in Kenya working with local communities on sustainable development projects."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here, take a look back at Pitt and Jolie's relationship.”
“But we'll get to that.”
“Of course, in the years following their split, many new details about their married life have come to light.”
“What could have been the breaking point?”
“Over the course of 12 years together, Brangelina had weathered scandals, health scares, and raising six children together.”
“So when Jolie filed for divorce from Pitt in 2016, the news instantly sent shockwaves through Hollywood—and Team Jen social media users.”
“It was a scandal when the couple got together (Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston when he met Jolie on the set of Mr. and Mrs. Smith), but they seemed like a solid unit for over a decade…at least on the outside.”
“All relationships have their ups and downs, especially in Hollywood, but Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie's relationship timeline is especially fascinating.”


"Here, let's review the relationship between Pete and Julie."
"But we will."
"Of course, in the years after their breakup, a lot of new details about their marriage came to light."
"What is the breakthrough point?"
During the 12 years together, brengelina withstood scandals, health scares and raised six children together
"So when Julie filed for divorce with Pete in 2016, the news immediately caused a stir among social media users in Hollywood and Zhan's team."
"It was a scandal when the couple were together (Pete married Jennifer Aniston when he met Julie on the set of the Smiths), but they seemed to be a solid whole for more than a decade In appearance, at least. "
"All relationships have ups and downs, especially in Hollywood, but the schedule for Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie is particularly fascinating."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““This is the stuff they argue about and what made them split in the past.”Image zoom Younes Bendjima and Kourtney Kardashian | Credit: Vivien Killilea/Getty ImagesIn December, a source told PEOPLE things between Kardashian and Bendjima are “definitely serious.””
““He has always had a problem with this,” added the source.”
“On Thursday, Kardashian, 39, posted a leg-baring photo of herself lounging in bed.”
“Bendjima, 25, left a playful comment on his girlfriend’s Instagram post after receiving backlash for criticizing her sexy snaps.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Hmmm well… ok for this one,” Bendjima commented alongside an emoji with its tongue sticking out.”
“After Kardashian’s close friend Simon Huck replied to his comment with an eye-roll emoji, Bendjima did his best to clear the air and explain his joke.”
““Let me just play around fam,” he wrote.”
“Image zoom Credit: Kourtney Kardashian/InstagramImage zoom Credit: Kourtney Kardashian/InstagramThe comment comes days after Kardashian posted a photo of herself posing in a thong bikini, which Bendjima reportedly dissed in a since-deleted comment.”
““That’s what you need to show to get likes?” he commented according to TMZ.”


"This is the subject of their argument and the reason why they split up in the past." Image zooming yones benjima and kurtnikadashan | source: Vivian kirileya / Getty Images in December, a source told people that the affair between kardashan and benjima was "absolutely serious"
"He has always had this problem," the source added
"Last Thursday, Kardashian, 39, released a photo of her legs exposed, showing her lying in bed."
"Bendjima, 25, was strongly opposed for criticizing his girlfriend's sexy photos, leaving a witty comment on her instagram post."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Well Well, that's it, "said benjima, with an emoticon sticking out her tongue
"After Kardashian's close friend Simon Huck replied to his comments with a dazzled expression, bengima did her best to clarify the facts and explain his jokes."
"Let me play with my family," he wrote
"Image zooming credit: Kourtney Kardashian / instagram image zoom credit: Kourtney Kardashian / instagram a few days before the comment, Kardashian released a picture of himself in a Thong Bikini, which bendjima reportedly denied in the deleted comment."
"That's what you need to show that you want to be liked?"? "He commented according to TMZ."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Scroll down to see Baldwin's new look and shop it for yourself.”
“Plus, the chunky sweater is a universal trend that every New Yorker also owns in multiple variations, so it's a foolproof investment this season.”
“Are you taking notes yet?”
“...boots...”
“The combo may be harder to pull off in chillier climates but there s no denying Baldwin made a simple white tank top look cool with the addition of a trio of pieces an oversize sweater denim shorts and combat...”
“Heading to a hair appointment, she wore the ultimate L.A. girl transitional look: a fall-ready chunky cardigan with can't-give-them-up-yet denim short shorts.”
“While everyone eagerly awaits Hailey Baldwin and Justin Bieber's impending wedding, Baldwin is lying low in Los Angeles.”


"Scroll down to see Baldwin's new look and buy it yourself."
"In addition, thick sweaters are a common trend. Every new Yorker has a variety of styles, so this season's investment is safe."
"Did you take notes?"
“… Boots... "
"This combination may be more difficult to achieve in the cold climate, but it is undeniable that Baldwin added three pieces of clothes to his simple white vest, an oversized sweater, jeans shorts and fighting suit, which looks cool..."
"When she went to see her hair, she wore the ultimate transition dress of a Los Angeles girl: an autumn woolen sweater and a pair of jeans that she couldn't give up yet."
"While everyone is eagerly waiting for the upcoming wedding of Haley Baldwin and Justin Bieber, Baldwin is lying low-key in Los Angeles."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I don’t want her to mimic it or question herself or her own looks.”One way Guthrie teaches Vale about a positive perspective on life is through fitness.”
“I do have some wrinkles.”
“I call them smile lines.”
“They're from smiles and laughing, and those are the best kind of wrinkles," Savannah Guthrie saidSavannah Guthrie is getting candid about aging.”
“The Today show co-anchor revealed she doesn’t shy away from using a filter on her social media posts, but also isn’t afraid to also go au naturel.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“I m like anyone when I see a picture where my wrinkles are apparent I don t love looking at that and I ll try to put the good Instagram filter on there to make it look better Guthrie said in a Today com blog post about being in the...”
“...public eye and feeling the pressures of aging...”
““But I’m not going to not put the picture up.”
“I’m 46 years old and I don’t mind looking 46 years old.”Adding, “I was always surprised that people were surprised that I would post a picture without any makeup on.”Image zoom Savannah Guthrie | Credit: Greg Andries/NBCAnd Guthrie also embraces her wrinkles and fine lines.”


"I don't want her to imitate, and I don't want to question myself or what she looks like." One of Guthrie's ways to see life positively is through fitness
"I do have wrinkles."
"I call them smile lines."
"They come from smiling and laughing, and these are the best wrinkles," said Savannah Guthrie, who is frankly talking about aging
"Today Show" co anchor revealed that her posts on social media do not avoid using filters, but are not afraid that they will become very natural
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Like anyone else, when I see a picture with obvious wrinkles, I don't like it. I try to add a good instagram filter to the picture to make it look better," Guthrie said in a blog post on today com
“… The public's eyes and feel the pressure of aging... "
"But I'm not going to miss it."
"I'm 46, and I don't mind looking 46." She added, "people are always surprised that I post photos without makeup." Image zoom Savannah Guthrie | source: Greg Andres / NBC and Guthrie also embrace her wrinkles and fine lines



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We're wishing her healing during this difficult time.”
“Thanks to Kramer for using her voice and offering support to others.”
“"Today I am 1-3," Kramer, 34, captioned a photo of herself holding an ultrasound photo.”
“"I debated posting this for the exact reason why it's a silent struggle.”
“I don’t want I’m sorry or sympathy.”
“I just don’t want to feel alone.”
“And I know I’m not."”
“The former "One Tree Hill" actress explained that while this isn't her first miscarriage, it's the first time she's chosen to share her experience publicly.”
“"When I first found out I was pregnant I wanted to shout it from the rooftop but I know for reasons like this we have to wait," she wrote.”
“"So because we don’t tell many, we have to suffer silently...and suffering silently was my thing in the past, but it’s not now."”


"We want her to recover in this difficult period."
"Thank Kramer for her voice and support."
"I'm only 1-3 years old today," Kramer, 34, wrote in a photo of himself holding an ultrasound photo
"I argued about posting this article because it was a silent struggle."
"I don't need apologies or sympathy."
"I just don't want to feel lonely."
"I know I'm not."
The former "one tree mountain" actress explained that although it was not her first miscarriage, it was the first time she had chosen to share her experience publicly
"When I first found out I was pregnant, I wanted to say it out loud on the roof, but I knew that for that reason we had to wait," she wrote
"So, because we don't tell a lot of people, we have to bear it silently It's my business to endure the past in silence, but it's not now. "



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...that shine false...”
“The employees at a company called Craftsy let Swift know that they were on her side by creating Post It note messages on their windows with motivational phrases like Free Tay and song lyrics like People throw rocks at things...”
“She also sent flowers to those who stood by her during her recent trial.”
“Sending my love and gratitude, Taylor.”This isn’t the first time Swift has sent a bouquet to share her appreciation.”
“ I’m so proud of it and I hope you will be too.”
“...falseThe card read, “Thanks for keeping our secret.”
“Which is why we’re glad that Swift made sure to share her appreciation for those who helped out by sending flowers and a really sweet card.”
“As we all know, success on projects like this happen when you’ve got a solid team by your side.”
“And that number is, obviously, still climbing.”
“She already broke a record for having the most views a day after release — 43.2 million views to be exact.”


“… That's fake... "
"Employees of a company called craftsy let swift know that they were on her side by pasting inspirational phrases like free Tay and lyrics like people throwing stones at things on their windows..."
"She also sent flowers to those who supported her during her recent trial."
"My love and gratitude, Tyler." This is not the first time swift has sent a bouquet to share her gratitude
"I'm proud of that, and I hope you can do the same."
The card said, "thank you for keeping our secret."
"That's why we're glad Swift has to thank those who helped us by sending flowers and a very sweet card."
"We all know that when you have a solid team around you, such a project will succeed."
"Obviously, the number is still rising."
"She has broken the record for the most views on the day after the release - 43.2 million to be exact."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But it’s still, like, a novelty.”During a Today show appearance in April, Schumer revealed that she knew Fischer was “the one” for her just one month after they started dating.”
““I’m wife as hell.”
““It feels f—king good!” she said of married life.”
“The I Feel Pretty star gushed over the cookbook author, 38, on the SiriusXM showYou Up With Nikki Glaser weeks after their nuptials.”
“!”Us Weekly broke the news in February that Schumer and Fischer secretly tied the knot after three months of dating.”
“...her husband Chris for making today so much fun...”
“He s a huge fan so he was shocked when we told him who it was Georgio shared the sweet snapshot via Instagram on Wednesday October 17 writing Sneak peak of the engagement shoot special shout out to amyschumer and...”
“[Our photographer Bo] only took one because he said people jump in those pictures all the time and he didn’t realize it was Amy.”
““They wanted to do the same pose as us and the one picture we took came great.”
“We didn’t realize who it was at first, but after we realized it was Amy Schumer, we of course said yes,” Georgio exclusively tells Us Weekly.”


"But it's still a novelty." In April's today show, Schumer revealed that a month after they started dating, she knew Fischer was her "only one."
"I'm a hellish wife."
"It feels good! "She talked about marriage."
"The 38 year old cookbook author showed you on siriusxm that they were together with Nikki Glaser a few weeks after their marriage. I think it's a beautiful star."
"!" US Weekly reported in February that Schumer and Fischer married secretly after three months of dating. "
“… Thanks to her husband Chris for making today so fun... "
"He's a big fan, so when we told him who he was, he was shocked. On Wednesday, October 17, Georgo shared this sweet snapshot through instagram, wrote a manuscript for the engagement special sneak peak, yelled at may Schumer, and then..."
"(our photographer Bo Xilai) only took one, because he said that people had been dancing those pictures, and he didn't realize it was Amy."
"They want to pose the same way as us. The picture we took was very good."
"At first we didn't know who it was, but when we realized it was Amy Schumer, of course we agreed," Giorgio told us exclusively



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He's looking for the one and isn't going to proclaim he's in love unless he really is.”
“Peter's honesty makes his desire to find love somehow feel more genuine.”
“Many of the live tweets during The Bachelorette are about how perfect Peter is.”
“He's A Fan FavoriteFor everyone from former Bachelor contestants to regular ole' Bachelor watchers, Peter is clearly on everyone's radar.”
“Still, many clues point to Peter as the next Bachelor.”
“Of course, Peter could end up engaged to Rachel, or start dating someone off the show, or even be deemed not right for the role.”
“Many came forward to vote for Peter.”
“Show creator Mike Fleiss recently asked fans on Twitter who they want to see as the next Bachelor.”
“(Ben Higgins and Sean Lowe are great examples of this.)”
“However, most recent seasons have seen The Bachelorette fan favorite become the next leading man.”


"He's looking for that person, and unless he's really in love, he won't announce that he's in love."
"Peter's honesty made his desire for love more sincere."
"A lot of live microblogging during my single life is about how perfect Peter is."
"He's a fan of everyone, from the former single player to the ordinary single observer, Peter is obviously everyone's radar."
Nevertheless, many clues suggest that Peter is the next bachelor
"Of course, Peter may eventually get engaged to Rachel, or start dating off the show, or even be considered unsuitable for the role."
"A lot of people came out to vote for Peter."
"Program creator Mike Fleiss recently asked fans on twitter who they would like to see become the next bachelor."
(Ben Higgins and Sean law are good examples.)
"However, in recent seasons, this single fan's favorite has become the next leading actor."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code Restart‘Vanderpump Rules’ Season 7: the SUR-vers Break Down What You Need to Know (Exclusive)‘Vanderpump Rules’: Jax Shares Special Meaning Behind Restaurant Where He Proposed to Brittany (Exclusive)‘Vanderpump Rules’ Star Stassi Schroeder Explains Why Boyfriend Beau Clark Is ‘the One’ (Exclusive)”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The Vanderpump Rules lovebirds have landed on a date and location for their wedding, planning to tie the knot next summer at the Kentucky Castle, a boutique hotel located in Versailles, Kentucky, designed to look like a European palace.”
“It’s where Brittany, a Kentucky native, says she’s always wanted to get married.”
““It’s actually, knock on wood, it’s running smoother than expected,” Jax shares of wedding planning.”
“It’s also, seemingly, been easier than expected.”
“Brittany confesses to finding her dream wedding dress on the first day she went out shopping!”
““I did not mean to, but the very first place I went to I actually found a dress,” she recalls.”
““I'm not gonna just announce the designer and stuff just yet because I don't want [Jax] to know anything about it.”
“Whenever I walk down the aisle that s gonna be the first time he sees it or knows anything about what it looks like The 29 year old says fans will get to see part of her wedding dress experience on season seven of VPR but she made sure cameras...”


"Embedded code restarts the van der Pol rules Season 7: sur vers breaks down what you need to know about the (exclusive) van der Pol rules: Jax shares a special meaning behind the restaurant, explaining to Brittany's (exclusive) van der Pol star Stacy Schroeder why beau Clark is the" only "(exclusive)"
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The Vanderbilt couples have set the date and place for their wedding and plan to tie the knot next summer in Kentucky castle, a boutique hotel in Versailles, Kentucky, designed like a European palace."
"Brittany of Kentucky said she always wanted to get married here."
"In fact, it's knocking on the wood, and it's running better than expected," says Jax, a wedding planner
"It also looks easier than expected."
"Brittany admits that she found her dream wedding dress on her first day out shopping!"
"I didn't mean to, but the first place I went I found a skirt," she recalled
"I'm not going to announce designers or anything like that right now, because I don't want (Jax) to know anything about it."
"Whenever I walk down the aisle, it's going to be the first time he sees it or knows what it looks like, the 29 year old says fans will see her wedding dress experience in season 7 Vpr, but she ensures the camera..."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It's clear that no matter the awkward situation, Legend's soulful voice will always be the star of the show.”
“The couple laughed it off and didn't miss a beat.”
“Teigen and Legend were bumping and grinding onstage while Legend sang his hit "Slow Dance" when Teigen's black floor-length dress moved, revealing one of her breasts.”
“Earlier this summer, Teigen joined her husband on stage during a concert and suffered a wardrobe malfunction that would have left anyone else red-faced and embarrassed — but not those two.”
“Legend and Teigen have proven their hilarity time and time again.”
“...biz...”
“And let s just say after hearing Legend s tongue in cheek jingle about an erection lasting four hours we know now that with wife Chrissy Teigen he s cemented himself as one of the most entertaining stars in the...”
“Keys, who admitted to using natural deodorant, busted out an impressive tune about her husband, Swizz Beat's, less-than-enthusiastic response after borrowing the non-toxic stuff.”
“"You two, you have such incredible voices, there's literally nothing you can't sing and it won't sound good," Corden said from the back seat.”
“Corden challenged John Legend and Alicia Keys to an improvised sing-along using goofy phrases like "natural deodorant" and "an erection lasting more than four hours."”


"Obviously, no matter what the embarrassing situation is, the legendary and affectionate voice will always be the star of the play."
"When the couple smile, they don't miss a beat."
"Tegan and legend are bumping and dallying on the stage. Legend is singing his popular song slow dance. Tegan's long black skirt moves to show her breast."
Earlier this summer, tegan was performing with her husband at a concert and suffered a wardrobe malfunction that would make others blush and embarrass - but not the two
"Legend and tygan proved their funny again and again."
“… Business... "
"After listening to the legendary chatter about erection lasting for four hours, we know that he and his wife Chris tegan have become one of the most entertaining stars in the world..."
After admitting to using natural deodorant and borrowing non-toxic deodorant, case made an impressive comment on her husband Swizz beat
"You two, your voices are amazing. There's nothing you can't sing, and it doesn't sound good," cordon said in the back seat
Cordon challenged John Reagan and Alicia case to improvise, using silly phrases like "natural deodorant" and "erection lasts more than 4 hours."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"I feel like we need to hang out more, because I think that, I've been doing my tour in between her tour, and so a lot of the times I'm just a little bit sleepy."”
“"It's been super fun," Cabello shared.”
“So what's it been like joining her pal on the Reputation Stadium Tour?”
“And enjoy talking about love and relationships...I think that's really fun."”
“"I was a really huge Taylor Swift fan before I even met her, and I think it's because we both have the hopeless romantic thing, you know?”
“News' Zuri Hall.”
“"I think we definitely have the same personality in a lot of ways, especially talking about love and relationships, boys, music," Cabello told E!”
“The 21-year-old singer, who is currently on tour with her BFF, opened up about their special bond at the Camila Cabello x L'Oréal Paris Havana Collection event in Los Angeles on Tuesday.”
“Camila Cabello is dishing on her friendship with Taylor Swift.”


"I think we need to go out more, because I think I've been touring between her tours, so I'm just a little sleepy a lot of the time."
"It's very interesting," Cabello said
"So, what's it like to be on the prestige Stadium Tour with her friends?"
"Like to talk about love and relationships I think it's really interesting. "
"I was a big fan of Taylor Swift before I met her, and I think it's because we all have a hopeless romance, you know?"
Zurich hall news
"I think we have the same personality in many ways, especially when it comes to love and relationships, boys, music," Cabello told e! "
"The 21-year-old singer is currently touring with her boyfriend and revealed their special connection at the Camilla Cabello Paris L'Oreal Havana collection in Los Angeles on Tuesday."
"Camilla Cabello is talking about her friendship with Taylor Swift."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To that end, that idea feels to me like the beginning of civilization is at stake, this new civilization they want to build rather than live this strange half-life serving a despot.”TVLine first reported this news.”
“She will next star in the CBS All Access series “Star Trek: Discovery.”Season 8 will pick up amidst the war between Rick’s alliance and The Saviors.”
“Steven Ogg, Katelyn Nacon, and Pollyanna McIntosh will all have expanded roles when the AMC zombie apocalypse series returns this fall.”
“Ogg plays Simon, the right-hand man to Savior leader Negan.”
“Nacon is Enid, a teenage resident of Alexandria who has shown a connection to Carl.”
“McIntosh plays one of the newest characters on the show, Jadis, leader of the junk yard scavengers.”
“Season 7 of the series saw the departure of several main cast members, including Steven Yeun and Michael Cudlitz, whose characters, Glenn and Abraham, were killed in the season opener.”
“Sonequa Martin-Green, who played Sasha, died in the season finale.”
“Series showrunner Scott Gimple previously said that the season will see Rick and company battling to preserve the very fragile civilization they have established.”
“They want to live in a fair world instead of having it just be Negan’s.”


"For this reason, I feel that the idea is that the beginning of civilization is at stake. This new civilization is what they want to build, rather than living a strange half life serving a tyrant." Tvline first reported the news
She will appear on CBS's next full contact series, Star Trek: discovery. Season 8 will be broadcast in the war between Rick's alliance and the Savior
"Steven Ogg, katerin nacan and Paulina McIntosh will all expand their roles when the AMC zombie apocalypse series returns this fall."
"Ogg plays Simon, the right-hand man of Nigen, the leader of the Savior."
Nacan is Enid, a teenage resident of Alexandria, who has contact with Carl
Macintosh plays one of the latest characters in the play, jedis, the leader of the garbage collector
"Several of the main actors of the series's seventh season have left, including Steven young and Michael kudlitz, whose characters Glen and Abraham were killed in the season one opener."
"Sonica Martin Green, who plays Sasha, died in the season finale."
"Series host Scott kinpur has previously said that this season will see Rick and his company fight to protect the very fragile civilization they have built."
"They want to live in a fair world, not let it just be Nigan's."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...girlfriend Selena Gomez...”
“Us Weekly exclusively confirmed the pair who had stayed best friends had started hooking up again The twosome were first spotted together in Miami Florida with friends on June 8 after his March split from his on again off again...”
“The singer confirmed his engagement to Hailey Baldwin with a lengthy Instagram post about their future together.”
““Was gonna wait a while to say anything but word travels fast, listen plain and simple Hailey I am soooo in love with everything about you!” Bieber captioned a black-and-white photo of the couple on Monday, July 9.”
““So committed to spending my life getting to know every single part of you loving you patiently and kindLY.”
“I promise to lead our family with honor and integrity letting Jesus through his Holy Spirit guide us in everything we do and every decision we make.”
“My heart is COMPLETELY and FULLY YOURS and I will ALWAYS put you first!”“You are the love of my life Hailey Baldwin and I wouldn’t want to spend it with anybody else.”
“You make me so much better and we compliment eachother so well!”
“!” the “Love Yourself” crooner continued.”
““Can’t wait for the best season of life yet!.”


“… Girlfriend Selena Gomez... "
"American weekly exclusively confirmed that the couple, who have always been good friends, have started to hook up again. On June 8, the couple were first found together with friends in Miami, Florida, after he broke up with him intermittently in March... "
"The singer confirmed his engagement to Haley Baldwin by posting a long blog post on instagram about their future life together."
"I wanted to talk about it later, but it spread too fast. Listen to Haley, I love you so much!"! "On Monday, July 9, Bieber added a title to the black-and-white photo of the couple."
"So I am determined to use my life to understand every part of you and love you patiently and kindly."
"I promise to lead our families with glory and integrity, and let Jesus guide us through his Holy Spirit in every matter and decision."
"My heart belongs to you, I will always put you first! "You are the love of my life, Haley Baldwin. I don't want to spend time with anyone else."
"You've made me better, and it's good for us to praise each other!"
"!" love yourself "continued the singer
"I can't wait for the best season of my life!"



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I’m just super excited about this time in my life,” Ciara told HarpersBazaar.com — for which she posed topless in a stunning bump photoshoot.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“The singer and husband Russell Wilson, who married in July 2016, welcomed Sienna Princess Wilson on Friday, April 28, according to the couple’s matching Instagram posts.”
“Their bouncing baby girl was born at 7:13 p.m. in Los Angeles, weighing in at 7 lbs., 13 oz.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Ciara and Wilson both posted a touching photo dedicated to Sienna announcing the birth, writing, “Dear Sienna Princess Wilson, No matter how big the wave, we will always be your calm in the storm.”
“We Love You.”
“Love, Mommy & Daddy.”Sienna is the first child for the Seattle Seahawks quarterback.”
“Ciara, 31, is also mom to 2-year-old son Future Zahir, from a previous relationship with rapper Future.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"I'm very excited about this time in my life," Sheila told reporters HarpersBazaar.com Website - for this, she took an amazing photo of her naked upper body. "
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"The singer and her husband, Russell Wilson, married in July 2016, and according to their matching post on instagram, they welcomed Princess Sienna Wilson on Friday, April 28."
Their lively baby girl was born at 7:13 p.m. in Los Angeles, weighing 7 pounds and 13 ounces
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Sheila and Wilson both posted a moving picture dedicated to Siena, announcing her birth, and wrote:" dear princess Siena Wilson, no matter how big the waves are, we will always be your calm in the storm. "
"We love you."
"Honey, mom and dad." Siena is the first child of the Seattle Seahawks quarterback
"Sheila, 31, is also the mother of her two-year-old son, future Zahir, who had a relationship with rapper future."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Erica Gonzales Erica Gonzales is the Culture and Content Strategy Senior Editor for BAZAAR.com, where she oversees news and culture coverage, including celebrity, music, TV, movies, and more.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”
“Watch the trailer below.”
“The Beguiled comes to theaters on June 23.”
“"So for me, it's very universal, but it's in this exotic setting of the Southern gentility."”
“"The main crux of the story is about the dynamics between a group of women all stuck together, and then also the power shifts between men and women," Coppola told Entertainment Weekly.”
“Although the original movie revolved around the soldier, Coppola's edition puts the focus on the women, and their complex dynamic within their secluded setting.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
Erica Gonzales BAZAAR.com She oversees news and cultural coverage, including celebrities, music, television, movies, etc
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from YouTube."
"Look at the trailer below."
"June 23, the cheated man."
"So it's very common to me, but it's in the context of this exotic Southern gentleman."
"The key to the story is that a group of women come together, and then there's the power transfer between men and women," Coppola told Entertainment Weekly
Although the original film revolves around soldiers, Coppola's version focuses on women and their complex dynamics in a quiet environment



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the end, we would both agree on everything.”So far, no one else in the KarJenner krew has tested out the products, but Kardashian said she’s most excited for her sister Kim to give her feedback on everything.”
““Kylie would say her vision for this collection and then I would chime in with my ideas, and then after we came up with the products, it was easy to tweak here and there without any tension.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The mom of three showed off her hard earned toned physique and left little to the imagination while posing completely nude with only a hot pink patent leather trench coat draped over her shoulders and her arm strategically placed to conceal her chest while still maintaining a subtle hint of...”
“...side boob...”
“Image zoomAnother one of Kardashian’s looks for the shoot was a sexy dominatrix-inspired black leather trench and strappy bra, and she wore the new liquid lipsticks and eye shadows from her limited edition makeup collection she created with the help of sister Kylie Jenner, 20.”
““One night when we were at our mom’s house, she had mentioned she had some ideas about a possible collab,” Kardashian told the magazine of how the genesis of their collaboration.”
“Kardashian previously said on Instagram the collection was over a year in the making, because the duo totally changed directions with their concept for the products.”
““At the time, it was going to be just lips and we were going back and forth about the packaging, and for both of us in the moment, it didn’t feel fully right.”
“We ended up creating something totally different from what we were talking about before,” the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star said.”


"In the end, we will all agree on everything." So far, no one else in kajana Cliffe has tested the products, but Kardashian says she's most excited that her sister Kim can give feedback on all the questions
"Kelly will talk about her ideas for this series, and then I will cooperate with my ideas, and after we take out the products, it's easy to adjust here and there, without any tension."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The mother of three showed her hard won physique, leaving little room for imagination. At the same time, she posed completely naked, with a hot pink patent windbreaker draped over her shoulders, her arms strategically placed on the chest, while still maintaining a subtle hint..."
“… Side chest... "
"Picture zoomAnother Kardashian in the shoot is a sexy black leather jacket and laced bra inspired by the heroine, and she wears the new liquid lipstick and eye shadow created in the limited edition cosmetics series created by her 20 year old sister Kylie (Kylie Jenner)."
"One night, when we were at mom's house, she mentioned that she had some ideas about possible collaboration," Kardashian told the magazine about the origins of their collaboration
"Kardashian previously said on instagram that this series of products had been made for more than a year because they completely changed the direction of the product concept."
"At that time, it was just the lips. We were going back and forth on the issue of packaging. For both of us, it didn't feel right at this moment."
"We ended up creating something completely different from what we talked about before," said the follow Kardashian star



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And once he was in that state of f ked up I don t think much was going through his head about drawing the parallels it was just How can I feel sorry for myself and inflict as much pain because I deserve it It was just a self loathing...”
“He was the one inflicting pain on himself, and he’s not capable of dealing with it.”
“Is he ready to get better now?”
“Do you feel like this episode was Kevin’s rock bottom?”
“So people just assume he’s always OK. He’s always making jokes, he’s charming.”
“...that in quotes he had Sophie everybody likes him...”
“...whatever reason I was choosing to think he was OK And I think part of Kevin s thing that he goes through is that he had football when he was a kid he was popular in high school he s an actor he has money he has friends I put...”
“How did this happen out of nowhere But then you go replay it and you realize Oh my God my friend was doing this and I wasn t paying attention The next thing you know he s in the hospital and it wasn t all of a sudden but for...”
“Some of the things we came to were just that people just assume that you’re OK. I’ve actually done it — I’ve been on the other end of it where something will happen and it’s catastrophic, and you’re sitting there like, “What the hell?”
“What were the conversations around why that happened?”


"Once he's insane, I don't think there's anything in his mind to compare with me. How can I feel sorry for myself and cause so much pain to myself, because I deserve it, it's just a kind of self loathing..."
"He's the one who brings pain to himself, and he doesn't have the ability to deal with it."
"Is he ready to turn around now?"
"Do you think this episode is Kevin's lowest point?"
"So people think he's always OK. He's always joking. He's charming. "
“… He quoted Sophie and everyone liked him... "
“…… Whatever the reason why I choose to think he's OK, I think part of the reason for Kevin's experience is that he played football when he was a child, he was very popular in high school, he was an actor, he had money, he had friends, I put... "
"How did this happen suddenly, but you go to replay it, and you realize, oh my God, my friend is doing this thing, I didn't notice the next thing, you know he's in the hospital, it's not sudden, but for..."
"Some of the things we come across are just people thinking you're OK. In fact, I've done it - I've been on the other end of it all the time, and something happens there, and it's catastrophic, and you sit there like, "what the hell?"
"Why did this happen?"



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“What's more bizarre is the fact that Prince Harry's ancestor, Henry VIII, reportedly executed a relative of Markle.”
“She is an actress born in California, the daughter of a yoga instructor and a former television lighting director.”
“But despite their different upbringings, Prince Harry and his American girlfriend Meghan Markle have more in common than we previously believed.”
“A genealogical investigation by The Mail on Sunday has found that the famous pair are actually distant cousins, related through a late 15th Century ancestor of the Queen Mother.”
“Getty ImagesThe publication reports the Suits star's connection to the Royal Family comes as a result of her family's ancestry dating all the bay back to High Sheriff of County Durham Ralph Bowes - an ancestor of Markle from 15 generations ago.”
“Bowes' family seat was Streatlam Castle situated in the North East of England and his grandson Christopher Hussey moved to America in 1632, helping to found Nantucket, Massachusetts.”
“Fast forward a few years and boom, Meghan Markle.”
“Meanwhile, Bowes's great-grandson Sir George Bowes became a member of parliament during the reign of Charles II and to cut a very long story short, Prince Harry came along.”
“A new report, via The Sunday Telegraph, claims that back when Henry VIII was reigning in Britain, there was a plot orchestrated by a man named Lord Hussey, 1st Baron Hussey of Sleaford and the great-great-great grandfather to Christopher Hussey (see above), to attempt to overthrow the monarch.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"More strangely, it is reported that Harry's ancestor, Henry VIII, executed one of Mark's relatives."
She is a California born actress, the daughter of a yoga instructor and former television lighting director
"But despite their different upbringing experiences, Prince Harry and his American girlfriend Megan markel have more in common than we thought before."
A genealogical survey by the Sunday post found that the famous couple were actually distant cousins and related to the ancestors of the queen mother in the late 15th century
"Getty Images magazine reported that the suit star's connection with the royal family comes from her family's ancestors, which can be traced back to Ralph Bowes, senior Sheriff of Durham County, who was the ancestor of markel 15 generations ago."
His grandson, Christopher Hussein, moved to the United States in 1632 and helped to establish Nantucket, Massachusetts
"Fast forward a few years, boom, Megan markel."
At the same time, his great grandson, Sir George powers, became a member of Parliament under Charles II. To make a long story short, Prince Harry also came
A new report in the Sunday Telegraph says that as early as Henry VIII ruled Britain, there was a plot by Lord Hussein, the first Baron of Shriver and the great great grandfather of Christopher Hussein (see above) to overthrow the monarch



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“...like grabbed my butt In a call to action The Shallows star noted It s important that women are furious right now...”
““That was never my experience with Harvey in any way whatsoever, and I think that if people heard these stories … I do believe in humanity enough to think that this wouldn’t have just continued.”
“I never heard any stories like this — I never heard anything specific — but it’s devastating to hear,” the Gossip Girl alum, 30, told The Hollywood Reporter on Tuesday, October 11.”
““The No.”
“1 thing that can happen is that people who share their stories people have to listen to them and trust them and people have to take it seriously The Green Lantern actress added As important as it is to remain furious about this it s important to also say that...”
“...this exists everywhere so remember to look everywhere...”
“This isn’t a single incident.”
“This cannot happen, this should not happen, and it happens in ever single industry.”“It happens to women all over the place, all the time, to the point where women don’t even think that this is a real assault,” she continued.”
“I ve had plenty of things happen to me whether it be trying on a dress for prom at some clothing store to a director being inappropriate to a guy walking down the street where you don t think Oh well that wasn t actually sexual assault this just just...”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
“… As shoal star pointed out in call to action, it's important for women to be angry now... "
"Anyway, it's not my experience with Harvey, and I think if people hear these stories My belief in human nature is enough to make me think it won't continue. "
"I've never heard a story like this - I've never heard anything specific - but it's devastating to hear," gossip girl alumni, 30, told Hollywood reporters on Tuesday, October 11
"No
"One of the things that can happen is that people share their stories, people have to listen to them, trust them, and people have to take it seriously," the green light actress added, adding that it's important to keep angry, and that's also important, to say that... "
“… It's everywhere, so remember to look everywhere... "
"It wasn't an accident."
"It can't happen, it shouldn't happen, and it can happen in any industry." "It happens to women everywhere, all the time, so that women don't even think it's a real attack," she continued
"I have a lot of things that happen to me, whether it's trying on a prom dress in a clothing store, or a director is not suitable for a man walking on the street, you don't think it's not sexual assault, it's just..."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...investigation...”
“According to a report filed to the LAPD the woman alleges that Anderson assaulted her when she met him a second time to discuss future business opportunities The LAPD confirmed to The Blast that they have a crime report listing Anderson as a suspect adding that it is an open...”
“On October 5, 2017, The New York Times published a series of allegations against producer Harvey Weinstein from women who claimed that he sexually harassed them.”
“Since those initial accusations came to light, a floodgate seems to have opened, with many people coming forward to discuss their experiences of sexual harassment and/or assault.”
“Shortly after the bombshell report about Weinstein, the hashtag #MeToo, intended to demonstrate the prevalence of harassment and assault within our culture, went viral on social media.”
“Many of these stories, particularly those in Hollywood and the media, are centered around men who have allegedly abused or harassed people in lower positions of power.”
“The Weinstein scandal seemed to embolden more victims to speak out and shed the light on other men — including directors and celebrity chefs — who they claim have behaved inappropriately toward them.”
“Ahead are some of the biggest cases that have come to light so far this year, most of which were revealed only after the Weinstein accusers told their stories.”
“This list is by no means exhaustive, as new allegations continue to be made daily.”
“Anita Hill who testified in the United States Senate that current Supreme Court Justice Clarence Thomas had sexually harassed her pointed out to The New Yorker that People need to take this moment to make clear that this is not just about Hollywood The below list while centered on Hollywood...”


“… Investigation... "
"According to a report submitted to the Los Angeles Police Department, the woman claimed that Anderson attacked her when she met with her for the second time to discuss future business opportunities. The Los Angeles Police Department confirmed in the explosion that they had a criminal report listing Anderson as a suspect and added that it was an open one..."
"On October 5, 2017, the New York Times published a series of charges against producer Harvey Weinstein, who claimed Harvey Weinstein had sexually harassed them."
"Since these initial charges came to light, a floodgate seems to have opened and many people have come forward to discuss their experiences of sexual harassment and / or abuse."
"Soon after the explosive coverage of Weinstein, this label, which is designed to show the prevalence of harassment and aggression in our culture, metoo, went viral on social media."
"Many of these stories, especially in Hollywood and the media, revolve around men who are said to abuse or harass people with lower power."
"The Weinstein scandal seems to have allowed more victims to be outspoken and exposed other people - including directors and famous chefs - who claimed that they were inappropriate to their actions."
"Next are some of the biggest cases to come to light this year, most of which were revealed after Weinstein's plaintiffs told their stories."
"This list is by no means exhaustive, because every day there are new charges coming up."
"Anita Hill testified in the U.S. Senate that the current Supreme Court justice Clarence Thomas had sexually harassed her. She pointed out to the new Yorker that people need to use this moment to show that it's not just Hollywood's problem, but the focus of the table below is Hollywood..."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The current season will crown the latest winner on May 21.”
“After 15 seasons on Fox, American Idol returned in March on a new network with a new set of judges.”
““EXCITED TO ANNOUNCE that @lukebryanofficial, @lionelrichie, @ryanseacrest and yours truly will be BACK with another season of #AmericanIdol on @ABCnetwork.”Bryan, Richie, and Seacrest also shared their excitement on social media.”
“?” tweeted Perry.”
“I’m having TWO much fun to stop now… so why don’t we keep it going!”
““Y’ALL!”
“On Friday, the network announced a renewal for the singing competition series, while also revealing that judges Katy Perry, Luke Bryan, and Lionel Richie, as well as host Ryan Seacrest, will be all be back.”
“American Idol renewed: Katy Perry & Co. all set to returnAmerican Idol Close Streaming OptionsThe results are in… and American Idol will return for a second season on ABC.”


"This season will crown the latest champions on May 21."
"After 15 seasons on Fox, American Idol returned in March with a new group of judges."
"I'm glad to announce that @ lukebryanofficial, @ lionelrichie, @ RyanSeacrest and your true will launch another season of" American Idol "on @ abcnetwork." Brian, rich and Seacrest also shared their excitement on social media
"?" Perry tweeted. "
"I have two interesting stops So why don't we go on! "
"You
"Last Friday, LETV announced the renewal of the singing competition series, and revealed that judges Katie Perry, Luke Bryan, Lionel Ritchie and host Ryan Seacrest will all be back."
"American Idol" sequel: Katy Perry & Co. will re launch "American Idol" close streaming selection results American Idol will air its second season on ABC



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“In March, Culpo confirmed that she had split from the athlete after two years of dating.”
“The former Miss Universe 2012 and the 32-year-old Miami Dolphins wide receiver have called it quits after he was spotted getting cozy at the beach with sports reporter Bianca Peters in Miami while the model was in Australia, according to multiple reports.”
“A source told E!”
“News that Culpo broke it off with Amendola after photographs of the two surfaced online.”
“Meanwhile, another source told US Weekly, who was first to report the split, that "Bianca has no plans to hang out with Danny again.”
“It was just a Saturday at the beach.” ET has reached out to their reps for comment.”
“Just last week, Culpo posted her own beach pic with Amendola, captioning the shot, "New and exclusive rock hard 6 pack temperpedic ab pillow, boyfriend not included ?."”
“This isn't the first time that Culpo and Amendola have parted ways.”
“At the time, the NFL player unfollowed her on Instagram and deleted photos of them together.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
In March, caper confirmed that she broke up with the athlete after two years of dating
"According to a number of reports, the former Miss Universe 2012 and 32 year old Miami Dolphins all-around catcher was found having a good time with sports reporter Bianca Peters on the beach in Miami, while the model was in Australia at the time, so he announced the break-up."
"A source told me!"
"After the photos of the two were exposed on the Internet, the news that Kapo and amundola broke up."
"Meanwhile, another source told us weekly, who was the first to report the split, that" Bianca has no plans to go out with Denny again
"It was just a Saturday on the beach." Et contacted their representative for advice
Just last week, culpo released her own beach photo with Amendola, adding the title: "new exclusive rock 6 pack temperpedic AB pillow, excluding boyfriend?"
"This is not the first time Casper and amundola have parted ways."
"At that time, the NFL player cancelled her attention on instagram and deleted their photos together."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All hail the Fresh Prince of Instagram.”
“Shortly after, Justin Timberlake became the first famous person to welcome Smith to Instagram.”
“Thursday, December 14, 2017, shall henceforth be known as the day that Will Smith, famous actor, father of Jaden and Willow, husband of Jada, finally made an Instagram.”
“And he's a natural, as it turns out.”
“Since posting the inaugural photo (a duck-face selfie, naturally) a day ago, the actor has amassed more than a million followers, gotten verified, and posted seven photos.”
“In terms of social media savvy, Will Smith is a veritable Selena Gomez.”
“But along the way, Smith got some advice from a couple of famous friends.”
“The first, Ellen DeGeneres, queen of the celebrity selfie, gave Smith a comprehensive Instagram tutorial during her show on Thursday.”
“After the actor announced he's "finally going on Instagram," DeGeneres helped him take a series of trendy portraits for the 'gram.”
“They ran through duck-lips, a mirror selfie, a photo with a baby as a prop, a photo with vegetables as a prop, and a #TBT, all of which has since been uploaded onto Smith's Instagram.”


"To the new prince of instagram."
"Soon Justin Timberlake became the first celebrity to welcome Smith to instagram."
"December 14, 2017 (Thursday) will be the day when the famous actors will smith, the father of Jaden, and willow will finally release instagram."
"It turns out that he was born."
"Since the release of the premiere photo a day ago (naturally a duck face self portrait), the actor has accumulated more than 1 million fans, been verified and released seven photos."
"In terms of social media savvy, Will Smith is the real Selena Gomez."
"But along the way, Smith got some advice from several famous friends."
"First of all, celebrity selfie queen Ellen DeGeneres provided Smith with a comprehensive instagram tutorial on Thursday's show."
After the actor announced that he was "finally going to instagram", DeGeneres helped him take a series of fashion photos for instagram
"They went through duck lips, mirror self portraits, a baby photo, a vegetable photo and a TBT, all of which were uploaded to Smith's instagram."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So it’s not a matter of the facts of if I said that exact line or not; it’s the fact that I put myself in a position to be unprotected by my tribe,” he said.”
“Even if they have differences in views and opinions she knows his heart Advertisement As for Kanye himself in the Times interview he attempted to clean up his projectile vomit himself claiming that he just said that it sounded like a choice not that he said it actually was a...”
“...to mention misinformed words...”
“In an interview with the New York Times, the rapper spoke a little more in-depth about the song “Wouldn’t Leave” on his latest album, Ye, in which he suggested that his TMZ appearance and subsequent comments put his marriage in jeopardy.”
““There was a moment where I felt like after TMZ, maybe a week after that, I felt like the energy levels were low, and I called different family members and was asking, you know, ‘Was Kim thinking about leaving me after TMZ?’” he said.”
““So that was a real conversation.”AdvertisementWho could forget that interview last month when West put his whole entire ass-leg in his mouth?”
““When you hear about slavery for 400 years ... for 400 years?”
“That sound like a choice,” he said during his conversation with Ms.”
“Respectability Politics, Candace Owens.”
““Like … you was there for 400 years and it’s all of y’all?” he added, pouring a little more salt into the already festering wound.”


"So it's not a matter of fact whether I said that exact line or not, it's a matter of putting myself in a position where I'm not protected by the tribe," he said
"Even if they have different views and opinions, she knows his heart advertisement. As for kenye himself, in an interview with the times, he tried to clean up his projectile vomit, claiming that he just said that it sounds like a choice, not that he said that it is actually a..."
“… Referring to misinformation... "
"In an interview with the New York Times, the rapper had a more in-depth discussion of the song" never leave "from his latest album" leaves ", in which he hinted that his marriage was in danger because of the appearance of his TMZ and subsequent comments."
"For a while, I felt that after TMZ, maybe a week later, I felt that my energy level was very low. I called different family members and asked, you know, did Kim ever think about leaving me after TMZ? "He said
"It was a real conversation." Who can forget the interview last month when West put his whole ass in his mouth? "
"When you hear about 400 years of slavery... 400 years? "
"It sounds like a choice," he said in a conversation with Ms. Li
"Respectable politics, Candice Owens."
"It's like You've been there for 400 years, and that's all of you? He continued, pouring a little salt into the festering wound



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“FROM PEN: Raising a Little Princess: All About Charlotte’s Amazing ChildhoodOn a super-smiley palace snap posted to David’s account, the retired soccer star got a little sentimental about his only daughter’s newest milestone.”
““Dear Harper I can’t believe it has been already 6 years you are such a big girl so to the best sister in the world I love you so much have a amazing day ❤️❤️,” Cruz captioned a photo of himself with Harper on his shoulders.”
“...to the youngest member of the family...”
“Chimed in mom Victoria 43 with a solo photo of Harper on the palace grounds holding a single red balloon Our little birthday princess x Kisses Harper s three big brothers Cruz David 12 Romeo James 14 and Brooklyn Joseph 18 all used the social media app to send love...”
“” he added.”
“...invited so it was a beautiful thing to do with My mum Harper plus a few school friends Image zoom We were honored to be able to there Beautiful tea party...”
“RELATED VIDEO Victoria and David Beckham Celebrate Son Brooklyn s 18th Birthday In another photo this time of himself alongside Harper and his mother David clarifies This wasn t the palace opening the gates for Harper s birthday party this was a tea party where us and other guests were...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““Lucky Harper meeting a real life princess at the Palace x ❤️,” David, 42, captioned the group shot, in which his daughter is outfitted for the occasion in Cinderella’s sparkly blue gown.”


"From Pan: raising the little princess: Charlotte's childhood - with a snapshot of the super smile palace posted on David's account, the retired football star is sentimental about his only daughter's latest milestone."
"Dear Harper, I can't believe you've been six years. You're a big girl, so I love you so much for the best sister in the world. Have a nice day." ❤️❤️ "Cruz made a headline on a photo of himself and Harper side by side."
“… To the youngest member of the family... "
"Mother Victoria, 43, echoes a personal photo of Harper in the Palace Square, in which Harper is holding a red balloon, and our birthday princess x kisses Harper's three brothers, Cruz David 12, Romeo James 14 and Brooklyn Joseph 18, all using social media apps to convey love..."
"He added
“… I've been invited, so it's a wonderful thing to do it with my mother Harper and some school friends. We're very honored to have a beautiful tea party there... "
"Related video Victoria and David Beckham celebrate their son Brooklyn's 18th birthday in another photo. This time, he clarifies with Harper and his mother David that this is not a palace opening for Harper's birthday party. This is a tea party. We and other guests are..."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Fortunately, Harper met a real princess in X palace ❤️ David, 42, captioned the photos of his daughter in Cinderella's sparkling blue robe



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Doing what’s best for Josey is really what it all boils down to.””
““We’re his parents.”Added Rivera, “If everybody looks at it that way, it alleviates some of the drama.”
“In April, the Glee alum told Momtastic that she and Dorsey are “very good at co-parenting.”“It’s always going to have its challenges logistically, but Josey is our priority,” she said.”
“We ask for respect and privacy for our family during this difficult time.”Rivera asked for primary physical custody of Josey, with visitation rights for Dorsey.”
“We will continue to be great co-parenting partners for him.”
“Our priority is and always will be our beautiful son that we share together.”
“In their November statement about the divorce, the couple told PEOPLE, “After much consideration, we have made the decision to end our marriage.”
“They later wed in July 2014, just three months after her engagement to rapper Big Sean ended.”
“News, “They want to make it work for the sake of their son.”Dorsey, 34, and Rivera first dated in 2010 before going their separate ways while she starred on Glee.”
“While it’s unclear if the dismissal means the pair — who share son Josey, 2 — are back together, a source told E!”


"To do the best thing for Josie, that's what it comes down to."
"We're his parents," Rivera added. "If everyone sees it that way, it's going to lessen some of the drama."
"In April, glee alumni told momtastic that she and Dorsey were" very good at raising children together. " "There will always be challenges in terms of logistics, but Josie is our top priority," she said
"In this difficult time, we want to respect our families and protect our privacy." Rivera demands the main custody of Josie, and Dorsey has the right to visit
"We will continue to be his great co parenting partner."
"Our first priority is and will always be our beautiful son."
"After careful consideration, we have decided to end our marriage," the couple told people in a divorce statement last November
"They got married in July 2014, three months after she was engaged to rapper big Sean."
"News," Dorsey, 34, and Rivera went out on their first date in 2010 when she starred in glee
A source told e



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““When she walked out in her Herrera wedding dress, she looked more beautiful than I had ever seen her look.””
“He’s sobbing,” she said.”
“Seth Meyers’ wife, Alexi Ashe, is pregnant and expecting the couple’s second child together.”
“Meyers announced the news on Thursday, November 23, during the Thanksgiving episode of Late Night With Seth Meyers, alongside his parents, Larry and Hilary Meyers, and his brother Josh, who were his guests on the show.”
““I want to take this opportunity now, you guys obviously know, my wife and I are expecting a second baby,” the late-night host said.”
““Very excited.”
“Thank you!”
“Very excited.”His mother told the audience the story of when her son called her to give her the good news.”
““I get the phone call, and my Seth is sometimes a crier.”
“He said Because for over a month I ve had to pretend that I don t care what sex it is and I do care I want a little boy The comedian who welcomed his first son Ashe in 2016 said That s true I really wanted a brother for...”


"When she went out in erera's wedding dress, she looked more beautiful than I had ever seen."
"He's sobbing," she said
"Seth Meyers' wife, Alexis ash, is pregnant with the couple's second child."
Meyers announced the news with Seth Meyers on the Thanksgiving show late at night on Thursday, November 23, with his parents Larry and Hillary Meyers as well as his brother Josh as guests
"I want to take this opportunity now, as you obviously know, my wife and I are having a second child," the late night host said
"Very excited."
"Thank you
"Very excited." His mother told the audience the good news that her son had called her
"I get a call, and my Seth sometimes cries."
"He said, because for more than a month I had to pretend that I didn't care what sex was, I cared that I wanted a little boy. In 2016, comedian Ashe welcomed his first son and said, "it's true. I really want a younger brother..."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Homeland has garnered 10 Primetime Emmy Awards, including Danes winning two for best actress in a drama series.”
“And we would leave some room for that to happen, if there’s an appetite.”The Season 7 finale airs on April 29th.”
“If Showtime, Fox, Claire and Mandy want to take the show further, that’s their decision.”
““I can’t speak for Claire or Mandy [Patinkin], but it will be my final year and it will be designed to be the end of an eight-season story.”
““It’s definitely going to be my last year,” executive producer and writer Alex Gansa told THR in February, before the show’s seventh season debut.”
““But, you know, I’ve never done anything this long.”Showtime renewed Homeland for an additional two seasons ahead of its Season 6 premiere.”
““So, I’ll be ready for a reprieve from that,” she continued.”
“I mean, it’s a workout.”
“I mean, she’s under constant duress.”
““She’s a lot, this Carrie fricking Mathison.”


"Motherland" won 10 Emmy Awards in prime time, among which Denmark won two awards for best drama actress
"If you have an appetite, we'll make room for it." The final episode of season 7 will air on April 29
"If Showtime, fox, Claire and Mandy want to take the show one step further, it's their decision."
"I can't speak for Claire or Mandy, but this will be my last year and it will be designed as the end of an eight season story."
"It's definitely going to be my last year," executive producer and writer Alex Gansa told THR in February ahead of the show's seventh season premiere
"But, you know, I've never done anything for such a long time." Showtime had two more seasons for motherland before its sixth season premiere
"So, I'm ready to put it off," she continued
"I mean, it's exercise."
"I mean, she's been intimidated."
"She's a lot of people, this Carrie Frick Matheson."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Wonder Woman” opens on June 1 in the U.K. and on June 2 in the U.S.”
“The suspected bomber, Salman Abedi, is believed to have died in the blast.”
“...which injured more than 60 people...”
“The announcement comes a day after British Prime Minister Theresa May raised the terrorism threat level from severe to critical and said another attack on the United Kingdom may be imminent In an update on Wednesday British police said they have arrested three more men in connection with the bombing...”
“The superhero tentpole is still set to make its world premiere in Los Angeles on Thursday.”
““In light of the current situation, we will not be proceeding with our plans for the ‘Wonder Woman’ premiere and junket activities in London.”Stars Gal Gadot, Chris Pine, and Robin Wright and director Patty Jenkins were all scheduled to attend the European premiere.”
““Our thoughts are with those affected by the recent tragedy in the UK,” the studio said in a statement.”
“The studio announced the news on Wednesday ahead of the previously scheduled May 31 red carpet.”
“Warner Bros. has canceled the London premiere of “Wonder Woman” following the attack at an Ariana Grande concert in Manchester that left 22 dead earlier this week.”


"Wonder Woman" opened in Britain on June 1 and in the United States on June 2.
"The suspect of the explosion, Salman Abedi, is believed to have died in the explosion."
“… More than 60 people were injured... "
"The announcement came a day after British Prime Minister Theresa May raised the threat level of terrorism from serious to critical and said that the UK might soon face another attack. British police released the latest news on Wednesday that they have arrested three more men in connection with the bombing... "
"The world premiere of the superhero tent pole will still be held in Los Angeles on Thursday."
"Given the current situation, we will not continue our plans for the 'wonder woman' premiere and the bus event in London." Stars galgado, Chris pine, Robin Wright and director Patty Jenkins are all scheduled to attend the European premiere
"Our thinking is consistent with those affected by the recent British tragedy," the studio said in a statement
"The producers announced the news on Wednesday before the red carpet was scheduled for May 31."
Earlier this week, Warner Bros. canceled the London premiere of wonder woman after an attack on Ariane Grande's concert in Manchester killed 22 people



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...from the festivities...”
“Finally ready to throw in that towel cuz I actually found the real thing.”
“The country singer, 29, married fiancé Ruston Kelly on Saturday evening in Tennessee, her rep confirms to PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Saturday, in a sacred place where two rivers meet and join together, I married my best friend … barefoot and surrounded by the deepest kind of magic and love that exists.”
“I’ve never felt so tranquil and happy,” Musgraves, who wore a Berta wedding dress, wrote on Instagram Tuesday morning, sharing photos from the wedding.”
““We made our promises to each other under the trees and then drank and danced into the night.”
“We couldn’t have done any of it without the help of our wonderful families and amazing friends.”“The best kind of magic.”
“Best day of my life,” added her folk singer/songwriter husband, captioning a set of photos of himself with his new wife.”
“Image zoom Credit natalie with nbarrett photography Image zoom Credit natalie with nbarrett photography Image zoom Credit natalie with nbarrett photography Image zoom Credit natalie with nbarrett photography Image zoom Credit natalie with nbarrett photography Ahead of the wedding Musgraves teased the celebration on Twitter writing Today followed by a...”


“… From the celebration
"I'm finally ready to give up because I really found the real thing."
The 29 year old country singer married fiance Ruston Kelly in Tennessee on Saturday night, her agent confirmed exclusively to people
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Saturday, in a sacred place, two rivers joined and I married my best friend Barefoot, surrounded by the deepest magic and love of existence
"I've never felt so quiet and happy," musgraves, dressed in Berta's wedding dress, wrote on instagram on Tuesday morning, sharing photos of the wedding
"We made promises under the tree, and then we drank and danced into the night."
"We couldn't have done it without the help of family and friends." "The best magic."
"The best day of my life," her husband, a folk singer and songwriter, added, adding subtitles to a set of photos of herself and her new wife
"Photo zooming credit card Natalie and nbaret photo zooming credit card Natalie and nbaret photo zooming credit card Natalie and nbaret photo zooming credit card Natalie and nbaret photo zooming credit card Natalie and nbaret photo zooming credit card Natalie and nbaret photo before the wedding, musgraves tweeted today about the celebration, and then



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That for me was my first memories.””
“The Duchess of Sussex recently returned from her two-day tour in Dublin, Ireland, with Prince Harry — their first overseas tour as a married couple.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Meghan Markle cheered on her friend Serena Williams as the tennis star competed at Wimbledon Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton Step Out for Their First Ever Solo Outing Together at Wimbledon For the first time the royal sisters in law had a solo outing together as they teamed up to...”
“...attend the Ladies Single Final at the Wimbledon Championships on Saturday...”
“The royal duo have appeared together at official royal outings along with their husbands, Prince Harry and Prince William, but Saturday’s event marks their first ever joint appearance.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The royals coordinated their outfits for the event.”
“The Duchess of Sussex wore a summery blue-and-white striped shirt from Ralph Lauren with wide-leg cream pants, while Princess Kate opted for a white-patterned dress.”
“Image zoom Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle Credit James Gourley BPI REX Shutterstock Image zoom Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle Credit James Gourley BPI REX Shutterstock Before the match Meghan and Kate met with former female tennis champions and chatted with ball girls and boys to learn more about what...”


"That's my first memory."
The Duchess of Sussex recently concluded her two-day trip to Dublin, Ireland, with Prince Harry on their first overseas trip as a married couple
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Megan markel cheers for her friend Serena Williams, the tennis star who competes at Wimbledon. Megan markel and Kate Middleton travel alone for the first time at Wimbledon. It's the first time that the Royal sisters go alone together because they work together..."
“… Saturday in Wimbledon women's singles final
"The royal couple have been on a formal Royal outing with their husbands, Prince Harry and Prince William, but Saturday's event marks their first joint appearance."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The royal family coordinated the costume for the event."
"The Duchess of Sussex wore Ralph Lauren's summer blue and white striped shirt with wide leg cream trousers, while Kate chose a white patterned dress."
"Picture zooming Kate Middleton and Megan mackle credit James guley BPI Rex shutterstock picture zooming Kate Middleton and Megan mackle credit James guley BPI Rex shutterstock before the game Megan and Kate met with the former women's tennis champion and chatted with girls and boys to learn more about what..."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He further promises “the vlog will never be finished as long as my heart stays thumping” and that “your boy [Logan Paul] will get more and more and more lit.” His daily content will be missed, by some.”
“...something else entirely...”
“In his latest video a characteristically manic Paul explains that he is stepping back from regular vlogging because he has diversified bro and he plugs an upcoming talk show called Impulsive though it s unclear whether he s referring to his brother Jake s forthcoming YouTube Red talk show or...”
“Once again, YouTube temporarily suspended ads on his channel.”
“...indicating that he had learned very little...”
“Prevention Hotline and said It s time to start a new chapter in my life This new chapter soon included jokes about swallowing Tide Pods and a vlog in which he pulled a koi fish out of a pond and pretended to give it CPR and tased a dead rat...”
“...revenue on his channels and put his YouTube Red projects on hold citing a recent pattern of behavior After taking several weeks away from vlogging to reflect Paul returned in late January with a video titled Suicide Be Here Tomorrow where he spoke with the director of the National Suicide...”
“During the same trip to Japan Paul had earlier released vlogs where he wav ed raw fish in Japanese people s faces dress ed up like Pikachu and threw a plush Pokeball at random people in the street including a police officer Although he later apologized YouTube temporarily suspended ad...”
“The move comes after widespread criticism of Paul for his insensitivity and poor behavior in multiple incidents, including a vlog from late December where he filmed the body of an apparent suicide victim in a Japanese forest.”
“He then launched into a 10-minute segment in which he and his friends pick up his $150,000-plus custom Mercedes SUV.”


He further promised that "as long as my heart is beating, vlog will never end" and "your child (Logan Paul) will be more and more excited." Some people will miss out on his daily content
“… It's quite another thing... "
"In his latest video, a typically manic Paul explains that he's retiring from his regular blog because he's diversified, and that he's also cutting in an upcoming talk show called impulse, although it's not clear whether he's referring to his brother Jack's upcoming red talk show on YouTube or..."
"YouTube has again suspended advertising on its channel."
“… It shows that he has learned very little... "
"Prevention hotline, it's time to start a new chapter in my life. This new chapter soon includes jokes about swallowing tidal pods, and a video of him pulling a koi from a pond, pretending to give it cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and killing a dead mouse with a Taser gun.... "
“… Income in his channel, and put his YouTube red project suspended after citing recent behavior patterns, spent a few weeks reflecting Paul back from the blog, at the end of January with a video called suicide here tomorrow, he talks with the director of the national suicide Bureau... "
"On the same trip to Japan, Paul earlier released a video in which he waved raw fish in the face of the Japanese, dressed like Pikachu, and threw a fluffy pocket ball at people in the street (including a policeman) at random, even though he later apologized to the ad that YouTube temporarily stopped broadcasting..."
"Paul has been widely criticized for his tardiness and misbehavior in a number of incidents, including a video recorder shooting the body of a Japanese forest victim who apparently committed suicide at the end of December last year."
"Then he started a 10 minute session, where he and his friends picked out his customized Mercedes Benz SUV worth more than $150000."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Situated over her right wrist, the phrase “carpe diem” is written in bold font.”
“The actress proved she’s never afraid to try new things last year when, at the age of 81, she got her first tattoo.”
“DENCH Fans of both performers immediately took to social media to celebrate the collaboration...”
“Bizzle has used the word Dench as a synonym for anything amazing and even launched his own clothing line Stay Dench While they recorded her verses Dench can be seen wearing one of Dizzle s flat brimmed hats that read...”
“The rapper, 33, and actress, 82, might seem like an odd pairing, but they do have a connection: her last name.”
“...with Bizzle rapping along with him to the beat...”
“During the session which was captured on video and shared by LADBible Bizzle helps the 82 year old actress learn some of the words to his songs Celebrate and Pow After going over the lyrics together Dench shared the mic...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Oscar-winning actress Judi Dench can now add rapping to her list of career accomplishments, after sitting down with London-based MC Lethal Bizzle for some lessons — and eventually a duet.”
“Oscar-winning actress Judi Dench can now add rapping to her list of career accomplishmentsDame Judi Dizzle?”


On her right wrist, it says "carpe diem" in bold
"The actress's first tattoo at the age of 81 last year proved that she was never afraid to try new things."
"Dench fans of the two performers immediately celebrated their cooperation on social media..."
"Bizier used the word Dench as any amazing synonym, and even launched her own clothing line, leaving Dench behind. They recorded her verse. Dench can see that she is wearing a flat brimmed hat of daizel, which says..."
The 33 year old rapper and 82 year old actress seem to be a strange couple, but they do have a connection: her last name
“… With bizier, with his beat... "
"In this video, the dialogue shot and shared by ladbable bizzle helped the 82 year old actress learn some words from the song. After reviewing the lyrics together, Dench shared the microphone..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Oscar winning Judi Dench can now put rap on her career list after sitting down with London's MC eltall bizzle for a few classes and finally a duet
Oscar winner Judy Dench can now put rap on her list of professional achievements. "Judy Zell?"



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220”
“Got a story?”
“The pop star, 23, looked happy, albeit a little worse for wear, as he sang along to the track by Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee on which he features.”
“4 Justin Bieber made an inspired improvisation when he forgot the lyrics to his hit song Despacito during a nightclub performance Credit Slayingwithjb Twitter Admitting to the rowdy audience that he didn t know the words to the track he sang I don t know the words so I say...”
“Dorito...”
“I don't know the words so I say burrito" as the bemused crowd watched on.”
“At one point he awkwardly held out the microphone to a reveller who also admitted he didn't know the lyrics.”
“Just days ago, Justin declared himself a true Harry Styles fan after gushing over the One Direction star.”
“4 The pop star, 23, looked happy, albeit a little worse for wear Credit: SlaywithJb / TwitterThe Sorry singer approved of 23-year-old Hazza’s recent Carpool Karaoke alongside British comedian James Corden, 38.”
“And Biebs also expressed joy over Harry’s debut self-titled solo album – which has already romped to the top of the British album charts.”


“… E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207782420 directly
"Is there a story?"
The 23-year-old pop star looked happy while singing the songs of Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee, though a little uncomfortable
"4 Justin Bieber forgot the lyrics of his hit song despatito in a nightclub performance. It was a burst of inspiration improvisation. At that time, he admitted to the noisy audience on twitter that he didn't know the lyrics of his song, I didn't know the lyrics, so I said..."
"Dorito..."
"I don't know what to say, so I say tortillas," the confused crowd watched
"Once he awkwardly handed the microphone to a reveler, who admitted that he didn't know the lyrics."
"Just a few days ago, Justin announced that he was a real Harry stiles fan after praising one way star
"4 the 23-year-old pop star looks happy, though a little uncomfortable: slaywith JB / twitter, the poor singer, agrees that the 23-year-old has recently carpooled with 38 year old British comedian James cordon to sing karaoke."
"Bibbs is also pleased with Harry's first album of the same name, which has topped the UK album charts."



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He really reveres it.””
““In a really healthy way, it both scares him and exhilarates him to be taking this on,” said McNamara.”
“And arguably the buzziest one of them all is the Jordan Peele-led reboot of the classic science fiction series “The Twilight Zone.”So how did CBS All Access, a small but growing player in the high-stakes streaming wars, land the Oscar-winning writer and director of “Get Out”?”
““We actually had heard that Jordan was such a fan of the original series that he credits it to some extent with his interest in becoming an artist,” Julie McNamara, executive VP, original content, CBS All Access, told TheWrap.”
““Having heard that, we pursued a conversation with him to see if that’s something he would be interested in.”It won’t be the first, or even second time the series has been rebooted.”
“There have been two prior revivals of the classic series.”
“The first aired for 110 episodes on CBS in 1985, and a second version, with Forest Whitaker in Rod Serling’s famous role, ran for 43 episodes on UPN in the early 2000s.”
“Also Read: Adam Scott Joins Jordan Peele's 'Twilight Zone' in Reinvention of Classic Episode“I personally have heard probably 10 different pitches on rebooting ‘Twilight Zone’ over the years,” continues McNamara, adding that none of them “hit the mark” as a reason to bring the show back.”
“That is, until Peele walked through that door.”
““It happens to coincide with a moment in the culture that feels specifically ripe for this show to come back,” she said, likening “Get Out” to a two-hour episode that would feel right at home in Serling’s original version.”


"He's really respectful."
"In a very healthy way, it's both frightening and uplifting for him," McNamara said
It can be said that the most lively one is the restart of the classic science fiction series "the twilight zone" starring Jordan Peele. So, how did CBS all access, a small but growing player in the high-risk streaming media war, make this Oscar winning writer and director of "going out" settle down
Julie McNamara, executive vice president of CBS all access's original content, told the wrap: "in fact, we hear that Jordan is a fan of the original series and owes his interest in becoming an artist to some extent."
"After listening, we'll continue to talk to him and see if he'll be interested in it." It won't be the first time, or even the second time, to restart the series
"This classic series has been revived twice before."
In 1985, the first one aired 110 episodes on CBS, and the second one, played by rod Selin, played 43 episodes on UPN in the early 21st century
McNamara continued: "read another: Adam Scott joins Jordan Peel's" twilight zone "with the classic" I've personally heard about maybe 10 different reinventions of restarting "twilight zone" in the past few years, adding that there's no "hit the mark" reason for the show to repeat itself. "
"That is, until peel goes through that door."
"It happens to coincide with a moment in the culture, which makes people feel that the time is especially ripe for the return of the play," she said, comparing "going out" to a two-hour episode in the original version of Salin, which makes people feel at home



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Queen Elizabeth at Royal Ascot | Credit: Chris Jackson/Getty ImagesImage zoom Queen Elizabeth and Princess Anne | Credit: Tim Rooke/REX/Shutterstock...”
“He was seen in the same formal suit for the wedding of his cousin Celia McCorquodale on Saturday.”
“Hats off to the Duke and Duchess of Sussex!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple took a carriage ride onto the course after having lunch with the Queen, 92, and joined her for the opening day of the iconic horse racing event.”
“Meghan and Harry joined Prince Edward and Sophie, the Countess of Wessex in the carriage.”
“As their carriage entered the parade ring behind the main grandstand, racegoers were able to get a closer look at Meghan, 36, who wore an elegant white ensemble by Givenchy (her wedding dress designer!)”
“...with a matching white hat with black detailing by Philip Treacy.”
“Image zoom Meghan Markle | Credit: SplashNews.comHarry, 33, looked dapper in his traditional tailcoat and top hat.”
“Image zoom Prince Harry, Prince Edward, Meghan, the Duchess of Sussex and Sophie, the Countess of Wessex | Credit: SplashNews.comImage zoom Prince Harry, Sophie, Countess of Wessex and Meghan Markle | Credit: SplashNews.comCan’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”


"Image zooming Queen Elizabeth in Royal Ascot | credit: Chris Jackson / Getty image zooming Queen Elizabeth and Princess Anne | credit: Tim rook / Rex / shutterstock..."
"At his cousin Celia mccordale's wedding on Saturday, he was seen wearing the same dress."
"To the Duke and Duchess of Sussex!"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After lunch with the 92 year old queen, the couple took a carriage to the course and joined her in the opening ceremony of the iconic horse racing event."
Megan and Harry were in the carriage with Prince Edward and Sophie, the Countess of Wessex
"As their carriage enters the parade ground behind the grandstand, fans can get a close look at Megan, 36, wearing an elegant white suit designed by Givenchy!"
“… With the black details of Philip Tracy's white hat. "
"Image zooming Meghan Markle | credit: SplashNews.com Harry, 33, looks smart in his traditional tailcoat and top hat
"Image zooming Prince Harry, Prince Edward, Megan, Duchess of Sussex and Sophie, Countess of Wessex | credit: SplashNews.com Photo zoom Prince Harry, Sophie, Countess Wessex and Megan markel | credit: SplashNews.com There's not enough Royal coverage on the site? "



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“These things that are common sense.””
“If someone enters a door in a bathrobe, leave.”
“...to Kill After Her Molester Died Unexpectedly Pamela Anderson feared she had special powers after a babysitter she claimed molested her as a child was killed in a car accident just one day after the actress wished her dead...”
“The revelation came from an interview the Baywatch star, 50, did on Piers Morgan’s Life Stories that aired Saturday night on ITV.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I had a babysitter, and she molested me for I think a year.”
“I was between the ages of 4 and 8, somewhere in there,” Anderson said.”
““I remember wishing her dead, and she ended up dying the next day in her graduation in a car accident.”She continued, “I thought, ‘Okay, now I’ve killed her.”
“I’m magic.”
“I can t tell my parents about this and I ve killed her so I started believing that I had this special power to kill people Anderson recalled being terrified to tell her parents about her supposed ability telling Morgan...”


"It's all common sense."
"If someone comes in in a bathrobe, leave."
“… Pamela Anderson is worried that she has special rights after nanny, she claims that sexual harassment as a child is the day after she was killed in a car accident, actress wants her to die... "
"The news comes from the 50 year old Gulf watch Star's interview with Piers Morgan's life story broadcast on ITV on Saturday night."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I have a nanny who has been molesting me for a year."
"I was four to eight years old, somewhere there," Anderson said
"I remember I wanted her to die, and she died in a car accident the day after graduation." She went on, "I thought, well, now I've killed her."
"I am magic."
"I couldn't tell my parents about it. I had killed her, so I began to believe that I had this special ability to kill. Anderson recalled that she was afraid to tell her parents about her so-called ability to tell Morgan..."



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But they won’t soon forget their trip.”
“With their ongoing book tour and recently released furniture line, the Scotts are back in the states and as busy as ever.”
“Jonathan and Jacinta made their way through Uganda and Kenya, stopping at the United Nations and the David Sheldrick Wildlife Trust along the way.”
“Drew’s twin brother Jonathan was noticeably missing from the squad, but only because he had already traveled to Africa a few weeks prior with girlfriend Jacinta Kuznetsov.”
“Jonathan Scott Weighs inThe oldest Scott brother shared his own photos from the trip, writing, “What a week it’s been in Kenya!” alongside a photo collage.”
“Image zoom Credit: WE.org/M.DolzyckiWATCH THIS: Are the Property Brothers Considering Going Solo?!”
“The perfect symbol of perseverance.”Image zoom Credit: WE.org/M.DolzyckiDrew and JD posed with a WE Charity artisan named Mama Selina while at the Bogani Resort, located on the Masai Mara wildlife reserve along the border of Tanzania.”
““She’s holding leaves from an oleleshwa tree, which flourishes even in drought.”
““Eddah’s smile sums up the most beautiful week in Kenya,” she writes.”
“Phan clearly connected with one of the young girl’s stories, posting the sweet Instagram below.”


"But they won't soon forget their trip."
"With their ongoing book tour and recently launched furniture series, the Scots are back in the United States, as busy as ever."
Jonathan and Jacinta cross Uganda and Kenya, stopping at the United Nations and the David Sheldrick Wildlife Trust
"Drew's twin brother Jonathan is obviously not on the team, but it's only because he went to Africa with his girlfriend yasgenta Kuznetsov a few weeks ago."
Jonathan Scott said that Scott's brother shared his own travel photos, and he wrote: "it's been a week in Kenya! "Next to it is a photo collage."
"Image zoom: WE.org/MDolzyckiWATCH Are the real estate brothers thinking about going it alone? "
"The perfect symbol of perseverance." Credit for image zooming: WE.org/MDolzyckiDrew And JD at the Bogani resort in the Masai Mara wildlife reserve on the Tanzanian border, with a charity artist named Mama Selina
"She has the leaf of an olive tree in her hand, which can thrive even in drought."
"ADA's smile summed up Kenya's most beautiful week," she wrote
"Pan is obviously related to a story of this young girl, and he posted it on the sweet instagram below."



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We couldn’t agree more!”
“Kate knew she wanted a third not long after having Charlotte, but this time around they seem very content.” Of course though, as the source added, “Never say never!” After all, both Kate and William have expressed in the past that they want a large family.”
“A new report claims to have the answer — and you may be surprised!”
“Are Prince William, 35, and Kate Middleton, 36, calling it quits in the baby-making department?”
“The two welcomed their third child, Prince Louis, just last month on April 23, and it seems the royals are perfectly content with their family of five — at least for NOW!”
“William and Kate are also proud parents to son George, 4, and 3-year-old daughter Charlotte.”
“There’s no question these two have their hands full with three kids under five!”
““They are absolutely thrilled with having three [children],” a royal source told Us Weekly in their latest edition.”
““They are soaking up every minute they can.”
“Their dream was always to have three kids.”


"We totally agree!"
"Kate knew she wanted a third soon after she had Charlotte, but this time they seemed content." Of course, as the source said, "never say never! "After all, Kate and William have said in the past that they want a big family."
"A new report claims to have found the answer - you may be surprised!"
"Did Prince William, 35, and Kate Middleton, 36, stop in the parenting department?"
"On April 23 of last month, they welcomed their third child, Prince Louis. It seems that the royal family is very satisfied with their family of five - at least for now!"
William and Kate are also proud parents of their 4-year-old son George and their 3-year-old daughter Charlotte
"There is no doubt that these two men have three children under the age of five!"
"They're absolutely excited about having three," a royal source said in the latest issue of American weekly
"They're enjoying every minute."
"Their dream is always to have three children."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Darlene was left delighted with the results after the surgery admitting that her confidence was at an all time high as she showed off her new look to her husband Marcel and some of her fellow trainers in a tight...”
“'We have to get those to be neighbors again.'”
“Before Darlene s original surgeon put the implants in above her muscle which forced her breast tissue and her nipples downward Getting ready Dr Dubrow met with Darlene before her surgery in order to mark where he was going to...”
“...to which Darlene admitted no, she 'didn't believe so'.”
“Dr Nassif then chimed in to ask: 'Was it a plastic surgeon do you know?'”
“Did he do a lot of liposuction?'”
“Dr Dubrow asked, before querying: 'Did this doctor also treat acne?”
“'So he treated breast droopiness by putting a very large implant over the muscle?'”
“After hearing the specifics of how Darlene's procedure was performed, both doctors were shocked at the way in which her original surgeon had chosen to go about correcting her problem.”
“'His decision was to put in a big enough implant that would pull the nipples forward, and it was also over the muscle.'”


"Darlene is happy with the result of the operation. She admits that her confidence is unprecedented. She shows her new look to her husband Marcel and some of her coaching partners in tight clothes..."
"We have to make them neighbors again."
"Before Darlene's original surgeons put the implant over her muscles, forcing her breast tissue and nipples down, Dr. dubro met with her before Darlene's operation to indicate where he was going..."
“…… Darlene admits that she doesn't. She "doesn't think so."
Dr nasif then interjected, "do you know it's a plastic surgeon?"
"Did he do a lot of liposuction?"
Dr. dubro asked, and then asked, "does this doctor also treat acne?"
"So he put a big implant in the muscle to treat breast ptosis?"
"After hearing the details of Darlene's operation, both doctors were shocked by the way her original surgeon chose to correct the problem."
"His decision was to implant an implant large enough to pull the nipple forward and cover the muscle," he said



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Kylie gave birth to her first child last week and in traditional Kardashian-Jenner fashion, she’s already been gifted tons of floral arrangements from her famous family.”
“The 20-year-old cosmetics queen took to Snapchat to share the various bouquets and to thank her family for their generosity.”
““Thank you Kim and Kanye,” she captioned a stunning display of white, pink and red roses, which looked more like an art installation than a floral arrangement.”
“Khloe Kardashian, who is currently pregnant with her first child, gifted Kylie with even more roses in the shape of a giant “C.” The meaning is unclear, though it’s sure to only fuel those pesky baby name rumors!”
“SnapchatSnapchatRob Kardashian mixed things up a bit with massive silver balloons that read, “Happy Birthday.”Meanwhile, Kylie’s eldest sibling, Kourtney Kardashian, shared a personalized message to her niece along with lots of pink roses.”
“SnapchatSnapchat“My beautiful angel, welcome to the world!”
“You have a lot of cousins waiting to play with you.”
“I love you.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Kelly gave birth to her first child last week, and in the traditional way of Kardashian Jenner, she has received tons of flower arranging gifts from her famous family."
"The 20-year-old cosmetics queen came to snapchat to share the bouquets and thank her family for their generosity."
"Thank you Kim and Kanye," she added a title to a stunning display of white roses, pink roses and red roses, which looked more like an art installation than a flower arrangement
Khloe Kardashian, who is pregnant with her first child, gives Kelly more giant "C" shaped roses. The meaning of this word is not clear, but it will certainly only encourage the rumor of those obnoxious baby names! "
Snapchat rob Kardashian confused things with silver balloons with "happy birthday.". Meanwhile, Kylie's elder brother Kourtney Kardashian sent a personalized message to her niece, along with a lot of pink roses
My beautiful angel, welcome to the world
"You have a lot of cousins waiting to play with you."
"I love you."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Complete dates are online now.”
“"Perhaps more surprises are right around the corner when it comes to Coldplay shows.The band behind huge hits including "Viva La Vida," "Yellow" and "Paradise" head to the United States this August for a few select stadium dates.”
“I would like to thank Chris for an amazing experience.”
“"He continued, "In a time where we're seeing the horrors of London, Manchester, and Paris, I hope this shows that if you get yourself out there, you never know what's going to happen.”
“"Chris Martin invited me up on stage so that I was on stage with Coldplay.”
“He and his friends insisted on lifting me and getting me a better view," Rob told BBC News.”
“"A lad accidentally fell on me and was extremely apologetic.”
“"Hours after the crowd erupted in applause, the lucky fan tried to wrap his head around what happened during the unforgettable night.”
“"Well here we are in Dublin and what an awesome crowd, I've been all over the world and I've never seen anybody so loud.”
“...training is his job Chris sang for the first verse of the new song...”


"The completion date is now online."
"When it comes to Coldplay, maybe more surprises are just around the corner. The band behind the scenes, which performs popular songs such as "Viva La Vida", "yellow" and "paradise", will travel to the United States in August this year for a few selected stadium dates
"I want to thank Chris for his wonderful experience."
"He went on to say," in an era when we see the horror of London, Manchester and Paris, I hope it shows that if you're in it, you never know what's going to happen. "
"Chris Martin invited me on stage, so I'm on stage with Coldplay."
"He and his friends insisted on lifting me up to give me a better view," rob told BBC news
"A young man accidentally fell on me. I'm very sorry."
"Hours after the crowd burst into applause, the lucky fan tried to put his head around what happened on this unforgettable night."
"Well, we're in Dublin now. It's a big crowd. I've been all over the world and I've never seen such a loud voice before."
“… Training is his job. Chris sang the first verse of a new song



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'Riverdale' Star Lili Reinhart Wishes Her 'Love' Cole Sprouse a Happy BirthdayRelated Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:'Riverdale': Watch Veronica Confide in Betty in Season 2 Deleted Scene (Exclusive)'Riverdale' Cast Covers 'emmy' Magazine -- See All the Exclusive Pics!”
“ET caught up with Skeet Ulrich (FP Jones) and Mädchen Amick (Alice Cooper), who play the onscreen parents of real-life lovebirds Cole Sprouse (Jughead Jones) and Lili Reinhart (Betty Cooper), respectively, on Monday, where they gushed over the "Bughead" romance that has evolved off-screen.”
“"It's great.”
“I mean, they didn't talk about [their relationship] the entire time, until just recently," Amick told ET's Leanne Aguilera at the Television Critics Association press tour in Beverly Hills, California.”
“"So, it's nice that they're able to now, like, be public with it, so it's not so under wraps."”
“"But at the same time, they're in complete control of what they want to share and how they want to share it," she added.”
“"Behind the scenes, they're so sweet with each other and they're both just exceptional people."”
“The CWUlrich chimed in, saying he's "really glad" Reinhart and Sprouse found each other, just like their characters, Betty and Jughead, did on the show.”
“"It's a lot of work; it's a long season," he says of filming The CW series.”


"Riverdale star Lili Reinhardt wishes her" lover "cole a lot of fun in the birthday gallery..."
"Embedded code restart related content: 'Riverdale': watch Veronica talk about Betty's deletion in season 2 (exclusive)'riverdale 'actor cover' Emmy 'magazine - see all exclusive pictures!"
"Et" was overtaken by "et" on Monday by "FP Jones" and "Alice Cooper", who play the parents of real lovers "judead Jones" and "Betty Cooper" respectively, and the two are gushing about the "abnormal" relationship that has evolved off the screen
"Great."
"I mean, until recently, they've been talking about [their relationship]," amik told et's Ryan Aguilera during a television Review Association reporter tour in Beverly Hills, California
"So it's good that they can make it public now, so it's not so secret."
"But at the same time, they have complete control over what they want to share and how they share," she added
"Behind the scenes, they are very sweet to each other, they are different people."
Kremlich interjected that he was "really happy" that Reinhart and spruce found each other, just as their characters Betty and pig head did in the play
"It's a big job, it's been a long season," he said, shooting the CW series



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Zendaya Just Stepped Out with a Platinum Blonde Pixie, And, Of Course, She Looks Stunning...”
“But now, according to Us Weekly, Zendaya and Holland apparently are dating—they're just keeping everything extremely low key, and have been this entire time.”
“The 21-year-old Spider-Man: Homecoming stars who met on set in 2016 are reportedly dating in secret, and have been for just about a year.”
“After competing with one another on Spike s Lip Sync Battle Zendaya won over the crowd with a spot on rendition of Bruno Mars 24K Magic while Holland performed Rihanna s Umbrella in a leather get up the Internet began to flood with suspicions that the co stars are more...”
“...than just friends...”
“The two also frequently appeared on each other's Instagram and Snapchat stories and often playfully interacted on the red carpet.”
“Then, in August, shortly after Spider-Man: Homecoming was released, Zendaya told Variety that Holland is "literally one of my best friends," but adamantly denied any rumors that the two were romantically linked.”
“The Marvel superstars each jumped on Twitter to poke fun at the reports that their relationship was more than platonic, citing the endless Spider-Man press tours as a reason the public might suspect that they were officially together as an item.”
“The evidence of a romantic relationship between the two is inconclusive, but they did go holiday shopping together and posted pictures and videos of the whole ordeal on Snapchat.”
“...this rumor just won t die...”


"Related reports: Cen Daya just came out with a white haired elf. Of course, she looks very beautiful..."
"But now, according to us weekly, zendaya and Holland are obviously dating, they are just very low-key about everything, and they have always been."
"It's reported that the 21-year-old spider man, a homecoming star he met on set in 2016, is dating secretly and has only been dating for about a year."
"In spike's mouth contest, after competing with other players, zedaya won the audience's favor with Bruno Mars's 24K magic performance, while Holland propped up Rihanna's umbrella with a fur coat. The Internet began to be full of such suspicions: there are more stars playing together..."
“… It's not just friends... "
"The two also frequently appear in each other's instagram and snapchat stories, and often play and interact on the red carpet."
In August, shortly after the release of spider man: home, zendaya told variety magazine that Holland was "actually one of my best friends," but firmly denied rumors of a romantic connection
"Marvel's superstars joke on twitter that their relationship is not just platonic. They take the endless journey of Spiderman journalists as a reason for the public to suspect that they are officially together."
"The evidence for their romantic relationship is not conclusive, but they did go on holiday shopping together and posted photos and videos of the whole ordeal on snapchat."
“… This rumor won't die... "



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““They had horseshoes all over the place and they walked through the stables and by the horses to walk down the aisle.””
““Their initials were painted on the lawn, on personal fans for each guest, on the food, on little bourbon bottles for guests and on the favors, which were tequila and shot glasses,” said of the guests.”
“...well into the early morning...”
“The bride wore a white sleeveless lace Reem Acra gown with a matching cape to the outdoor ceremony and a white lace plunging Tadashi Shoji jumpsuit to the reception which was held indoors under a two story tent and continued...”
“On Saturday night, the Big Bang Theory star wed fellow equestrian Karl Cook in a glamorous ceremony at Cook’s Pomponio horse ranch in Southern California.”
“Kaley Cuoco is married and what a wedding!”


"They have horseshoes everywhere. They go through the stables and ride down the aisle."
"Their initials are painted on the lawn, on each guest's private fan, on the food, on the guest's Bourbon bottle, and on grace, which are tequila and wine glasses," he said of the guests
“… Until the morning... "
"The bride wore a White Sleeveless lace Reem acra dress and a matching cape for the outdoor ceremony, and a white lace pendant Tadashi Shoji Jumpsuit for the reception held under the indoor two-story tent, and continued..."
On Saturday night, the big bang star married Carl cook, a fellow equestrian, at pomponnio ranch in cook, Southern California
"Kelly cuckoo is married. What a wedding!"



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It works for Woody Allen still.” Read Farrow’s full op-ed in the Los Angeles Times.”
“Farrow, however, disputes the conclusions in her op-ed, noting a judge’s decision to revoke Allen’s custody of her during a contentious legal battle in 1993.”
“In an op-ed for the Los Angeles Times published on Thursday, Farrow calls out actresses Blake Lively, Kate Winslet and Greta Gerwig for continuing to support Allen, her adoptive father.”
“Allen, an acclaimed filmmaker, has long denied the allegation, which Farrow first made publicly in 2014, and has continued to make movies, recently securing a multimillion-dollar deal with Amazon for his future projects.”
“Although she is the only person to accuse Allen of sexual assault, Farrow draws comparisons with men like producer Harvey Weinstein, who’ve been banished from the industry following allegations of sexual misconduct.”
““It is a testament to Allen’s public relations team and his lawyers that few know these simple facts,” Farrow wrote.”
“It also speaks to the forces that have historically protected men like Allen the money and power deployed to make the simple complicated to massage the story She added In this deliberately created fog A list actors agree to appear in Allen s films and journalists tend to avoid the...”
“...subject Winslet has come under fire during her press tour for Wonder Wheel Allen s latest film...”
“In a series of increasingly troubling interviews, she praised the director’s ability to “understand the female characters he creates” and defended working with him despite the allegations.”
“David McGough via Getty Images Woody Allen and Mia Farrow with children Satchel and Dylan.”


"It still works for Woody Allen." Read Farrow's full review in the Los Angeles Times
Farrow, however, disagreed with the conclusions in her review, noting that in a controversial legal action in 1993, the judge decided to revoke Allen's custody of her
In a commentary published in the Los Angeles Times on Thursday, Farrow called on actresses Blake Lively, Kate Winslet and Greta gweger to continue to support her adoptive father, Alan
"Alan, a highly acclaimed filmmaker, has always denied the accusation. Farrow first published the accusation in 2014 and continued to make films. Recently, he reached a multi million dollar agreement with Amazon for his future projects."
"Although she was the only one to accuse Allen of sexual assault, Farrow compared her to a man like producer Harvey Weinstein, who was expelled from the industry after being accused of sexual misconduct."
"Few people are aware of these simple facts, which are evidence of Allen's PR team and his lawyers," Farrow wrote
"It also shows the power to protect people like Allen in history. The deployment of money and power complicates the simple story. She added the actors to the deliberately created fog list and agreed to appear in Allen's films, while journalists tend to avoid..."
“…… Winslet came under attack during his press tour for the latest film "magic wheel Allen."
In a series of increasingly troublesome interviews, she praised the director's ability to "understand the female characters he created" and defended her cooperation with him despite the charges
"David McGonagall through Getty pictures of Woody Allen and Mia Farrow with children's satchels and Dylan."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“What do you think about the cast’s statements following the scandal?”
“Chris Harrison began the group discussion...”
“Warner Bros. hired an outside firm to “look into everything that supposedly happened” and “they concluded that there was no evidence of misconduct by cast on the set,” he continued.”
““Do you trust that conclusion?”The contestants then unanimously agreed and the conversation turned to their support for not only Corinne and DeMario, but also the show’s producers and staff.”
““I was confident that nothing happened between DeMario and Corinne that was bad,” said Raven Gates.”
“I trusted everyone that worked here so I knew everything was going to be okay I think there was a lot in the media regarding the producers as if they re not our friends and they re just using us to make us do things like we re going to...”
“...just do whatever they say Alex Woytkiw added...”
“Article continues below advertisementDerek Peth then jumped in saying, “I think there’s a weird perception that exists out there that we’re not in control of ourselves when we’re here.”
“… We all know how realistic the friendships are with and among the cast.”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"What do you think of the cast's attitude after the scandal?"
"Chris Harrison started a group discussion..."
"Warner Bros. hired an outside company to" investigate everything that could happen, "he added." they concluded that there was no evidence of misconduct on the part of the cast. "
"Do you believe that? "Then, the contestants agreed that the topic turned to support not only Colin and demario, but also the producers and staff of the show."
"I'm sure there's nothing bad going on between demario and Colin," says Revan gates
"I trust everyone who works here, so I know everything will be OK. I think there are a lot of people in the media who think that the producers are not our friends. They just use us to let us do something, such as we are going to... "
“… Do what they say, Alex woytchul added
As the article continues, Derek pace interrupts: "I think there's a strange idea that when we're here, we can't control ourselves."
"We all know how real the friendship between actors is."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"You don't have to be a woman to support women ... [we'll] get a bunch of hot guys in these T-shirts."”
“It was actually season two of BIP, and a terrible experience with infamous "villain" Chad Johnson, that helped.”
“Only ET was on set for a photo shoot celebrating the anniversary.”
“SheLift is about using outdoor activities and mentorship to empower young women who need confidence and guidance at critical ages.”
“This month marks the nonprofit's first anniversary.”
“So, SheLift was born.”
“...than ever to start an organization she says...”
“Bachelor in Paradise Premiere How The Show Handled Corinne Olympios DeMario Jackson Scandal He said some pretty offensive things that were specifically targeted at my arm and that kind of all made it seem like this is a better chance...”
“Herron continued living in California, working and even went on Bachelor in Paradise twice before the way she could use her time on reality TV came to her in full.”
“...she says.”


"You don't have to be a woman to support a woman... [we] will have a bunch of guys in T-shirts. "
"It's actually the second season of BiP, and the terrible experience of the infamous" villain "Chad Johnson."
"Only et is taking pictures to celebrate the anniversary."
"She lift refers to the use of outdoor activities and coaching to empower young women who need self-confidence and guidance at critical ages."
"This month marks the first anniversary of a nonprofit organization."
"So, shelft was born."
“… It's more than ever before to start an organization, she said
Don't be directed against me. "How to deal with the Corinne Olympias Demario Jackson scandal at the premiere of" the Bachelor of heaven ", he said some offensive words that specifically aimed at my arm, which all make people feel that this is a better opportunity.
Helen continued to live in California, work, and even live a single life in heaven twice, until she could make the most of her time on reality TV
“…… She said



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I enjoy it quite a bit,” Weber, 39,said on the Allegedly with Theo Von & Matthew Cole Weiss podcast in July.”
“Weil, 40 — who currently stars on How to Get Away with Murder — and Adelstein, 48 — he stars in Girlfriends’ Guide to Divorce — share 7-year-old daughter, Josephine.”
“She filed for divorce, citing irreconcilable differences, on March 25, 2016 in Los Angeles, according to previous documents obtained by PEOPLE.”
“The former couple, who both starred on ABC’s Scandal (Weil as Amanda Tanner and Adelstein as Leo Bergen), wed in October 2006 and were married for over nine years before separating in January 2016.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Wednesday, a judge signed off on the Gilmore Girls alum and Prison Break actor’s divorce documents, which were filed in the Los Angeles County Superior Court and obtained by PEOPLE.”
“Liza Weil and Paul Adelstein’s divorce has been finalized.”


"I love it very much," Webber, 39, said on a podcast with Theo von and Matthew Cole Weiss in July
Will, 40, and Adelstein, 48, play 7-year-old Josephine in the guide to girlfriend divorce
"According to documents previously obtained by people familiar with the matter, she filed for divorce in Los Angeles on March 25, 2016 on the grounds of irreconcilable differences."
"The former couple, who starred in ABC's scandal (Amanda Tanner as will and Leo Bergen as Adelstein), got married in October 2006, married for more than nine years and separated in January 2016."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
On Wednesday, a judge signed the divorce papers of Gilmore girl alumni and prison break actors, which have been submitted to and obtained by the Los Angeles County High Court
"The divorce of Lisa will and Paul Adelstein has been finalized."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s also making an album with Kanye West.”
“The most amazing, incredible, introduction.”Chance recently dropped four new songs instead of his rumored new album.”
“And you're going to say, what the fuck?”
““Then your eyes are going to open wide open.”
“It's going to touch your bones,” he told Zane Lowe.”
““The first song on the album—not only is your hair is going to stand up.”
“Khaled expressed excitement for his new full-length during an interview on Beats 1 today.”
“Chance was also on the Grateful song “I Love You So Much.” Khaled is currently opening for Beyoncé and JAY-Z’s OTR II tour.”
“1 single.”
“Chance, Bieber, and Quavo previously teamed up for Khaled’s 2017 album Grateful on the single, I’m the One.” The song hit the top of the Billboard charts, marking Chance’s first No.”


"He's still making an album with Kanye West."
"The most amazing, incredible, introduction." Chance recently gave up four new songs instead of his rumored new album
"You'll say, what the hell is this?"
"Then your eyes will be wide open."
"It will touch your bones," he told Zane law
"The first song of the album is not just that your hair should stand up."
"In an interview with beats 1 today, Khalid expressed his excitement about his new full length."
Chance is still in "I love you so much" this Thanksgiving song, Khalid is currently singing for Beyonce and Jez's OTR II tour
"One."
"Chance, Bieber and quavo have previously CO produced Khaled's 2017 album" thanksgiving "single" I'm that man. ". This song is at the top of the charts, becoming chance's first No



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just because it's a Pixar movie doesn't mean there can't be deception and betrayal.”
“I can't help but worry that one of these "heroes" might actually be serving the villain.”
“One of the new heroes we'll meet in Incredibles 2 is Voyd (Sophia Bush), a longtime Elastigirl fan who can make objects appear and disappear, but the other heroes haven't been officially identified yet.”
“Elastigirl, spearheading the charge on behalf of businessman Winston Deaver (Bob Odenkirk).”
“However, Incredibles 2 will see a campaign to officially bring back the "supers" being launched, with Helen Parr, a.k.a.”
“The Incredibles went over how following the public being fed up with collateral damage, superheroes were forced to go into retire from their crimefighting activities and stay hidden in plain sight through their secret identities.”
“Looking at the background of this new Incredibles 2 poster, you can also make out some of the new superheroes who are being introduced in the sequel.”


"Just because it's Pixar doesn't mean there can't be cheating and betrayal."
"I can't help worrying that one of these 'heroes' may really be serving the villain."
"One of the new heroes we're going to meet in incredible 2 is Walter (Sophia Bush), a longtime bouncing fan who can make objects appear and disappear, but other heroes haven't been officially identified."
"Erastiger, on behalf of the businessman Winston Defoe (Bob odenkel) with hair charges."
"However, incredible 2 will see a campaign officially back to the 'super' launch, with Helen Parr, aka."
"It's incredible that as the public grows tired of collateral damage, superheroes are forced to retire from their criminal activities and hide in the public eye through their secret identities."
"If you look at the background of this new incredible 2 poster, you can also learn about some of the new superheroes introduced in the sequel."



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Speaking of Patriots Day, Mark Wahlberg, who is also quite good in all the Money in the World, has since 2010 had 15 starring roles from major studios.”
“...in theaters everywhere this Friday cough would be able to find more and better work outside of the indie or television scene...”
“Whether or not Mark Wahlberg was public about his requests for additional compensation or made a behind-the-scenes deal and participated in the “for the love of the game” narrative, I can only speculate.”
“Assuming all of this is true, then Michelle Williams and Ridley Scott agreed to work on reshoots sans much in the way of compensation while Wahlberg demanded more money for more shooting days.”
“Williams and Scott both gave interviews in the run-up to the release exclaiming that they and the above-the-line actors (with the exception of Chris Plummer) essentially worked for free in order to salvage the prestige picture.”
“Both Wahlberg and Williams are represented by the same talent agency, so WME is probably going to have to play some spin/defense in the next few days.”
“The extra $10 million came from Imperative Entertainment.”
“Sony distributed the film but did not produce the picture.”
“A version of this story came out in The Washington Post way back in November of last year, yet it failed to get much traction.”
“First, a few things to note.”


"When it comes to patriot's day, mark Walberg's income around the world is pretty good. Since 2010, he has 15 stars from major film companies."
“…… This Friday, in cinemas all over the world, we can find more and better works besides independent music or TV series... "
"Whether mark Walberg publicly asked for extra compensation or made a behind the scenes deal to participate in the narration of for the love of the game, I can only guess."
"Assuming all this is true, Michelle Williams and Ridley Scott agree to re shoot and compensate for it, while wolfberg asks for more money for more days."
"Williams and Scott were interviewed before the release, and they exclaimed that they and online actors (except Chris Plummer) were basically working for free to regain their prestige."
"Walberg and Williams are representatives of the same talent agency, so WME may have to play some spin / defense in the next few days."
"The extra $10 million comes from compulsory entertainment."
"Sony released the film, but didn't make it."
"A version of the story was published in the Washington Post last November, but it didn't get much attention."
"First of all, there are a few things to pay attention to."



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If caused by sneezing anti-histamines might be helpful.””
“Sudden violent movements or contractions of these muscles as seen with repeated sneezing can cause injury to these muscles…Treatment of these rib muscle sprains involves rest, ice and anti-inflammatory medications.”
““These muscles contract during sneezing and even coughing.”
“...of Manhattan tells Page Six...”
“I didn t catch an orphan falling out of a burning orphanage I sneezed We have several muscles which help the ribs move and help us breathe namely internal intercostal muscles external intercostal muscles subcostalis muscle and the transverse thoracis muscle Jyoti Kini MD primary care doctor at Medical Offices...”
“I didn’t rescue a woman out of a burning car.”
““And it’s not an injury you want to brag about.”
““I literally could not breathe,” he described.”
“Soon after, he began to feel pain.”
““Folks, if it were a cartoon my arms are flying off my body, my eyes are coming out of my head, people in the room are now naked because I blew their clothes off,” Crystal quipped.”


"If it's caused by sneezing, antihistamines may help."
Sudden and intense movement or contraction of these muscles (as seen during repeated sneezing) can cause damage to these muscles Treatment for these rib muscle sprains includes rest, ice dressing and anti-inflammatory drugs
"These muscles contract when you sneeze or even cough."
"Manhattan's Tell page six... "
"I didn't catch an orphan falling from the burning orphanage. I sneezed. We have several muscles to help the ribs move and breathe, namely, intercostal muscles, intercostal muscles, intercostal muscles, intercostal muscles, subcostal muscles and transverse pectoralis. Primary care doctors in Jyoti Kini MD Clinic..."
"I didn't save a woman from the burning car."
"It's not an injury you want to brag about."
"I can't breathe," he describes
Soon after, he began to feel pain
"Guys, if it's a cartoon, my arms will fly off me, my eyes will jump out of my head, and the people in the room are naked now because I've blown their clothes off," Christo joked



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“SubmitFree CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“...his wife Annette Roque had been plagued with divorce rumors but just recently the couple was spotted spending time together...”
“Matt Lauer and his model wife Annette Roque were recently spotted spending some time with their daughter, 14-year-old Romy, in a horse farm in New York.”
“...which definitely contrasts the speculations that the two are mere moments away from a divorce.”
“Both Lauer and Roque were seen and photographed at Bright Side Farm, a horse training facility that they had opened in 2013.”
“However, while the couple did spend a lot of time there, they arrived separately, with Roque, who was without a wedding ring, arriving first.”
“Both had been there to watch as their daughter rode through the farm.”
“Their sons Jack and Thijs were visibly absent from the trip, but Lauer would, later on, be seen spending time with them in the Hamptons.”
“When Lauer was first fired from "The Today Show," news quickly spread that he and his wife of 11 years were divorcing, as caused by the former news anchor's sexual misconduct scandal as well as his affairs with his co-workers.”


Submit
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get daily planned headlines and special offers!"
“…… His wife, Annette Roque, has been plagued by divorce rumors, but just recently, the couple were found spending time together... "
Matt Raul and his model wife, Annette rock, were recently found spending time with their 14-year-old daughter, ROMMY, at a racecourse in New York
“…… This is in sharp contrast to the conjecture that they are only a moment away from divorce. "
"Raul and rock were seen and photographed at bright side farm, the horse training facility they opened in 2013."
"However, although the couple did spend a lot of time there, they arrived separately, and rock, who didn't have a wedding ring, was the first to arrive."
"Both are there watching their daughter ride across the farm."
"Their sons Jack and tis obviously didn't take part in the trip, but Raul will be seen spending time with them in Hampton later."
"When Raul was fired from today show for the first time, the news of his divorce from his wife of 11 years quickly spread because of the sexual misconduct scandal of the former news anchor and his affair with colleagues."



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related: Love, Simon Star Keiynan Lonsdale Has Some Important Advice for Those Still in the ClosetCheck This Out:”
“She goes on to tell him that he deserves everything he wants.”
“One fan commented on Twitter that they "cried the whole time," while another described the film as one that has "changed my entire life."”
“And it turns out that the cast and crew would agree with fans on the movie's ability to tug at viewers' heartstrings, as there were scenes that didn't leave a dry eye on set.”
“In conversation with Gus Kenworthy on ABC's Nightline, director Greg Berlanti and actor Nick Robinson (AKA Simon) revealed one moment in particular that seemed to resonate with almost everyone.”
“The scene in question took place between Simon and his mother, Emily, portrayed by Jennifer Garner.”
“Simon had already come out to his family, but it was the very first time that he and Emily had sat down and discussed his sexual identity.”
“"You get to exhale now, Simon," she says in the scene, adding: "You get to be more you than you've been in a very long time."”
“While talking with Gus, Nick explained that he burst into tears while filming the scene, explaining: "I started crying because those words are kind of universal.”
“"It was in that moment I think we all kind of realized, this is a much more universal message than we thought."”


"Related report: love, Simon star Kennan Lonsdale has some important suggestions for those who are still in the closing stage."
"She went on to tell him that he deserved everything he wanted."
One fan commented on twitter that they were "crying all the time," while another described the film as "changing my life."
"And it turns out that the actors and staff will agree with the fans that the film has the ability to pull the hearts of the audience, because there are some scenes on the set that don't leave dry eyes."
"In ABC's Nightline, director Greg berlanti and actor Nick Robinson's conversation with Gus Kenworthy revealed a special moment that seemed to resonate with almost everyone."
The scene takes place between Simon and his mother Emily, played by Jennifer Garner
"Simon has come out to see his family, but this is the first time he and Emily have sat down to discuss his sexual identity."
"You can exhale now, Simon," she said at the scene, adding, "you're going to be better than you have been for a long time."
While talking to Gus, Nick explained that he burst into tears while filming the scene. "I started to cry because the words were a bit common," he explained
"At that moment, I think we all realized that it was a more general message than we thought."



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the People Sunday May 27 9 pm Deception two hours...”
“Sunday May 20 7 pm America s Funniest Home Videos Monday May 21 8 pm Dancing with the Stars Athletes 9 pm American Idol two hours Tuesday May 22 8 pm Roseanne 8 30 pm The Middle series finale one hour 9 30 pm Splitting Up Together 10 pm For...”
“...pm Designated Survivor Thursday May 17 8 pm Grey s Anatomy 9 pm Station 19 Friday May 18 8 pm Once Upon a Time series finale Part 2 9 pm Marvel s Agents of S H I E L D”
“Thursday April 19 10 pm Scandal series finale Friday May 11 8 pm Once Upon a Time series finale Part 1 Tuesday May 15 9 pm black ish Wednesday May 16 8 pm The Goldbergs 8 30 pm Alex Inc 9 pm Modern Family 9 30 pm American Housewife 10”
“As previously announced, Scandal will air its series finale next Thursday, April 19, while Once Upon a Time‘s end will span two Friday nights (May 11 and 18) and is titled “Leaving Storybrooke.”Of note: May Sweeps this year runs Thursday, April 26 through Wednesday, May 23.”
“In addition, American Idol will wrap its inaugural ABC run on the same night as Dancing With the Stars‘ first-ever all-athletes edition.”
“Also of note: The Middle will end with an hour-long series finale on Tuesday, May 22, following the conclusion of Roseanne‘s first revival season.”
“ABC is the third network (following The CW and CBS) to unveil its list of finale dates, and the medical drama’s Season 14 closer — marking the final appearances for Jessica Capshaw and Sarah Drew’s long-tenured docs — will air on Thursday, May 17.”
“Grey’s Anatomy will bid farewell to Arizona Robbins and April Kepner in roughly a month’s time.”


“… People cheat for two hours at 9 p.m. on Sunday, May 27... "
"Sunday, May 20, 7pm America's funniest family video Monday, May 21, 8pm with star dancer, 9pm American Idol, two hours Tuesday, may 22, 8pm Roseanne, 8pm middle series ending, one hour, 9pm, 10pm together..."
“… P.m. designated survivor Thursday May 17 8:00 p.m. grey s anatomy 9:19 station Friday May 18 8:00 p.m. time series terminator Part 2 9:00 p.m. Marvel Comics
"Thursday, April 19, 10pm scandal series finale Friday, May 11, 8pm time series finale Part 1 Tuesday, May 15, 9pm Black Wednesday, May 16, 8pm Goldberg 8:30alex company 9:30modern family 9:30american housewife 10"
"As mentioned earlier," scandal "will be on air on April 19 (next Thursday), while" once upon a time "will be on air on two Friday nights (May 11 and 18) under the title of" leaving storybrook ". It's worth noting that this year's may cleaning will be broadcast from April 26 (Thursday) to May 23 (Wednesday)
"In addition, American Idol will end its first ABC Series on the night of the first all athlete version of dance with the stars."
"It's also worth noting that the middle part will end with a one hour series ending on Tuesday, may 22, after rosani's first revival season."
"ABC is the third TV station to announce the closing date after CW and CBS. The 14th season of the medical drama" closing "will be broadcast on May 17 (Thursday), which is the last appearance of Jessica Capshaw and Sarah drew's lifelong doctors."
"Gray's anatomy will bid farewell to Robbins, Arizona, and April Kepner in about a month's time."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Kourtney is know for her natural-lead mothering, which includes avoiding TV's and processed foods, for her three children with Scott Disick.”
“The 33 year-old fitness mogul has confirmed that she will be revealing the sex of her bundle of joy on the show that made her family famous, Keeping Up With The Kardashians (KUWTK) in it's upcoming season.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“We will be revealing on the show but not this week  — Khloé (@khloekardashian) January 3, 2018The youngest of the Kardashian women is already set to reveal her pregnancy on the reality show.”
“Khloe also revealed on Jimmy Kimmel's chat show last night that both 26 year-old Thomas and the KUWTK crew knew before the Jenner Kardashian family, 'I've known the crew since 2007.”
“We've had pretty much the same.”
“They've been involved in pretty much the best and worst of us and they keep quiet.'”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Coultney is known as a natural lead mother, which includes avoiding TV and processing food for her three children with Scott Disick."
"The 33 year old fitness tycoon has confirmed that she will reveal her happy gender on the show that has made her family famous and keep up with kuwtk in the coming season."
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"We will reveal it on the show, but not this week - khlo é (@ KhloeKardashian) on January 3, 2018, Kardashian's youngest woman is ready to reveal her pregnancy on a reality show."
"Khloe also revealed in a chat show with Jimmy Kimmel last night that Thomas, 26, and members of kuwtk's crew knew earlier than the Jenner Kardashian family," I've known the crew since 2007. "
"We're in the same situation."
"They were almost involved with the best and the worst of us, and they were silent."
"This content was imported from YouTube."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With the hand of the clock pointing to a new hour, it’s time to evolve your consciousness around the material side of life.”
“That’s when Uranus arrives in Taurus on May 15.”
“Taurus is a slow and chill placement for the usually quick and agile Mercury, but we’ll be acutely aware of the value of our choices.”
“After two months in Aries, Mercury arrives in Taurus on May 13.”
“Mercury finally switches signs, too.”
“Additionally, with the energy of the new moon pointing to Venus in Gemini, the coming four weeks will be busy, chatty, and filled with movement.”
“Money, stability, and material needs are at the forefront for the coming lunar month.”
“Even though the movements of Uranus and Mars dominate the headlines for May, there are other things going on, namely a Taurus New Moon on May 15.”
“Mars’s square off with Uranus on May 16, however, may bring a jolt to this new Uranus in Taurus era.”
“On a personal level, Mars in Aquarius will inspire us to form community and make friendships or social connection a priority.”


"The hands of the clock point to a new moment, and it's time for your consciousness to evolve around the material aspects of life."
"That was when Uranus arrived in Taurus on May 15."
"Taurus is a slow and cold position for mercury, which is usually quick and agile, but we will be keenly aware of the value of our choices."
"After two months in Aries, mercury arrived in Taurus on May 13."
"Mercury has finally changed the signal."
In addition, as the energy of the new moon points to Venus in Gemini, the next four weeks will be busy, chatty and full of movement
"In the coming lunar month, money, stability and material needs are the most important."
"Although the movement of Uranus and Mars makes the headlines in May, there are other things going on, the new moon in Taurus on May 15."
"However, on May 16, Mars will be perpendicular to Uranus, which may bring a shock to the new Uranus in the Taurus era."
"On a personal level, Mars in Aquarius will inspire us to form communities and make friendship or social relationships a priority."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...make your own lemonade kit among other goodies...”
“Photographed by Sarah FalugoMore than 2,000 blooms were used to create the floral arrangements, all designed by Kristen Griffith-VanderYacht of Wild Bloom, including 100 flower boxes and at least 200 garden roses in the reception centerpieces.”
“...wedding...”
“Subscribe now for exclusive photos inside the gorgeous celebration — only in PEOPLE!”
“It was a night of “perfection” for Julianne Hough.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Dancing with the Stars judge married NHL star Brooks Laich on July 8 in a romantic, outdoor wedding on Lake Coeur d’Alene, Idaho, where Hough spent summer holidays growing up.”
““When I introduced Brooks to the lake, he fell in love with this special spot, and we knew this was where we wanted to raise our family and grow old together,” Hough, 28, tells PEOPLE in this week’s exclusive cover story.”
““It just felt right to be married here.”Designed by event planner Troy Williams of Simply Troy Lifestyle + Events, the wedding weekend was a celebration of love and nature — both of which were essential to the bride and groom.”
““It was really important to me that we had our ceremony outdoors,” says Laich, 34, who wore a Brooks Brothers tuxedo.”


“… Make your own lemonade and other goodies... "
"Photographed by Sarah falugomo, more than 2000 flowers were used to make flower arrangements, all designed by Kristen Griffith vanderyacht of wild bloom, including 100 flower boxes and at least 200 garden roses at the reception center."
“… Wedding... "
"Now subscribe to exclusive photos of gorgeous Celebrations - people only!"
"It was a perfect night for Julian Hoff."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Dancing with stars" judges and NHL star Brooks Leckie held a romantic outdoor wedding on July 8 in Lake Cowell Darren, Idaho, where Hoff spent his summer growing up
"When I introduced Brooks to the lake, he fell in love with this special place, and we knew it was a place where we wanted to support our family and grow old together," Hoff, 28, told people in his exclusive cover story this week
"It's nice to get married here." Designed by event planner Troy Williams, "simple Troy lifestyle + events," the wedding weekend is a celebration of love and nature - both essential for the bride and groom
"It's really important for me that we get married outdoors," said rich, 34, wearing the Brooks brothers' evening dress



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Since it was revealed that Tristan Thompson was allegedly cheating on Khloé Kardashian throughout her pregnancy, the Kardashians have begun expressing just how upset they are with the basketball player.”
“A source has revealed to E!”
“News, "The family is very angry with Tristan and having a hard time coming to terms with Khloé trying to forgive him.”
“They don't trust him and feel he won't change."”
“Considering the number of allegations made about Thompson so far, this is a little unsurprising.”
“However, E!”
“'s source makes it clear that the Revenge Body star has yet to make up her mind about Thompson, with Khloé allegedly going "back and forth" with her feelings "daily."”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Ever since Tristan Thompson was suspected of cheating Kardashian during her pregnancy, the Kardashian couple have begun to express their dissatisfaction with the basketball player."
"A source revealed to e!"
"News," the family was very angry with Tristan and it was hard to accept that heroy tried to forgive him
"They don't trust him and think he won't change."
"Given the current number of charges against Thompson, this is not surprising."
"But, e!"
"The source made it clear that the avenging body star has yet to make a decision with Thompson, who is said to be" back and forth "with Heroe with her feelings" every day. "



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The “sometimes lighter is better” Heineken commercial is terribly racist omg."”
“But I gotta just say tho.”
“"And that shit racist/bogus so I guess I shouldn’t help by posting about it.”
“"I think some companies are purposely putting out noticeably racist ads so they can get more views," he began.”
“Offended by the insensitive quip, Chance shared his frustrations on Twitter.”
“On Sunday (March 25), a vexed Chance expressed his disdain towards such prejudicial ads, most notably a recent Heineken campaign, after the beer brand released a campaign with the tagline, "Sometimes, lighter is better."”
“Chance the Rapper refuses to remain mum in regards to controversial matters, especially if they teeter along the lines of racism.”


Heineken's advertisement "sometimes lighter is better" is extreme racism
"But I have to say, tho."
"And it's racist / fake, so I don't think I should post for you."
"I think some companies deliberately put out obvious racist ads in order to get more points of view," he began
"Offended by the unkind remark, chase tweeted his frustration."
"On Sunday (March 25), after the Heineken beer brand launched an advertisement with the slogan" sometimes, the lighter the better ", it was an annoying opportunity to express his contempt for this biased advertisement, most notably the recent Heineken campaign."
"Rappers refuse to remain silent on controversial issues, especially if they falter along racist lines."



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[3]Notes [ edit ]^ Xbox One S models only ^ Ages at the time of the pageant...”
“Judges [ edit ]Contestants [ edit ]Contestant stats provided via the Miss Universe Organization.”
“For the first time, 360-degree broadcasts of the pageant were available for the Google Daydream, PlayStation VR and Samsung Gear VR headsets.”
“The final round was also streamed on Xbox One consoles via Mixer, with support for high dynamic range (HDR) using the HDR10 standard,[a] and on Xbox 360 consoles via Xbox Live.”
“Broadcasting [ edit ]All rounds of the pageant were webcast on the Miss U mobile app, the pageant's Facebook page and as downloadable live events available on the PlayStation Store for PlayStation 4 consoles.”
“Finals [ edit ]During the final competition, the top 15 finalists compete in athletic wear, evening gown and in a customized final question round, and the winner is decided by a panel of judges.”
“It was held on July 28, one day before the finals.”
“Preliminary round [ edit ]Prior to the final competition, the delegates compete in the preliminary competition, which involves private interviews with the judges and a presentation show where they compete in athletic wear and evening gown.”
“Special Awards [ edit ]Award Contestant Miss Congeniality Rhode Island – Alexa Papigiotis Miss Photogenic New Jersey – Briahna ReinsteinHistorical significance [ edit ]Pageant [ edit ]Selection of contestants [ edit ]One delegate from the 50 states and the District of Columbia were selected in state pageants held from September 2016 to February 2017.”
“Results [ edit ]Placements [ edit ]Miss Teen USA 2017 results.”


"[3] note [Edit] ^ Xbox one model only ^ age at beauty contest..."
"Contestant data provided by judges [editors] contestants [editors] through Miss Universe."
"Google daydream, PlayStation VR and Samsung gear VR headphones provide 360 degree broadcast of beauty contests for the first time."
"The last round is also played on the Xbox one console through the mixer, supports the high dynamic range (HDR) using hdr10 standard, and plays on the Xbox 360 console through xbox live."
"Broadcast [Edit] all rounds of the beauty contest are webcast on miss u's mobile app, the beauty contest's Facebook page, and live events can be downloaded from the Playstation 4 console of the Playstation store."
"Final [editor] in the final, the top 15 contestants compete in sportswear, evening dress and customized last round of questions, and the winner is decided by the jury."
"It was on July 28, the day before the final."
"Preliminaries [editors] before the final round, delegates participate in the preliminaries. The preliminaries include private talks with the judges, as well as demonstration shows in which they wear sportswear and evening dresses."
"Special Award [editor] award contestant Miss fun Rhode Island - Aleksa Papi giotis New Jersey on camera - Briana reinsteinhistorical implementation [editor] contestant selection [editor] a representative from 50 states and the District of Columbia was selected in the state beauty contest from September to December 2016 in February 2017."
"Results [editor] placement [editor] results of Miss American teenagers in 2017."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When you look back at her career arc, though, you see she had to put it a lot of hard work before she exploded in popularity.”
“Everyone, ESPN especially, is trying to find the next Erin Andrews.”
“And she continues to expand her list of broadcasting duties beyond sideline reporting.”
“She's on air during the biggest sporting events of the year.”
“She's one of the faces of Fox Sports 1.”
“Erin Andrews has managed to do what only a handful of broadcasters have ever done — leave ESPN and became more popular than ever.”
“This feature is a part of our Most Influential People Behind The Scenes In Sports series.”


"However, when you look back at her career, you will find that she has to make a lot of efforts before her popularity soars."
"Everyone, ESPN in particular, is trying to find the next Irene Andrews."
"She's also continuing to expand her broadcasting responsibilities, not just sideline coverage."
"She's on air at the biggest sporting event of the year."
"She's one of the faces of Fox Sports 1."
"Irene Andrews has managed to do what only a few broadcasters have done - leave ESPN and become more popular than ever."
"This feature is part of one of the most influential people behind the scenes in our sports series."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s Britney Spears.’””
“...selfie appeared on the screen...”
“The Modern Family actor who stars as family patriarch Jay Pritchett on the ABC comedy admitted Thursday on The Ellen DeGeneres Show that he didn t recognize Taylor Swift when he met the Grammy winner at costar Sarah Hyland s...”
“...backyard birthday party...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I went to Sarah Hyland’s birthday party and this beautiful young woman came up to me,” O’Neill, 71, recalled.”
““When I go to these things, I don’t look at people closely.”
“It’s a bit overwhelming if there’s a lot of people there you don’t know, some celebrities.”
“And so this woman came up to me and said, ‘Hi again.”
“Nice to meet you.’ ”O’Neill remembered knowing that she was famous, but he couldn’t place who she was.”


"It's Britney Spears."
“… There's a selfie on the screen... "
"The modern family actor, who plays Jay Pritchett as the Patriarch on ABC comedy, admitted on Ellen DeGeneres on Thursday that he didn't know Taylor Swift when he met a Grammy winner with CO star Sarah Hyland s..."
“… Backyard birthday party... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I went to Sarah Helan's birthday party and this beautiful young woman came up to me," recalls O'Neill, 71
"When I do these things, I don't look at people carefully."
"If there are a lot of people you don't know, some celebrities, it's a bit overwhelming."
"So the woman came up to me and said," hello. "
"Nice to meet you." "O'Neill remembered that she was famous, but he didn't know who she was."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The show is already available to stream on Hulu.”
“Update: Netflix confirmed on Oct. 23 that all nine seasons of How I Met Your Mother would be leaving the streaming service on Nov. 13.”
“Now 30 Rock is the newest series to leave Netflix, the streaming service has confirmed.”
“There were early rumors that 30 Rock would be leaving earlier this month, but Netflix has just confirmed that the show will be removed due to a license expiration.”
““30 Rock will be rolling off the service in October,” a statement originally reported by Vulture reads, which Polygon has confirmed.”
““The license for a TV series or movie is for a set period of time, which means every title eventually comes up for renewal.”
“At that point we take a variety of factors into account to determine if we will renew the title.”
“As we expand our content portfolio, our goal is to continue offering great movies and TV series for our members, while also providing content that is available exclusively on Netflix.”It’s unclear where 30 Rock will go next.”
“Unlike Fox, which signed a deal with Hulu two months ago and has started migrating its series over, NBCUniversal hasn’t announced a new major streaming partner.”
“30 Rock may live on in NBC’s own app, but the network hasn’t announced any plans at this time.”


"The show is ready to be shown on Hulu."
"The latest news: Netflix confirmed on October 23 that the nine seasons of" how I met your mother "will all quit the streaming media service on November 13."
"Now 30 rock is the latest series to leave Netflix, the streaming service has confirmed."
"There have been rumors that 30 rock will leave earlier this month, but Netflix has just confirmed that the show will be deleted due to the expiration of its license."
"30 rock will launch the service in October," wrote a statement originally reported by vultures, which polygon has confirmed
"The license for a TV series or movie has a fixed term, which means that every title will eventually be renewed."
"At that time, we will consider all kinds of factors and decide whether to renew the contract."
"With the expansion of our content portfolio, our goal is to continue to provide our members with excellent movies and TV series, as well as content exclusively provided by Netflix." It's unclear where 30 rock will go next
"Unlike fox, which signed an agreement with Hulu two months ago and has begun to move its series, nbcuniversal has not announced a new major streaming partner."
"30 rock may be broadcast live in NBC's own app, but NBC hasn't announced any plans yet."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And then the people who don’t like it, absolutely despise it.”“There’s no in between,” she added.”
““So it’s just hilarious to see, you know, the people who love it, love it and they think it’s amazing and they get it.”
““We knew it was going to be polarizing,” Lawrence told reporters at the Toronto International Film Festival.”
“CinemaScore, which grades films based on reactions from moviegoers at the start of the opening weekend, gave the movie a rare F rating.”
“Their marital bliss is interrupted when two unexpected guests — a man (Ed Harris) and his wife (Michelle Pfeiffer) — arrive at their doorstep.”
“...stars Lawrence and Javier Bardem as a newlywed couple living in the middle of nowhere.”
“Image zoom Credit: Robin Marchant/Gettymother!”
“The actress stunned in a black maxi dress with a floral pattern, while Aronofsky kept his look simple in a green button down and black pants.”
“As Lawrence recalled to the crowd, she injured her diaphragm hyperventilating on set, to which Darren said, “It’s only a movie!” She then flipped him off in jest.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Then those who don't like it absolutely despise it." "There is no difference between the two," she added
"So, you know, it's funny to see people who like it, like it, they think it's amazing, they get it."
"We know it's going to be polarization," Lawrence told reporters at the Toronto International Film Festival
Cinemascore scored the movie based on the audience's reaction at the start of the premiere weekend, giving it a rare f-rating
"When two unexpected guests - a man (ED Harris) and his wife (Michelle Pfeiffer) came to their door, their marital happiness was interrupted."
“…… Lawrence and Javier Baden star in a newlywed couple who live in a remote place
"Image scaling credit: Robin marchan / gettymore!"
"The actress dazzled the audience with a black dress with floral patterns, while Aronofsky kept her simple look in a green button and black pants."
Lawrence recalled to the audience that she was injured by hyperventilation on the set, and Darren said, "it's just a movie! "And then she dumped him in a joke."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Shout out to @Camila_Cabello for taking us to Havana tonight at the #iHeartAwards2018 pic.twitter.com/RE1ncw5awp — iHeartRadio (@iHeartRadio) March 12, 2018This story first appeared on Billboard.com.”
“"It just takes me to that really sexy, sensual place," Cabello explained of the song before the performance, also commenting, "My grandmother loves that song!"”
“And Young Thug gave fans a special treat by showing up to perform his guest verse on the song, carrying a pink rose to match Cabello and the set.”
“Cabello tapped into her inner Marilyn Monroe-via-Madonna with her performance — wearing a pink dress and sleeves, and with top-hatted backing dancers, all undoubtedly inspired by a combination of the former's iconic Gentlemen Prefer Blondes role and the latter's classic "Material Girl" music video.”
“"And tonight is gonna be totally different, too."”
“"Every time I've performed this song I've done something different," Camila Cabello said of her Hot 100-topping smash "Havana," before performing the song live at the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards.”
“...iHeartRadio Music Awards: Camila Cabello Channels Madonna With "Havana" PerformanceThe singer tapped into her inner Marilyn Monroe-via-Madonna with her performance, undoubtedly inspired by a combination of the former's iconic 'Gentlemen Prefer Blondes' role and the latter's classic "Material Girl" music video.”


"Shout to Camilla Cabello and thank him for taking us to Havana tonight for" iHeart awards 2018 " pic.twitter.com/RE1ncw5awp -IHeartRadio (@ iHeartRadio) on March 12, 2018, the story first appeared in Billboard.com Website. "
Explaining the song before the performance, Cabello said: "this song brings me to a very sexy and emotional place. My grandmother loves this song very much."
"The young mob gave the fans a special treat. He took a pink rose and performed his guest poem for Cabello and the crew."
"Through Madonna's performance, Cabello explored her inner Marilyn Monroe - the accompaniment dance in pink dress and sleeve and hat. Undoubtedly, the inspiration for all of these comes from the combination of the former's iconic gentleman's preference for blonde role and the latter's classic" material girl "music video."
"It's going to be totally different tonight, too."
"Every time I sing this song, I do something different," Camilla Cabello said of her 100 hit song, Havana, before singing the song live at the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards
“…… IHeartRadio Music Award: Camilla Cabello uses "Havana" performance for Madonna channel. The singer explores her inner Marilyn Monroe through Madonna's performance. Undoubtedly, her inspiration comes from the combination of the former's iconic "gentlemen prefer Blonde" role and the latter's classic "material girl" music video. "



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So, after a roller-coaster final stretch, a show with a long and successful history on Fox will get a proper send-off from the network and give fans a chance to say goodbye, instead of an after-the fact cancellation.”
“When that was also done, with not a minute to spare, New Girl was officially renewed Sunday, just a day before Fox’s upfront presentation.”
“But before we get to that and other details about Season 7, let’s look back at the wild past few days when the comedy series went from a shoo-in for a 13-episode final season to the brink of cancellation to an eight-episode renewal.”
“New Girl has been an important show for Fox and sibling 20th TV It was the network s first big comedy hit in a long time it became the first big SVOD sale of a current broadcast comedy series to Netflix for a reported 900 000 an episode and six...”
“...seasons in it continues to be Fox s highest rated comedy series...”
“So when the Season 6 finale came and went last month, everyone assumed the comedy was getting one more chapter for a proper sendoff.”
“But as broadcast series renewals and cancellations started rolling in midway through last week, a shocker hit the rumor mill — New Girl was getting canceled.”
“While the show did not officially get the ax, it came very, very close to it.”
“I hear that was because of various reasons (for instance, star Zooey Deschanel is on maternity leave having just given birth to her second child), most if not all main cast members would not be able to return to work until the fall.”
“With the logistical challenges, no space on the midseason schedule and a Season 6 finale that tied in a bow so many loose ends, the network leaned heavily toward not going with a seventh season.”


"Therefore, after a roller coaster final, fox's long-standing and successful programs will be appropriately welcomed by the TV station and give fans a chance to say goodbye instead of canceling afterwards."
"When it's done, there's no spare minute, the new girl is officially updated Sunday, just a day before Fox's early introduction."
"But before we go into other details of season 7, let's look back over the past few days, from the last season of 13 episodes to the upcoming cancellation, to the sequel of 8 episodes."
"New girl" is an important program of Fox and brothers 20. This is the station's first major comedy in a long time. It became the first major store to sell a new radio comedy to Netflix, with a reported 900000 units per episode, a total of six
“… Four seasons in it continues to be Fox's top rated comedy series
"So, last month's season 6 finale came and went, and everyone thought that this comedy had another chapter to say goodbye to."
"But when the radio series and cancellations began rolling to the middle of last week, a shocking rumor spread - the new girl was cancelled."
"Although the show didn't officially get the axe, it was very, very close to it."
"I've heard that for a variety of reasons (for example, star Zoe Deschamps has just given birth to a second child and is on maternity leave), most (if not all) of the leading actors don't get back to work until the fall."
"Due to logistical challenges, there are no vacancies in the mid season schedule, and there are too many pending endings in the sixth season. TV stations tend not to launch the seventh season."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments below.”
“Do you celebrate Thanksgiving?”
“As well as this, she has also previously shared several Thanksgiving recipes on her now defunct lifestyle blog, The Tig, including ideas for using up leftovers - one popular one was for turkey tortilla soup.”
“(Image: Meghan Markle/Instagram)In 2016, Meghan shared a snap of her "perfect Thanksgiving Turkey", which she cooked on the barbecue instead of in the oven in order to retain as much flavour as possible and create a crispy skin.”
“The source added that the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge are invited to the meal and Meghan plans to prepare a traditional roast turkey - something the Duchess has previously talked about on her Instagram.”
“"She's an amazing cook and loves making big holiday dinners."”
“(Image: Meghan Markle/Instagram)They said: "Meghan loves being a newlywed and loves spoiling Harry, so she is planning to host an American style Thanksgiving feast and she's going to be making it all from scratch.”
“According to Hollywood Life, a close friend of the 37-year-old has claimed that Meghan is in fact planning to host an "American-style" dinner in the Kensington Palace home she shares with Prince Harry.”
“It is not yet known whether she will celebrate her first Thanksgiving as a royal, but there are no official 'rules' stopping her from celebrating if she wishes to.”
“(Image: REX/Shutterstock)Last year the Duchess of Sussex is believed to have spent the holiday relaxing with her mum, Doria.”


"Please let us know in the comments below."
"Do you celebrate Thanksgiving?"
"In addition, she shared several Thanksgiving recipes on her now defunct lifestyle blog, TIG, including the idea of running out of leftovers - one of the most popular was Turkey Tortilla Soup."
"(image: Meghan Markle / instagram) in 2016, Meghan shared a snapshot of her" perfect Thanksgiving turkey, "cooking it on the grill instead of in the oven to preserve the flavor as much as possible and create a pastry."
"The source added that the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge were invited to dinner and Megan planned to prepare a traditional roast turkey - which the Duchess had talked about earlier on instagram."
"She's a great cook. She likes to cook holiday meals."
(picture: Megan mackle / instagram) they said, "Megan likes to get married and spoil Harry, so she plans to have an American Thanksgiving dinner. She will start from scratch."
"According to Hollywood life, a close friend of Megan, 37, claims that Megan is actually planning an" American "dinner at the Kensington Palace where she and Prince Harry live together."
"It's not known whether she will celebrate her first Thanksgiving as a member of the royal family, but there are no official 'rules' to prevent her from celebrating if she wants to."
(photo source: Rex / shutterstock) last year, it is believed that the Duchess of Sussex spent a relaxing holiday with her mother, Doria



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Also on HuffPost...”
“Performers and attendees alike proved the concert’s mantra — love conquers hate and fear.”
“The 23 year old wrapped up the event with a heartfelt rendition of Judy Garland s 1939 classic Somewhere Over The Rainbow Grande became overwhelmed during the performance and began to cry pausing to pull herself together with the encouraging cheers of the 50 000 strong crowd behind her before...”
“...finishing the song the Independent reported...”
“Grande’s mother, Joan, told Variety her daughter’s connection to the song goes deeper than just Manchester.”
““I didn’t know she was going to sing it,” the elder Grande said.”
““It’s an emotional story: my father passed away two and half years ago, and that was the song she sang for him after he passed.”The singer was very close to her grandfather, who died in 2014.”
“Her mother said he always encouraged her to sing the “Wizard of Oz” ballad in public.”
“The "One Love" concert was dedicated to the 22 victims who were killed by a suicide bomber after Grande’s May 22 “Dangerous Woman” tour performance wrapped up.”
“Money raised went to British Red Cross’s Manchester Emergency fund, which has raisedover £9.6 million ($16.8 million) for the victims and their families.”


"Also in hofpost..."
"Both the performers and the participants proved the tenet of the concert - love triumphs over hatred and fear."
"23-year-old Judy Garland ended the event with a sincere singing of" somewhere on the rainbow ". Grande could not bear the heavy burden in the performance. In the inspiring cheers of 50000 audiences behind her, she stopped and cried..."
“… Complete the song reported by the independent
Grande's mother, Joan, told variety that her daughter's connection to the song was not limited to Manchester
"I didn't know she was going to sing this song," the old man said
"It's a touching story: my father died two and a half years ago, and that's the song she sang for him after he died," said the singer, who was very close to her grandfather, who died in 2014
Her mother said he always encouraged her to sing the "Wizard of Oz" Ballad in public
"A love concert is for the 22 victims who were killed in a suicide bombing attack after grand's" dangerous women "tour on May 22."
"The money raised was donated to the Manchester emergency foundation of the British Red Cross, which raised £ about 9600000 ($16 million 800 thousand) for the victims and their families."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He nodded when asked if he’d been treated fairly by the video giant and the public, and said he has a message “coming” regarding YouTube’s decision.”
“Paul didn’t have much to say about YouTube to TMZ.”
“...easy to buy ad packages...”
“Adding to the public skewering he received YouTube told TheWrap last week Paul would be pulled from starring on the platform s original series Foursome Upcoming YouTube projects have been put on hold and Paul was stripped of his Google Preferred status which helps advertisers identify top content and purchase...”
“Also Read: Jake Paul Dropped N-Word Twice in Leaked Video, Shifting Spotlight From Brother Logan (Video)Paul added to the TMZ cameraman he’s learned “everything, so many things” from the fallout.”
“He issued an apology, followed by a second apology, in the aftermath.”
“Paul took down the clip a day later, after it had already garnered at least 6 million views.”
“Fuji.”
“The 22-year-old has been under heavy scrutiny since posting a video titled “We found a dead body in the Japanese suicide forest” that showed a corpse hanging from a tree in Aokigahara forest near Mt.”
““Everyone deserves second chances, bro,” said Paul, as he walked past a TMZ reporter at LAX on Tuesday (see video below).”


"Asked if he had been treated fairly by the video giants and the public, he nodded and said he had a message about YouTube's decision" coming soon. "
"Paul has nothing to say about YouTube or TMZ."
“… Easy to buy Advertising Package... "
"Last week, YouTube told the wrap that Paul would no longer star in the original YouTube series, and four other upcoming YouTube projects were shelved. Paul was deprived of Google's preferred position, which helps advertisers identify top-level content and make purchases..."
Another read: Jack Paul lost n words twice in the leaked video, diverting the Logan brothers' attention (video) Paul added to TMZ's photographer that he learned "everything, a lot of things" from radiation
"He apologized afterwards, and then he apologized a second time."
"Paul recorded the video a day later, because it has got at least 6 million views."
"Fuji."
"The 22-year-old has been under intense scrutiny since the release of a video entitled" we found a body in a suicide forest in Japan. "The video shows a body hanging from a tree in a forest near Aoki harayama."
"Everyone deserves a second chance, brother," Paul said as he walked past TMZ reporters at Los Angeles International Airport on Tuesday (see video below)



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Added another: “How is this possible?””
““But in fact I’m obsessed with maintaining a healthy lifestyle that will give my baby and myself the best possible quality of life.”??”
“At eight months pregnant, the fit model has six-pack abs and doesn’t appear to have gained an ounce.”
“The 33-year-old showed off her mind-blowing body in an Instagram posted on Tuesday, August 15.”
“In the clip, Stage, who is due in October, performs squats, side-planks and other moves while her son, James Hunter, 2, plays nearby.”
“But the purpose of the video was to blast commenters for saying she shouldn’t be working out.”
““Since I’ve announced my second pregnancy, I’ve had certain ‘Instagram medical experts’ tell me what I should and shouldn’t do,” she wrote to her 2.3 million followers.”
““While I find some of the comments hilarious, I choose to only listen to my OBGYN and of course I also listen to MY body.”
“If something feels off, I don’t do it!”
“I always do what’s best for my growing baby and put him first.”The stunning 5-foot-8 brunette went on to explain that the only reason she’s working out is for the health benefits.”


Another added, "how is that possible?"
"But in fact, I'm obsessed with maintaining a healthy lifestyle, which will give my baby and myself the best quality of life."
"At 8 months of gestation, the fit model had six abdominal muscles, and it didn't seem to add an ounce."
On Tuesday, August 15, the 33 year old showed off her exciting body on instagram
In this video, stage, originally scheduled for release in October, squats and sideboards while playing near her two-year-old son James hunter
"But the purpose of the video is to attack the commentators who say she shouldn't exercise."
"Since I announced my second pregnancy, I've had some 'instagram medical experts' telling me what to do and what not to do," she wrote to 2.3 million fans
"Although I find some of the comments funny, I choose to listen only to my obstetricians and Gynecologists, and of course I also listen to my body."
"If I feel something's wrong, I'll quit!"
"I always do the best for my growing baby and put him first." The 5-foot-8 brunette went on to explain that the only reason she exercises is for health



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bravo didn’t comment and Zarin didn’t get back to us.”
“She popped up again earlier this year when the cast attended the funeral of her husband, Bobby Zarin.”
“Zarin starred on the first four seasons of the Bravo show.”
“But insiders say that it isn’t — as of yet — a full-time comeback.”
“We’re told that the controversial former star — who left in 2012 after doing battle with former pal Bethenny Frankel — has filmed multiple appearances for the upcoming season, including scenes last month at the Angel Ball and on Thursday night at a charity event in Midtown.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Jill Zarin is returning to the “Real Housewives of New York City,” Page Six has learned.”


"Bravo didn't comment, and zarin didn't reply."
"Earlier this year, when the actors were at the funeral of her husband, Bob zalin, she showed up again."
"Zarin starred in the first four seasons of the Bravo show."
"But insiders say it's not a full comeback so far."
"We heard that the controversial former star left in 2012 after a fight with his former good friend Bethenny Frankel, who has filmed a number of performances for the upcoming season, including scenes at the angel dance last month and a charity event Downtown on Thursday night."
"Click to send this email to a friend (open in a new window) Click to share on twitter (open in a new window) Click to share on Facebook (open in a new window) Jill zarin is returning to" the real housewife of New York City, "we learn on page 6



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I wouldn’t trade them for anything.””
““We spent three years building a life together and they were the three happiest years of my life.”
“In PEOPLE’s exclusive sneak peek at Friday evening’s episode of Marriage Boot Camp: Family Edition, the two are in a room having a heated argument centered around taking a lie detector test that would allegedly prove Portwood’s claim that Baier hit her.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I hope if we do do a lie detector test —” Portwood, 27, begins to say before Baier cuts her off with, “I’ve already taken a lie detector test, remember?” referring to his exam during Teen Mom OG.”
“You ll be embarrassed because I ll be telling the truth Portwood tells him but Baier doesn t take the claim seriously saying Amber it s going to take you killing somebody someday for people to realize who you really are Portwood defends herself saying it s Baier s attitude...”
“...toward her that causes her to get angry...”
““It’s really your lying that triggers me to go f—ing crazy,” she says.”
“Image zoom Amber Portwood on Marriage Boot Camp: Family Edition“Amber, you have everybody fooled,” Baier sys “I am no longer having your back.”“You’ve never had my back,” she retorts.”
““You’re just a childish person.”


"I won't trade them for anything."
"We spent three years building our lives together, and that was the happiest three years of my life."
"In people's exclusive peek at" matrimonial boot camp: Family Edition "on Friday night, the two had a heated argument in a room over taking a lie detector test, which is said to prove porterwood's claim that bell beat her."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I hope if we do a lie detector test -" porterwood, 27, began before Baer interrupted, "I've done a lie detector test, remember? "Referring to his exams as a teenager."
"You will feel embarrassed because I will say that Portwood told him the truth, but Bayer did not take it seriously. He said, amber, one day, you will kill people and make people realize who you are. Portwood defended himself by saying that this is Bayer's attitude..."
“… To her, make her angry... "
"It's your lies that drive me crazy," she said
"Marriage boot camp: family version" amber, you fooled everyone, "bell system" I no longer support you. "You never supported me," she retorted
"You're just a child."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HBO took a gamble and pushed Game of Thrones’ Daenerys and her lover/nephew Jon Snow as leads rather than supporting contenders, unlike Nikolaj Coster-Waldau and Peter Dinklage.”
“Kit Harington and Emilia Clarke weren’t nominated.”
“The dearly departed FX spy drama didn’t get any directing recognition, but Ozark was honored twice?”
“That’s the same number that The Americans earned.”
“I wasn’t that surprised to see Jason Bateman nominated for outstanding lead actor, but did the Netflix drama also deserve two nods in the directing category, and five nominations overall?”
“So many nominations for Ozark.”
“The Good Place writer (and pioneer in repetitive political tweets) made a web series called An Emmy for Megan and actually got an Emmy nomination for it, proving that blatant and hilarious self-promotion can be very effective.”
“Megan Amram!”
“But she did, and good for her.”
“I wasn’t sure she would get Emmy recognition for her terrific work on the male-dominated Atlanta.”


"HBO took a gamble, pushing game of Thrones' danielis and her lover / nephew Jon Snow to the top, rather than supporting competitors, unlike Nicolas Coster Waldo and Peter dinkledge."
"Kit Harrington and Amelia Clark were not nominated."
"The dead FX Spy Drama" has not been recognized by any director, but ozak has won two honors? "
"It's the same number that Americans earn."
"I'm not surprised to see Jason Bateman nominated as an excellent actor, but is this Netflix also worth two nominations for directors and five nominations in total?"
"Ozak has too many nominations."
"The writer of this good place (and the pioneer of repetitive political twitter) made an Emmy series for Megan, and thus won the Emmy nomination, proving that blatant and funny self promotion can be very effective."
"Megan Amram!"
"But she did, and it was good for her."
"I'm not sure she's going to win an Emmy for her performance in the male dominated Atlanta."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He also received probation for threatening British Airways flight attendants and spent two months in jail last year for violating that probation by using cocaine and other drugs.”
“Just two years ago, Hilton was arrested two years ago inside his ex-girlfriend’s home.”
“RELATED: Paris Hilton Changes Science Forever In April Fools’ Day PrankThis isn’t the first time Hilton has been in trouble with the law.”
“The judge scheduled Hilton’s next hearing for August.”
“News.”
“He appeared calm in court next to Shapiro, wearing a navy suit and velvet shoes, according to E!”
“The judge ordered Hilton released on $600,000 bail and required him to be treated at a psychiatric clinic until today’s court date.”
“Last month, Hilton’s hearing was delayed after he showed up in court in a jail smock meant to prevent self-harm and made several bizarre outbursts including mouthing the words “f*** you” and “I hate you” to his parents, Rick and Kathy Hilton and his brother Barron.”
“Hilton’s attorney, the famed Robert Shapiro, spoke on his behalf, telling the judge his client had undergone treatment at a psychiatric clinic, per court order after several outbursts in a Los Angeles court.”
“RELATED: Paris Hilton Talks Growing Up With Ivanka TrumpOn Thursday, Hilton appeared at his arraignment in court which was originally postponed due to the hotel heir’s bizarre behaviour.”


"He was also suspended for threatening a British Airways stewardess and was jailed for two months last year for violating the probation for using cocaine and other drugs."
"Just two years ago, Hilton was arrested at her ex girlfriend's house."
"Related report: Paris Hilton changed science forever in April Fool's Day prank. It's not the first time Hilton has been in legal trouble."
"The judge scheduled Hilton's next hearing in August."
"News."
"He was calm in the court next to Shapiro, wearing a navy suit and velvet shoes, according to e!"
"The judge ordered Hilton to be released on $600000 bail and asked him to be treated in a psychiatric clinic until today's hearing."
"Last month, Hilton's hearing was postponed because he appeared in court wearing a prison uniform to prevent self mutilation and made several strange moves, including saying 'f * * you' and 'I hate you' to his parents, Rick and Kathy Hilton, and his brother Barron."
Hilton's lawyer, the famous Robert Shapiro, spoke on behalf of Hilton and told the judge that his client had been treated in a psychiatric clinic by court order after several outbreaks in Los Angeles court
"Related report: Paris Hilton grew up with Ivanka trump. On Thursday, Hilton appeared in court for trial, which was originally postponed due to the strange behavior of the hotel's successor."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“DEADLINE: Will there be any other Scandal and Murder actors crossing over besides the two leads?”
“You’ll see that crossover.”
“So now the pressure for us for Murder is just to match that level of excitement that they created.”
“I will say, the Scandal read-through, I, as an audience member, just found it so refreshing and fun, and it really felt like Annalise fit in that episode really well.”
“We kept getting closer and closer, and it just made more and more sense.”
“And then if anything bumps along the way, we just won’t do it.”
“At that point, we just thought about it because we didn’t want it to feel forced, and we just wanted it to happen really naturally.”
“So it was one of those serendipitous things where we both realized it was good for both characters, and it almost felt like we had been planning it since last season.”
“She actually pulled up a clip of something from Scandal and their side of the story coalesced perfectly.”
“I said, we don’t have to do it, Viola’s arc doesn’t need this, but it’s possible that their stories could cross really organically.”


"Deadline: in addition to these two clues, will there be other scandals and murder actors crossing the line?"
"You'll see that intersection."
"So now for us, the pressure of murder is just to match the excitement they create."
"What I want to say is that I see through the scandal. As an audience, I think it's so fresh and interesting. I really think annalis is suitable for that episode."
"We get closer and closer, and that makes more and more sense."
"If there's any difficulty along the way, we'll quit."
"At that time, we just thought about it, because we didn't want it to feel forced, we just wanted it to really happen naturally."
"So it's a coincidence that we all realize it's good for both characters and almost feel like we've been planning since last season."
"In fact, she has produced a fragment from the scandal and their views are perfectly integrated."
"I said, we don't have to do this. Viola's arc doesn't need this, but their stories can really cross organically."



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Cardi B’s Appearance on ‘Ellen’ Is One for the Books...”
“No Invasion of Privacy here.”
“...in peace okurrr...”
“That means the Bodak Yellow singer is bailing on at least eight concerts including the Panorama Music Festival in New York City this summer but she added that she ll still be working on new features music and most importantly nesting Let the mama to be eat her chicken wings...”
“She also announced she’ll be back for the final leg of Bruno Mars’s 24K Magic Tour, which starts September 7.”
“I ate like six chicken wings, and I barely can breathe right now.” Always relatable, that Cardi B.”
“I be looking like I be moving and everything, but in reality a b-tch barely can breathe...”
“In a tweet and video posted to Instagram, the rapper apologized to fans that this weekend’s concert at the Broccoli City Festival in Washington, D.C., will be her last performance for a while “...because, you know, shorty keep growing.”
“She’s expecting a baby girl with her fiancé, rapper Offset, which she announced to the world by debuting her baby bump on the April 7 episode of Saturday Night Live.”
“Cardi B just announced that she’s canceling her summer tour dates to focus on her pregnancy.”


"Related reports: Katie B's appearance on" Ellen "is to publish a Book..."
"There's no invasion of privacy here."
“… In the Okur of peace... "
"This means that the bodak yellow singer will withdraw from at least eight concerts, including the panoramic Music Festival in New York City this summer, but she added that she will continue to work on new musical features and, most importantly, let expectant mothers eat chicken wings..."
"She also announced that she will return to take part in the final leg of the Bruno Mars 24K magic tour, which starts on September 7."
"I ate six chicken wings and now I'm almost out of breath." It's always relevant, that Caddy B
"I look like I'm moving something, but actually a b-tch can hardly breathe..."
"In tweets and videos posted to instagram, the rapper apologized to fans that this weekend's concert at Washington's west orchid city music festival will be her last performance in a while" Because, you know, shorty has been growing. "
"She and her fiance rapper offset are pregnant with a baby girl, which she first announced to the world on Saturday night live on April 7."
"Katie B just announced the cancellation of the summer tour date to focus on pregnancy."



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...alcohol rendering the insured unfit to perform contracted duties...”
“According to court documents filed in August of 2017 and obtained by PEOPLE at the time syndicates of Lloyd s of London addressed several insurance policy exclusions relating to a preexisting physical or psychological condition possession of illegal drugs prescription drugs not taken as medically prescribed and the consumption of...”
“RELATED VIDEO: Kanye Was Unable to ‘Snap Back’ from Erratic Episodes Without Kim by His Side: SourceLloyd’s of London later hit back with a countersuit claiming they were not liable and had “no duty” to pay the sum.”
“...stated West s team in the filing...”
“...coherent explanation about why they have not paid or any indication if they will ever pay or even make a coverage decision implying that Kanye s use of marijuana may provide them with a basis to deny the claim and retain the hundreds of thousands of dollars in insurance premiums...”
“According to court documents obtained by PEOPLE at the time West s lawyers claimed that the insurers made their client go to great lengths to prove his mental breakdown was legitimate and that they were hunting for some contrived excuse not to pay Nor have they provided anything approaching a...”
“West originally filed the lawsuit in August of 2017, about eight months after canceling the tour dates, claiming the insurance company had stalled on paying out the “multi-million dollar claim” stemming from the canceled concerts.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Representatives for the rapper have yet to respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Insurance company Lloyd’s of London has reportedly agreed to pay the majority of Kanye West's $10 million claim against themAccording to TMZ, the insurance company has agreed to pay the majority of the 40-year-old’s claim.”


“… Alcohol makes the insured unfit to perform his contractual obligations... "
"Based on the court documents filed in August 2017 and the documents obtained by Lloyd's of London at that time when it dealt with several insurance policy exclusions related to pre-existing physical or psychological conditions, possession of prescription drugs for illegal drugs (not prescribed) and consumption..."
"Related video: Kanye can't 'recover quickly' from the unstable incident without Kim Jong Il: Lloyd resources in London later fought back, claiming that they were not responsible and" not obliged "to pay the money."
“… West's team is stated in the document... "
“…… A coherent explanation of why they didn't pay, or any indication of whether they would pay, or even an insurance decision suggesting that Kanye's use of marijuana might provide them with a basis for rejecting claims and retaining hundreds of thousands of dollars in insurance premiums... "
"According to the court documents obtained at that time, West's lawyers claimed that the insurance company let their clients do everything possible to prove that his mental breakdown was legal, they were looking for some artificial excuses for not paying, and they did not provide any access It's something that's important. "
"West first filed a lawsuit in August 2017, about eight months before the cancellation date, claiming that the insurance company was stagnant in paying" millions of dollars' claims "arising from the cancellation of the concert."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Representatives of rappers have yet to respond to requests for comment."
It is reported that Lloyd's Insurance Company in London has agreed to pay most of Kanye West's $10 million claim. According to TMZ, the insurance company has agreed to pay most of the 40 year old's claims



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...to help her purchase her current home and has contributed over 1 3 million for the benefit of Jolie and the minor children...”
“RFO request for a court order for the establishment of a retroactive child support order In a filing the next day Pitt s lawyer Lance Spiegel slammed Jolie s filing as unnecessary and a thinly veiled effort to manipulate media coverage The filing state that Pitt loaned Jolie 8 million...”
“Inside their divorce battleAngelina Jolie and Brad Pitt‘s split in September 2016 was sudden and shocking — but after an initial flurry of ugly accusations, the couple entered divorce mediation and largely kept their negotiations private.”
“Now their divorce has exploded into the headlines again as the couple battle over visitation and child support for kids Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox.”
“Here’s a brief history of how things between them got so heated.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Their Shocking SplitJolie and Pitt were last photographed together in public in July 2016, when they stopped into a Jamba Juice store in L.A. with Shiloh.”
“On Sept. 19, 2016 Jolie filed for divorce.”
“She cited irreconcilable differences as the reason for the split and asked for physical custody of their six children.”
“Image zoom Pitt and Jolie with (from left) Pax, Zahara, Knox, Shiloh and Maddox in May 2014.”


“…… He helped her buy her present house, and donated more than 1.3 million yuan to Julie and the underage children. "
"The next day, Lance Spiegel, Pete's lawyer, attacked in a document that Julie's application was unnecessary and an understated effort to manipulate media coverage - Pete lent Julie $8 million to apply for state..."
"In their divorce dispute, Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt's breakup in September 2016 was sudden and shocking - but after the initial series of ugly charges, the couple entered the divorce mediation process and largely kept their negotiation privacy."
"Now, their divorce is making headlines again, because the couple had a dispute over visiting and raising their children, Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox."
"It's a brief history of how things between them became so intense."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Jolie and Pete's shocking breakup was last photographed in public in July 2016 when they and Shiloh stopped at a Jamba juice store in Los Angeles."
"On September 19, 2016, Julie filed for divorce."
"She broke up with irreconcilable differences and asked for actual custody of their six children."
"In May 2014, Pitt and Julie posed with parks, Zahara, Knox, Shiloh and Maddox (from left)



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Remini is repped by APA, Art2Perform and Hirsch Wallerstein.”
“Remini, IPC’s Eli Holzman and Aaron Saidman, and showrunner Myles Reiff.”
““Scientology and the Aftermath” is produced for A&E Network by the Intellectual Property Corporation.”
““Scientology” has been renewed for eight hourlong episodes, plus five specials.”
“...programming this year...”
“The creation of A E Originals provides the opportunity for us to partner directly with the industry s best nonfiction storytellers like Leah both in front of and behind the camera to bring their ideas to audiences around the world The unit expects to order at least 50 hours of...”
““Leah is an incredible talent and collaborator with a unique point of view and we are looking forward to developing her brand of brave storytelling to new topics,” said Buccieri.”
“Former History exec Steve Ascher is leading the day-to-day charge at A+E Originals as VP.”
“He’s also serving as interim steward, with COO/CFO David Granville-Smith, of the entire A+E group as parent companies Hearst and Disney look for a CEO successor for Nancy Dubuc, who exited last month to become CEO of Vice.”
“A+E Originals was crafted by Paul Buccieri, president of A+E Networks Portfolio Group & A+E Studios, and a former unscripted producer.”


"Ramini is represented by APA, art2perform and hirchwallerstein."
"Remini, Eli Holzman and Aaron Sedman of the IPC, and acting star miles Reeve."
Scientology and the future is produced by intellectual property company for a & E network
"Scientology" sequel 8 hours, plus 5 Specials
“… This year's show
"The creation of e origins provides us with an opportunity to work directly with the best non fiction storytellers in the industry, such as Leah, in front of and behind the camera to bring their ideas to audiences around the world. The Department is expected to order at least 50 hours of..."
"Leah is a genius and collaborator with a unique perspective, and we are looking forward to taking her brave story style to a new topic," bucheri said
"Steve Ascher, a former history executive, is responsible for the day-to-day affairs of a + e origins as vice president."
"He also works with David Granville Smith, chief operating officer / chief financial officer, as interim housekeeper for the entire a + e group, as the parent companies Hearst and Disney are looking for a successor to Nancy dubuc, who left last month to become vice's chief executive."
"A + e origins is elaborately produced by Paul buccieri, President of a + e networks portfolio Group & A + e studios and former screenless producer."



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ahead of the 2018 Emmys, take a look at these and other milestones reached by this year's nominees.”
“And ahead of a ceremony that's already expected to have a Saturday Night Live feel, with "Weekend Update" co-hosts Colin Jost and Michael Che serving as emcees of a telecast produced by Lorne Michaels, the long-running NBC variety show broke some records of its own.”
“Game of Thrones star Peter Dinklage also broke a record, claiming the title for most best supporting actor nominations with his nod this year.”
“Sandra Oh made history as the first woman of Asian descent nominated for best lead actress in a drama series.”
“The diversity of offerings led to several broken records by this year's nominees.”
“Dominik Magdziak Photography/Getty ImagesWith networks and streaming services churning out more new content than ever, the Television Academy had plenty of contenders to choose from for the nominations for the 70th annual Primetime Emmy Awards.”


"Before the 2018 Emmy, look at these and other milestones that this year's nominees have reached."
NBC's variety show has broken some of its own records before Colin Jost and Michael Che, CO hosts of weekend update, became hosts of Lorne Michaels' TV show
"Game of Thrones" star Peter dinkrach also broke a record and was nominated for Best Supporting Actor this year
"Sandra Wu made history and became the first Asian American woman to be nominated for best actress in a feature film."
"The diversity of products has led to several record breaking nominations this year."
"Dominik magdziak photography / Getty Images has launched more new content than ever before with the help of network and streaming media services. The TV academy has many competitors to choose from in order to be nominated for the 70th Emmy golden time."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I personally don't want to see people posted all over my phone making out.'”
“Her social media page is littered with stunning shots of her showcasing her catwalk credentials.”
“And Brooklyn Beckham proved inseparable from his new girlfriend Hana Cross on Monday, as the pair were seen grabbing frozen yogurt in Los Angeles.”
“With the photographer, 19, and the model, 21, nailing their off-duty look, they were also seen opting for a spot of retail therapy, visiting high-end stores such as Barneys.”
“New couple Brooklyn Beckham 19 proved inseparable from his new girlfriend Hana Cross 21 on Monday as the pair were seen grabbing frozen yogurt in Los Angeles Brooklyn who recently unveiled his new tattoo on his right elbow and arm a sword with flowers on it kept casual in a...”
“...white T shirt and black skinny jeans...”
“The son of David and Victoria Beckham highlighted his London street style with a beige bomber jacket and trendy lace-up boots.”
“Strolling alongside him, Hana also made a stylish statement in a camouflage loungewear set and grunge-inspired boots.”
“Shopping With the photographer and the model nailing their off duty look they were also seen opting for a spot of retail therapy visiting high end stores such as Barneys Making a style statement Brooklyn kept casual in a white T shirt and black skinny jeans Street style Brooklyn kept...”
“...things casual in a white T shirt and black skinny jeans Handsome The son of David and Victoria Beckham highlighted his London street style with a beige bomber jacket and trendy lace up boots The stunning brunette sported free flowing locks which complemented her striking made up features...”


"I personally don't want to see the intimacy of people posted on my mobile phone."
"Her social media page is full of wonderful photos of her showing her fashion show qualifications."
Beckhams and his new girlfriend, Hana cross, were inseparable on Monday as they scrambled for frozen yogurt in Los Angeles
"As the 19-year-old photographer and the 21-year-old model decided on their off-duty look, people also saw them choose a retail treatment site and visit high-end stores like Barneys."
"On Monday, Beckhams' 19-year-old newlyweds in Brooklyn turned out to be inseparable from his new girlfriend, Hana cross, 21, who was seen holding frozen yogurt in Brooklyn, Los Angeles. The latter recently showed his new tattoo on his right elbow, with a sword on his arm with flowers on it, and the sword was randomly placed in one..."
“… White T-shirt and black skinny jeans... "
"David and Victoria's son, David, highlight his London street style with a beige Baseball Jacket and stylish lace up boots."
"As she strolled around him, Hannah made a fashion statement in a camouflage casual suit and glenger style boots."
"Shopping with photographers, models are nailed to work, they are also seen to choose a place for retail therapy, visit Barneys and other high-end stores, and issue a fashion manifesto. Brooklyn keeps casual wearing white T-shirts and black tight jeans, Brooklyn keeps street style..."
“… Dressed in a white T-shirt and black skinny jeans, the handsome David and Victoria's son Beckhams highlight his London street style with beige Baseball Jacket and fashionable lace up boots. His amazing dark brown hair moves free flowing locks, complementing her eye-catching make-up features.... "



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I have this very specific memory of toasting chocolate babkas and buttering them and eating them.”
““There was just a sense of processing it.” Hoffman coped by buying chocolate babkas from different bakeries every day and taste-testing them with her colleagues.”
“...man s actions could topple the show and erase their hard work...”
“Supervising producer writer Jerome Hairston described working in a fugue state Story editor Tian Jun Gu who started out on the show as a writer s assistant in the third season remembers how rattled the group was by the uncertainty and how angered they felt by the notion that one...”
“By November 3, the streaming giant cut all ties with Spacey, and the future of Netflix’s signature drama was in limbo.”
“Netflix halted production on the series immediately.”
“But the bubble was broken.”In less than a week’s time, more than a dozen men had accused Spacey, the two-time Oscar winner, of sexual assault, sexual harassment, and attempted rape.”
““Writers’ rooms are usually very insular; it’s an intimate, familial place in the best circumstances.”
““It was very surreal because, at the time, it was the very beginning of the #MeToo movement which was influencing our story and [within it,] what it was like to be president and female,” story editor Sharon Hoffman said.”
“The stunned writers, accustomed to working in isolation, were aware of every painful development in the news.”


"I have a very special memory of baking chocolate bread, buttering it and eating it."
"There's only one sense of processing." Hoffman bought chocolate cakes from different bakeries every day and tasted them with his colleagues
“… Men's behavior may subvert the show and erase their hard work. "
"Producer and screenwriter Jerome Hairston describes working in fugue state story editor Tian Jun Gu, who was a screenwriter assistant at the beginning of the third season. He remembers that uncertainty made the crew very nervous, and they were very angry at this idea..."
"By November 3, the streaming giant had cut off all ties with spacey, and the future of Netflix's signature play was uncertain."
"Netflix immediately stopped production of the series."
"But the bubble has burst." In less than a week, more than a dozen men accused two time Oscar winner spacey of sexual assault, harassment and attempted rape
"The writer's room is usually very remote, in the best environment is a close family place."
"It's very surreal, because it was the beginning of the Mayo movement, and it influenced our story, the feeling of being president and a woman," said story editor Sharon Hoffman
"Shocked writers who are used to working alone are aware of every painful development in the news."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was in jail for around 4 hours and he was released without bail.”
“At that point, Miles was arrested for being drunk in public ... a misdemeanor.”
“I wasn't arrested I was detained bc there was no evidence to charge me with a crime."”
“For the record, the San Diego PD tells TMZ Miles was arrested and booked for misdemeanor public intoxication.”
“They also took a mug shot.”
“Miles Teller was arrested early Sunday morning after he was literally falling down drunk and refusing to cooperate with cops ... law enforcement sources tell TMZ.”
“Teller was partying with a group of guys in San Diego when an officer noticed the actor was having trouble standing on the sidewalk.”
“We're told the cop walked up to Miles and started questioning him, but he quickly became uncooperative.”
“Our sources say that's when Teller lost his balance and almost fell into a traffic lane.”
“The cop cuffed him, and Miles had trouble standing in one spot.”


"He was in prison for about four hours and was released without bail."
"At that time, miles was arrested for being drunk in public... Misdemeanor. "
"I was not arrested, I was detained because there was no evidence to charge me with a crime."
"For the record, San Diego police told TMZ that miles was arrested and registered for a misdemeanor of drunkenness in public."
"They also took a picture."
"Miles Taylor was arrested early Sunday morning while he was drunk and refused to cooperate with the police... Law enforcement officials told TMZ
"While Taylor was in San Diego with a group of people, a police officer noticed that the actor had difficulty standing on the sidewalk."
"We heard that the police came up to miles and began questioning him, but he soon became uncooperative."
"Our source said Taylor lost his balance and almost fell into the driveway."
"The police handcuffed him and it was difficult for miles to stand in one place."



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Serena and fiance, 33-year-old Reddit co-founder Alexis, announced the pregnancy back in April on her Snapchat, with a snap of the nine-time Wimbledon champion showing off her bump in a swimsuit, alongside the caption: "20 weeks."”
“(Image: serenawilliams/Instagram)(Image: Instagram)Serena famously won her 23rd Grand Slam at the Australian Open while pregnant, and it was soon after the milestone that she announced she was temporarily retired from competitive tennis in order to focus on the impending arrival of her baby.”
“Grand slam titles: 1."”
“Weight: 6lb 14oz.”
“Baby girl Alexis Olympia Ohanian Jr."Born: September 1, 2017.”
“(Image: Instagram)(Image: serenawilliams/Instagram)Sharing the video, the new mum wrote: "Hello, world.”
“Serena first introduced Alexis to the world earlier this week with a video of her pregnancy journey.”
“Little Alexis has now even got her own Instagram account - the very first post sees the adorable newborn resting a hand under her chin as she sleeps.”
“Her daughter is also wearing a cute babygro that reads 'smart and strong like my mama'.”
“"Biceps," 35-year-old Serena simply captioned it along with a flexing emoji.”


Serena and her fiance, 33 year old reddit co-founder Alexis, announced their pregnancy on her snapchat in April this year. The photo of the nine time Wimbledon champion shows her figure in a swimsuit, with the title: "20 weeks."
"(photo source: Serena Williams / instagram) (photo source: instagram) soon after Serena won her 23rd Grand Slam title in the Australian Open during her pregnancy, she announced her temporary withdrawal from competitive tennis to concentrate on her upcoming baby."
"Grand Slam champion: 1."
"Weight: 6 pounds, 14 ounces."
"Baby girl Alexis Olympia Ohanian Jr." date of birth: September 1, 2017
"(image source: instagram) (image source: Serena Williams / instagram) when sharing the video, the new mother wrote:" Hello, world. "
"Serena introduced Alexis to the world for the first time earlier this week with a video of her pregnancy."
"Little Alexis now even has her own instagram account - in the first post, she saw a lovely newborn sleeping with a hand under her chin."
"Her daughter is also wearing a lovely baby dress with the words' smart and strong as my mother '," she said
"Biceps," Serena, 35, simply added the title with a curved emoticon



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jennifer Aniston Remembers Experiencing 'Friendship, Family and Heartbreak' With Her 'Friends' Co-StarsLisa Kudrow Reveals There Was a Secret 'Friends' Reunion: 'We Have Convened'Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Sadly, the ‘Friends’ Movie Trailer Is a Hoax -- But Watch It Anyway!”
“Fans of Friends should know that Lisa Kudrow has seen the trailer for the show’s fake movie reboot.”
““Courteney [Cox], actually, is the one who said, ‘Did you see that trailer?”
“What do we do?’ Like, nothing, that’s a clip!” Kudrow, 54, joked on Thursday’s Conan.”
“When host Conan O’Brien asked if Cox was confused by the clip, Kudrow replied, “No, she wasn’t fooled.”
“She was like, ‘Wow, how did that go viral?’ You know, autocorrect, ‘How’d that go biral?’ But I knew what she meant.”Kudrow didn’t seem overly impressed by the trailer, which to date has gotten more than 40 million views.”
““I don’t know what to make of it.”
“It’s just sort of these weird clips from things that clearly have nothing to do with Friends,” she said.”
“So can fans hold out any hope for a Friends reunion or reboot?”


"Jennifer Aniston remembers working with her" friends "through" friendship, family and heartbreak. " Kudrow revealed that there was a secret reunion of "friends": "we called" related galleries "
"Embedded code restart" content: sad, friends' movie trailer is a scam, but still want to see it
"Fans of my friends should know that Lisa Kudrow saw the trailer for the show's fake movie restart."
"In fact, Courtney (COX) is the one who says," did you see the trailer? "
"What shall we do? "It's like, nothing, it's a clip! "Kudrow, 54, joked on Thursday's" Conan. "
When the host Conan O'Brien asked Cox if he was confused about the video, Kudrow replied, "no, she wasn't fooled."
"She said," Wow, how can you be crazy? "You know, AutoCorrect," what's going on? "But I know what she means," Kudrow said, as if he was not impressed by the trailer, which has been viewed more than 40 million times so far
"I don't know what to do."
"These strange clips are obviously not about friends," she said
"So what hope can fans have for the reunion or restart of their friends?"



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Because if she is I ain’t watching no’mo!””
““Kenya Moore is finally off rhoa thank the lord, hallelujah.”“Is @KenyaMoore really fired from #RHOA?”
“As Moore herself has yet to say anything else regarding rumors about her return, Twitter users have been chatting.”
““Kenya is good with the group,” he said.”
“Still, RHOA executive producer Andy Cohen told “The Breakfast Club” Friday that Moore had no issues getting along with the other ‘wives.”
“Additionally, Moore was noticeably absent from the regularly scheduled trip overseas, which was in Spain this season.”
“Head honchos at Bravo were none too pleased when the star eloped with Marc Daly and he refused to show up on the show until the second half of the season.”
“That Moore isn’t joining a new season shouldn’t come as a total shock.”
“Reportedly, just four cast members are scheduled to be back: NeNe Leakes, Kandi Burruss, Cynthia Bailey and Porsha Williams.”
“Sources tell the website Moore may be relegated to being a friend of the show, however, Bravo won’t confirm the cast line up until later in the summer, according to AJC Radio & TV Talk.”


"Because if she was me, I wouldn't watch no mo!"
"Kenyamore has finally left Roya. Thank God, Hallelujah." "Is kenyamore really fired by Roya?"
"Twitter users have been chatting since Moore has not made any other comments about her return."
"Kenya is very good for this organization," he said
However, RhoA executive producer Andy Cohen told the breakfast club on Friday that Moore had no problems with other wives
In addition, Moore is clearly absent from regular overseas travel in Spain this season
"When the star eloped with mark Daly, Bravo's CEOs were not very happy. He didn't appear on the show until the second half of the season."
"Moore won't be in the new season, it shouldn't come as a surprise
"Only four actors are reported to be planning to come back: Nene Rix, candy burrows, Cynthia Bailey and Bertha Williams."
"The source told the website that Moore may be relegated to the show's friend, however, Bravo will not confirm the cast until later in the summer, according to AJC radio and TV talk."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“His 2018 tour announcement follows the reveal of his album cover and release date, Oct. 20.”
“Horan is heading on a lengthy North American tour next year with the support of chart topping country star Maren Morris -- with whom Horan collaborated for a track on his new album -- starting on July 18, 2018 in Texas.”
“He promised to those who weren't able to see him on this tour that he had something in store for 2018, and boy did he deliver!”
“Irish One Directioner Niall Horan is currently on his Flicker Sessions World Tour in support of his upcoming album, Flicker, playing much smaller venues than his 1D days.”


"His 2018 tour was announced after the release of his album cover and release date on October 20."
"Holland will make a long tour of North America next year with the support of the number one country singer, Maren Morris, and Holland will work with her to release a piece of her new album in Texas on July 18, 2018."
"He promised those who couldn't see him on this tour that he had something ready for 2018 and he did it!"
"Ireland one" director Niall Horan is currently on his Flickr sessions world tour to support his upcoming album "Flickr", which has a much smaller playing space than his 1D day. "



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But then I read it once Vale came along, and I had such a different reaction to it.””
““Vale will be looking out the window and say, ‘Mommy, look!”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“I read The Giving Tree again once Vale came along and I had such a different reaction to it says newly minted children s book author Savannah Guthrie Savannah Guthrie Covers Parents with Her Kids My Daughter Has a Vivid Imagination That Comes from Storytelling Savannah Guthrie is already encouraging...”
“...her kids to think outside the box...”
“Posing with son Charles “Charley” Max, 10 months Sunday, and daughter Vale, 3, for the cover of Parents magazine’s November issue, the Today show co-anchor and author of Princesses Wear Pants talked about the importance of supporting her children’s creativity.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“One method the newly minted children’s book author uses?”
“Introducing imagined characters into her daughter’s life, like the Big Red Heart Balloon.”
“It’s the Big Red Heart Balloon!’ ” says Guthrie, 45.”


"But then I read the book and I had a completely different reaction to it."
"Will look out of the window and say," Mom, look! "
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"I read the tree of giving again, and I had a totally different reaction to it," says Savannah Guthrie, a new children's book author who covers parents and children. "My daughter has a vivid imagination, which comes from storytelling. Savannah Guthrie has been very inspiring..."
“… Let her children think outside the box... "
Co anchor of today's show and author of princess in pants, 10-month-old son Charles Charles Max and 3-year-old daughter will spoke about the importance of supporting children's creativity on the cover of the November issue of Parents magazine
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A method used by authors of newly published children's books?"
"Introducing imaginary characters into a daughter's life is like a red heart balloon."
"It's the red heart balloon! Said Guthrie, 45



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch below:RELATED CONTENT:George Clooney Talks Positives of Weinstein Aftermath, Says Amal Has Faced Similar Situations (Exclusive)George Clooney Pens Poem in Wake of NFL ProtestsGeorge Clooney to Direct and Star in 'Catch-22' TV Adaptation...”
“In October, Gerber hosted an epic Casamigos Halloween party, escorting both his wife, supermodel Cindy Crawford, and Amal Clooney.”
“The 56-year-old actor's close pal and Casamigos business partner, Rande Gerber, recently claimed the actor once gave 14 of his close friends -- which he referred to as "The Boys" -- $1 million each as a surprise gift in 2013.”
“Gerber dropped the jaw-dropping tidbit during his appearance on MSNBC's Headliners.”
“... And the amazing monetary gift wasn't all.”
“Gerber said that Clooney also paid his friends' taxes for the year.”
“"There’s a group of guys we call 'The Boys,'" Gerber shared.”
“"George had called me and 'The Boys' and said, 'Hey, mark September 27th, 2013, on your calendar.”
“Everyone’s going to come to my house for dinner.'"”
“At the dinner, Clooney's pals were surprised with designer luggage bags at each seat on the table -- each containing a million dollars in $20 bills.”


"Take a look: related content: George Clooney talks about the positive factors of Weinstein's rehabilitation, saying that Amar is facing a similar situation (exclusive report) George Clooney wrote a poem after the NFL protest. George Clooney directed and starred in the TV adaptation of catch 22
In October, Gerber hosted an epic casamigos Halloween party with his wife, supermodel Cindy Crawford and Amar Clooney
"Rande Gerber, the 56 year old actor's close friend and casamigos's business partner, recently claimed that the actor had given 14 close friends (he called them" boys ") a surprise gift of $1 million each in 2013."
"When Gerber appeared on MSNBC's headlines, he forgot this amazing piece of gossip."
"... and this amazing gift of money is not all."
"Gerber said Clooney also paid his friend's taxes for the year."
"There's a group of people we call 'boys'," Gerber shares
"George called me and the kids and said," Hey, mark, September 27, 2013, on your calendar. "
"Everyone is coming to my house for dinner." “
At the dinner party, Clooney's friends were surprised to find that every seat on the table had a brand-name luggage bag with $1 million worth of $20 bills in each bag



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So that is hard for Khloé and I’m sure for Tristan, but it’s our reality.””
“So six months later when it replays — and [he and Khloé have] gotten through what they needed to get through — and it’s rehashed in front of everyone and everyone’s giving their opinions all over again and we’re live-tweeting and everyone’s chiming in.”
““Unfortunately, that was what [was] going on in our lives.”
““It is awkward, especially for maybe Tristan, who isn’t used to this,” the Selfish author, 38, said.”
“Sister Kim Kardashian opened up to Ellen DeGeneres on Wednesday, November 21, and revealed that it’s been uncomfortable for the couple to relive the drama.”
“Kardashian could be heard referring to Thompson as “a complete piece of s–t,” as she got heated during one episode.”
“...reality show.”
“The festivities came as the cheating scandal surrounding Thompson — who was spotted being unfaithful to Kardashian just two days before she gave birth to their first child together — has been unraveling in recent episodes of the E!”
“She added a pic of herself with Tristan and their daughter, captioning it, “True and I were hungry.”In her last picture of the day, the reality star appeared to be wearing a Cleveland Cavaliers T-shirt in support of the team her beau plays for.”
“...gorgeously set table with pink and white decor...”


"So it's hard for Heroe and Tristan, but it's our reality."
"So six months later, when it's rebroadcast - and (he and heroy) have passed the hurdle they need to go through - it's rebroadcast in front of everyone, everyone is re expressing their opinions, we're live on Weibo, and everyone's interrupting."
"Unfortunately, that's how our lives are."
"It's embarrassing, especially for Tristan, who is not used to it," said the 38 year old selfish writer
"Sister Kim Kardashian opened her heart to Ellen DeGeneres on November 21 (Wednesday) and revealed that it was uncomfortable for the couple to revisit the play."
"You can hear Kardashian call Thompson" a complete S-T "because she became very enthusiastic in one episode."
Reality show
"At the start of the celebrations, the scandal surrounding Thompson's cheating in recent episodes of" E! "
She also added a picture of herself and Tristan and their daughter, which said, "really, I'm hungry." In her last photo of the day, the reality star appears to be wearing a Cleveland Cavaliers T-shirt to support her boyfriend's team
“… Gorgeous pink and white Decorated Table... "



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I Give It a YearLeaving December 22SpotlightLeaving December 25Disney’s Pirates of the Caribbean: The Curse of the Black PearlLeaving December 31Troy...”
“Also starring Andie MacDowell as news producer Rita.”
“Mowgli: Legend of the Jungle (Arriving December 7)Andy Serkis directs a Netflix original with this classic story of Mowgli, the human child raised in India’s jungles by a pack of wolves.”
“With Ed by his side, Shaun sets out to rescue his girlfriend and his mum and get everyone to the safest place he knows, his favorite pub, the Winchester.”
“WHAT’S COMINGShaun of the Dead (Arriving December 1)Shaun’s girlfriend has dumped him, his employees walk all over him, his best friend Ed is a lazy bum, and zombies have taken over London.”
“When Troy’s Prince Paris runs off with Helen, the Queen of Sparta, they unknowingly spark a war between the Greeks and the Trojans.”
“Troy (Leaving December 31)This epic 2004 film about the Trojan war stars Brad Pitt, Eric Bana, Orlando Bloom, Diane Kruger, Brian Cox and Brendan Gleeson.”
“The unlikely team of Moana and demigod Maui, the songs “You’re Welcome” and “Shiny”, as well as Moana’s realization that she, not Maui, has what it takes to save her people, all make this movie a must see.”
“Disney’s Moana (Leaving December 20)The popular animated story about a determined girl seeking a demigod to break a curse on her people will be saying goodbye to Netflix towards the end of the month.”
“After first using this to his advantage, Connors eventually has a change of attitude and learns an important life lesson.”


"I give it a year, December 22, leave Disney, December 25, Pirates of the Caribbean: Curse of black pearl, December 31, leave Troy..."
"Also starring Andy McDowell as news producer Rita."
"Mogley: The Legend of the jungle" (released on December 7) Andy selkis directed an original work of Netflix, telling a classic story about mogley, a human child raised by a group of wolves in the Indian jungle
"With ed by his side, Sean began to rescue his girlfriend and mother and take them to the safest place he knew, his favorite bar, Winchester."
"The walking dead Sean (arrived on December 1) Sean's girlfriend dumped him, his employees walked on him, his best friend Ed was a lazy tramp, zombies occupied London."
"When Paris, the prince of Troy, eloped with Helen, the queen of Sparta, they unconsciously triggered a war between the Greeks and the Trojans."
Troy (left December 31) this epic film about the Trojan War stars Brad Pitt, Eric Bana, Orlando Bloom, Diane Kruger, Brian Cox and Brendan Grayson
"Mona and the demigod team of Maui, the songs" welcome "and" shine, "and Mona's realization that she, not Maui, has the ability to save her people make this movie a must see."
"Disney's Mona (left December 20), a popular cartoon about a determined girl seeking demigod to break the curse on her people, will bid farewell to Netflix at the end of this month."
"After taking advantage of this for the first time, Connors finally changed his attitude and learned an important life lesson."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meghan Markle Finally Joins Prince Harry and More Highlights From the 2017 Invictus Games Via www.eonline.com He opened the third annual games detailing his belief in the power of teamwork and discipline,…Editorial credit: Antonio Nardelli / Shutterstock.com...”
“The Invictus Games is a Paralympics-style athletic competition that Prince Harry founded for wounded warriors.”
“It was the first time the prince, 33, and the actress, 36, were snapped together by photographers, despite being a couple for over a year.”
“Prince Harry and his American girlfriend Meghan Markle took their relationship public on Monday when they were seen together holding hands on the sidelines at 2017 Invictus Games in Toronto.”


Megan markel finally joined Prince Harry and passed the exam www.eonline.com At the opening ceremony of the third annual meeting, he elaborated his belief in teamwork and discipline Editor: Antonio Nardelli/ Shutterstock.com Website
"The inviolable games is a Paralympic sports competition founded by Prince Harry for the wounded soldiers."
"This is the first time the 33 year old prince and the 36 year old actress have been photographed together, even though they have been married for more than a year."
"Prince Harry and his American girlfriend Meghan Markle opened their relationship on Monday when they were seen holding hands outside the Invictus games in Toronto."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“James Devaney Getty ImagesLook #4: More is more is more.”
“Going the extra mile to promote her new film A Simple Favor, Lively seems to be dressing in sync with her character Emily's prim and proper style.”
“Let's break it all down:Look #1: Double velvet in 90 degree heat and humidity.”
“B stepped out this past Friday (in nearly 90 degree heat) in the first of many menswear-themed outfits she'd be spotted wearing throughout her weekend-long press tour: a blue velvet Brunello Cucinelli suit with a burgundy velvet suit jacket layered on top.”
“BACKGRIDNaturally, the jacket was removed because...it was 87 degrees.”
“James Devaney Getty ImagesLook #2: Nothing says "Hey, look at me!"”
“...like a highlighter green suit.”
“Next came this neon green Versace suit, which was plucked straight off the Versace Spring/Summer 2019 runway show at Milan Men's Fashion Week in June.”
“Lively added a touch of femininity to the menswear look and paired the suit with pink Christian Louboutin bejeweled heels, Lorraine Schwartz jewels, and a hot pink lip.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Picture of James dewani Getty" 4: the more the better
"In order to promote her new film" a simple favor ", lively works very hard. Her dress seems to keep pace with the serious style of Emily she plays."
"Let's break it all down: look at 1: Double velvet, 90 degree heat and humidity
"B put on the first of many men's themed clothes she wore on her Weekend reporter tour last Friday (in the heat of nearly 90 degrees): Blue Velvet Brunello cucinelli suit with a purplish red velvet suit jacket."
"Naturally, the jacket was removed because It's 87 degrees. "
"James devanni Getty" 2: no one says "Hey, look at me!"
“… It's like a fluorescent green suit. "
"Next up is the neon green Versace suit, which was picked up directly from the Versace 2019 spring / summer runway show at Milan men's fashion week in June."
"Lively adds a bit of femininity to the men's look and matches the suit with pink Christian Louboutin jewelry heels, Lorraine Schwartz jewelry and hot pink lips."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out Romper's new video series, Romper's Doula Diaries:Watch full episodes of Romper's Doula Diaries on Facebook Watch.”
“All I'm saying is that this baby has been a long time coming and as a reluctant KUWTK fan myself, I'm secretly really excited for her.”
“Me and Tristan, we’re doing so well.”September: The Rumors StartIn late September, only days after rumors broke that her sister Kylie was pregnant, Us Weekly reported that multiple sources said the 31-year-old star was pregnant.”
“It’s like a really big step.” She concluded saying, “I am really excited about my future.”
“… Knowing I’m not on birth control, it’s scary.”
“She said in her one-on-one regarding her relationship with Tristan, "He wants to have like five or six kids with me.”
“When the doctor hints that she might have some trouble getting pregnant, she officially goes off birth control to get her follicle count back up.”
“June: She Announces That She's ReadyReally, this whole thing started back in June when, on the finale of KUWTK, Khloé goes to a fertility clinic with her sister.”
“So in anticipation of the big day, here's a little timeline of some major Khloé pregnancy moments.”
“News, and Khloé was trying to salvage their marriage.”


Take a look at Romper's new video series, Romper's doula diary: watch the full collection of Romper's doula diaries on Facebook watch. "
"What I want to say is that this child has been for a long time. As a reluctant kutek fan, I'm really excited for her secretly."
"Tristan and I, we did a good job." September: rumors began in late September, just days after rumors of her sister Kelly's pregnancy came out, US Weekly reported that multiple sources said the 31 year old star was pregnant
"It's really a big step," she concluded, "and I'm really excited about my future."
"It's terrible to know that I didn't have birth control."
"She said in a one-on-one conversation about her relationship with Tristan," he wants to have five or six children with me. "
"When the doctor suggested that she might have difficulty in getting pregnant, she officially stopped contraception in order to recover her follicle count."
"Joan: she announced that she was ready. It all goes back to June. At the end of kuwtk, khlo é and her sister went to a fertility clinic."
"So, in order to meet this important day, here's a small schedule, some important moments when khlo é is pregnant."
"It's news, and Heroe is trying to save their marriage."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the sketch below.”
“2, out May 5.”
“The veteran actor, who starred in Escape From New York and Escape From L.A. among other films, will next hit theaters in Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“When Corden ends up in the hospital, he wakes up to realize that he can never truly escape Kurt Russell, even in a medical institution.”
“The third incident is particularly volatile, with Russell happily throwing Corden through walls with a smile.”
“"I love you too, you crazy bastard," Corden says as he lays in the fetal position on the floor.”
“The next time they interact, he kicks Corden in the face while telling him how much he loves him.”
“At first, they meet and Russell talks about how cool and fun Corden is, giving him a "light" punch on the arm that leaves Corden clutching himself in pain.”
“In a new bit for The Late Late Show, Russell's friendly greetings to Corden are quick to turn violent, escalating from one encounter to the next.”
“James Corden has learned to cower every time Kurt Russell comes along.”


"Look at the sketch below."
"The second, the fifth of May."
The veteran actor has starred in many films, including "escape from New York" and "escape from Los Angeles", and his next film will be released in the second volume of "guardian of the galaxy"
"When cordon finally got into the hospital, he woke up and realized that even in the medical establishment, he would never really be able to escape Kurt Russell."
"The third incident was particularly turbulent. Russell happily threw the cordon into the wall with a smile."
"I love you, too, you crazy bastard," said cordon, lying on the floor in the fetal position
"The next time they interact, he kicks him in the face and tells him how much he loves him."
"At the beginning, when they met, Russell talked about how cool and interesting koden was, and gave him a" light "fist to make him grasp himself painfully."
"In recent shows, Russell's friendly greetings to Corden quickly turned into violence, escalating from one encounter to the next."
"Every time Kurt Russell appeared, James cordon learned to wince."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In fact, music has played a minor role in the series at best.”
“The cast never went to Jazz Fest.”
“Even then, though, with so few people watching, it's hard to get too terribly worked up about it.”
“That's just as well, given that the show's efforts at including local culture in early episodes was ham-handed at best.”
“In fact, its New Orleansness seemed to get more and more watered-down with nearly every episode, eventually reduced to little more than Chamber of Commerce images flashed between scenes, with an occasional bowl of gumbo thrown in.”
“If there's an upside to it all, it's that the show was not the pox on local culture that many feared.”
“That was seldom the case with "Southern Charm New Orleans."”
“But if a producer wants his or her show to draw a reliable base of return viewers, they've got to help those viewers buy into the illusion.”
“Granted, no reality show is actually "real."”
“The reason behind the erosion of interest in the show is pretty simple to nail down: It was boring, built around limp writing and clumsily staged attempts at drama.”


"In fact, music played only a minor role in the series at best."
"The actors have never been to a jazz festival."
"But even so, it's hard to get too excited about it because it's rarely seen."
"Considering that the play's efforts to integrate local culture into its early episodes were futile at best, that's great."
"In fact, its New Orleans style seems to be getting weaker and weaker, and almost every episode is reduced to just the image of the chamber of Commerce flashing between scenes, occasionally throwing a bowl of okra."
"If it's all good, it's not the local cultural acne that many people are worried about."
"It's a rare occurrence in the southern charm of New Orleans."
"But if producers want their shows to attract reliable repeat customers, they have to help these audiences accept the illusion."
True, no reality show is a real reality show
"The reason for the decline in interest in the show is simple: it's boring, centered around weak writing and clumsy theatrical attempts."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“﻿”
“You’re gay.”Also Read: Bryan Singer Preemptively Denies Accusations About Him in Upcoming Esquire ArticleThere was concern in some quarters that the film would tamp down Mercury’s homosexuality, and to its credit, it’s right there on screen from the get-go.”
“As a biopic of flamboyantly theatrical gay frontman Freddie Mercury, the movie frequently falls short, but it does provide interesting origin stories for many of the hits created by Mercury’s band Queen.”
“Wisely, the movie wraps everything up with a rousing recreation of Queen stealing the show at 1985’s Live Aid, providing the equivalent of a band making you forget a mediocre set by performing a dazzling encore.”
“The end of Bohemian Rhapsody marks the first and no doubt last time that I was brought to tears by Radio Gaga Very much an authorized biopic band members Brian May and Roger Taylor are credited as Executive Music Producers the film is a rather rote road to stardom tale...”
“In 1970 a Heathrow baggage handler named Freddie Bulsara Rami Malek meets dental student Roger Ben Hardy Only the Brave and astrophysics student Brian Gwilym Lee Midsomer Murders and informs them that they need to make him their lead singer...”
“Add bassist John Deacon (Joseph Mazzello, “G.I.”
“Joe: Retaliation), and Queen is born.”
“Watch Video Bohemian Rhapsody Rami Malek Is the Champion of the World in Trailer for Freddie Mercury Biopic The group quickly gets label attention due mainly to the vocal chops and stage presence of their lead singer who has redubbed himself Freddie Mercury much to the chagrin of his Parsi...”
“...parents...”


“﻿”
"You're gay." Read another: Bryan Singh, in an upcoming gentleman magazine article, is the first to deny the charges against him. Some people are worried that the film will suppress Mercury's homosexuality. To his credit, the film has been on the screen from the beginning
"As a gorgeous and dramatic biography of Freddie Mercury, the film often fails, but it does provide an interesting origin story for many of the popular works created by the empress of mercury."
"It's wise to say that the film is packed with an exciting entertainment program, which the queen stole from the live aid in 1985, providing the equivalent of a band performing a dazzling encore, making you forget a mediocre setting."
"The end of the Bohemian Rhapsody marks the first and undoubtedly the last time I was made to tears by radio Gaga - an authorized biographical film band whose members Brian May and Roger Taylor are considered executive music producers - and the film is a fairly rote Star Story road..."
"In 1970, a baggage Porter named Freddie brasala Lamy Marek at Heathrow Airport met dental student Roger Ben Hardy - only the brave astrophysics student Brian gwilym Lee was murdered, and informed them that they needed to make him the lead singer..."
Plus bassist John Dicken
"Joe: the queen was born
"Watch the video Bohemian Rhapsody rami Marek is the world champion trailer of Freddie Mercury biography. The group quickly got the attention of the label, mainly because their lead singer, who has repainted himself Freddie Mercury, has many chagrins about his Passy..."
“… Parents... "



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Cindy Crawford Shares School Photo of Lookalike Daughter Kaia Gerber Alongside Her Own Yearbook PicCindy Crawford Says She Wishes She Could Have Delayed Daughter Kaia's Fashion Week DebutCindy Crawford, Rande Gerber and Their Model Kids Look Dashing at Paris Fashion Week Event...”
“See more in the video below.”
“"And then, anything else that you want to do, just listen to that voice inside."”
“"I think the best thing that I tried to pass on to [Kaia] is to just be true to yourself and to feel like you're good enough just the way you are," Crawford explained.”
“"We have the same mannerisms... just like, the way we react to certain situations is the same -- and I think that's where it really shines through how much alike we are."”
“"It's not even just the way that we look alike," 15-year-old Kaia said.”
“ET sat down with Gerber and Crawford in May, where they revealed that their striking resemblance isn't the only way they're alike.”
“"I just don't see the resemblance," she joked alongside the sweet pics.”
“The mother-daughter pair couldn't be cuter in new selfies Gerber posted to Instagram on Saturday.”
“Kaia Gerber and Cindy Crawford are two peas in a pod!”


"Related content: Cindy Crawford shares a school photo of her daughter Kaya Gerber next to her Yearbook. Cindy Crawford says she hopes to postpone the premiere of Kaya's fashion week. Cindy Crawford, Rand Gerber and their models looked very elegant at Paris fashion week. "
"Please see more in the video below."
"Then, whatever you want to do, listen to the sound inside."
"I think the best thing I'm trying to pass on is being true to myself and feeling good enough," Crawford explained
"We have the same habit... It's like, we react the same way to certain situations - I think that's how similar we are
"It's not even just what we look like," said Kaya, 15
In May this year, et sat down with Gerber and Crawford, and they revealed that their amazing similarities were not the only ones
"I just don't see any resemblance," she joked next to the sweet photos
"The mother and daughter couldn't be more lovely in Gerber's new self portrait, which was released to instagram on Saturday."
"Kaya Gerber and Cindy Crawford are two peas in a pod!"



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We could just feel it coming!”
“Instagram/TheWeekndSeriously though, it looks like the pair are having the best Paris rendezvous, and we're so happy to see them giving it another shot.”
“Roses are great and all, but can you think of a better/more practical pressie than a family size jar of Pomodoro?”
“We're going to go ahead and assume that the roses and the sauce were a cute gift for Bella, and we're seriously respecting his choice.”
“Then Abel took to Instagram to post a snap of his finished plate, but over in the corner is the precise same jar of pasta sauce (yep, just call us Sherlock)Date night!”
“Bella Hadid posted a couple of pics to Insta, the first of her posing with some roses and the second with a giant jar of pasta sauce balancing on her head.”
“Furthermore, the pair can be linked via a jar of pasta sauce (hear us out!).”
“Instagram/TheWeekndIn fact, we're pretty sure they belong to Bella since she posted a pic of herself donning the precise same flawless nails.”
“The Weeknd took to his story to post a snap of a sugar sachet with the words 'Sugar Daddy', but the fresh nails in the picture definitely don't belong to him.”
“@backgridukWhile the snap is all we need to know that Abella 2.0 is officially a go, there have been a few subtle appearances over on the 'gram that have totally solidified the evidence.”


"We can feel it coming!"
"Instagram / theweeknd seriously, it seems that their date in Paris is the best, and we're glad to see them give us another chance."
"Roses are great for everything, but can you think of a better / more practical news than a family sized can pomotoro?"
"We will continue to assume that roses and sauces are lovely gifts for Bella, and we seriously respect his choice."
"As like as two peas, Abel put a snapshot of his plate on Instagram, but in the corner it was the same Italy sauce pot (yes, it's called Sherlock) date night."
"Bella Hadid posted a couple of photos on insta, the first of which was her rose pose, and the second of which was a large jar of spaghetti sauce balanced on her head."
In addition, the couple can be connected through a can of spaghetti sauce (listen to us!)
"Instagram / the weekndin, in fact, we're pretty sure they belong to Bella because she posted a picture of herself wearing the same perfect nail."
"This weekend, he posted a snapshot of sugar sachet in his story, which said" sugar dad ", but the fresh fingernails in the photo definitely didn't belong to him."
"@ backgriduk, although we only need to take a snapshot to know that Abella 2.0 has been officially released, there are some subtle phenomena in 'gram', which completely consolidate the evidence."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Eugenie, a director at London art gallery Hauser & Wirth, “is sure and steady like her grandmother, and then there’s this genuine warmth that comes from her mother,” a friend told PEOPLE.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Princess Eugenie Arrives at Her Royal WeddingJack, 32, and Eugenie, 28, have been dating for seven years.”
“...and Prince Harry Rush in for Princess Eugenie's Royal WeddingMeghan Markle and Prince Harry have returned to a very special place!”
“The couple have arrived to the royal wedding of his first cousin Princess Eugenie to Jack Brooksbank at St. George’s Chapel in Windsor Castle — the same venue where they tied the knot in May.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Meghan, wearing a navy dress and coat by Givenchy (her wedding dress designer!)”
“...and matching hat by Noel Stewart, and Harry quickly entered the chapel after arriving in a back Range Rover that pulled right up to the door.”
“Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”
“Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!”
“Like Meghan and Harry’s nuptials, Eugenie and Jack will embark on a carriage ride throughout Windsor to greet well-wishers following the ceremony.”


A friend told people: "Eugenie is a curator of Hauser and worth Gallery in London. She is as steady as a grandmother and has the sincere warmth from her mother."
"Related video: Princess Eugenie attends the royal wedding. Jack, 32, and Eugenie, 28, have been dating for seven years."
“…… Prince Harry comes to the royal wedding of Princess Eugenie. Megan markel and Prince Harry are back in a very special place
"The couple have arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle for the royal wedding of their cousin Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank - the same place where they got married in May."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Megan, wearing Givenchy's Navy Dress and jacket
“…… There is also Noel Stewart's matching hat. Harry gets on a range rover in the back and comes to the church door, and soon walks into the church. "
"Is there not enough coverage of the royal family?"
"Sign up for our newsletters and get the latest news from Kate Middleton, Megan markel and others!"
"Just like Megan and Harry's wedding, Eugenie and Jack will take a carriage around Windsor after the wedding to greet the blessing."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s human.””
“These days, she is determined to take on parts that offer her more than just a chance to show off her stunning figure.”
“The 25-year-old model first shot to fame in Robin Thicke’s Blurred Lines video and has since landed roles in movies including Gone Girl and We Are Your Friends.”
“She is also known for sharing sexy images on her social media pages but said in a new interview with Marie Claire magazine that just because she is proud of her sexuality doesn t mean she can t also be...”
“...a women s rights advocate...”
““In every profile written about me, there is, ‘She’s so sexual and she’s such a sex symbol,’ paired with, ‘But, wow, she knows about politics,’” she told the publication’s Fresh Faces issue.”
““And that in itself is sexist.”
“Why does it have to be one or the other?”Emily has two movies in post-production - In Darkness, in which she stars alongside Natalie Dormer and Joely Richardson and romance Cruise.”
“While her good looks see her offered a variety of film roles, Emily has become more picky about the projects she takes on.”
““I am way more interested in working with unexpected and cool directors on interesting projects than being in this big studio movie where you’re in a bikini,” she added.”


"It's people."
"The part she's determined to take on these days offers her more than just an opportunity to show off her amazing figure."
"The 25-year-old model became famous for the first time in Robin Thicke's blurry line video, then in the movies gone girl and we are your friends."
"She's also known for sharing sexy pictures on social media, but in a recent interview with Marie Claire magazine, she said that just because she's proud of her sexuality doesn't mean she can't either..."
“… Women's rights advocates... "
"In every profile about me, there are 'she's sexy, she's a symbol of sexuality' and 'but, wow, she knows politics,'" she told fresh face magazine
"It's sexism in itself."
"Why do you have to do this or that? "Emily has two films in post production - in the dark, she plays with Natalie domer, Jolie Richardson and a romantic journey."
"Although Emily's beauty allows her to play a variety of film roles, she has become more critical of her own projects."
"I'm more interested in working with surprisingly cool directors and engaging in interesting projects than in this big movie where you're wearing a bikini," she added



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Story continues below advertisement...”
““What we are trying to do is show that this is a real thing that’s tearing families apart.”
“Both of them are now classified by the church as “Suppressive Persons” (SPs) — people who seek to speak ill of Scientology — along with any journalist looking to tell a negative story about the religion.”
“Along the way, the viewer gets some insight into Rinder’s and Remini’s experiences as well.”
“'”Remini, 46, along with ex-elite Scientologist Mike Rinder, 62, are currently shooting Season 2 of the popular exposé show, which seeks to tell the unheard stories of people who’ve managed to leave the religious organization.”
“Also, we’re standing up to a bully and, in a culture where people are feeling apathetic, we’re representing a group of courageous people who are saying, ‘No, I’m going to do something about it.”
“But we’re showing how a person actually can get there, and that’s what’s resonating.”
“It was like, ‘Oh, this is that crazy thing where Tom Cruise is jumping on a couch and everybody believes in aliens?’Story continues below advertisement“I think that worked for a very long time to sell headlines.”
“People really had no idea.”
“'”READ MORE: 7 shocking things we learned from Leah Remini’s Scientology series“The Church of Scientology has been in the news, but more so for fodder and a headline,” she continued.”


"The story continues under the advertisement..."
"What we're going to do is prove that this is a real thing that breaks families apart."
Both of them are now classified by the church as "oppressors" (SPS) - those who try to speak ill of Scientology - and any journalist who wants to tell a negative story about Scientology
"In the process, the audience also learned something about Linde and ramini's experience."
"Ramini, 46, and former Scientology elite Mike Linde, 62, are currently filming the second season of the popular Expos é show, which attempts to tell the story of unheard of people leaving religious organizations."
"What's more, we are fighting against a bully. In a culture where people feel indifferent, we represent a group of brave people who are saying," no, I want to do something. "
"But we're showing how one can really do it, and that's what resonates."
"It's like," Oh, this is the crazy story of Tom Cruise jumping on the couch and everyone believing in aliens? "The story continues to be advertised below" I think it's a very long time to work to sell headlines
"People really don't know."
"Read more: seven shocking things we've learned from Leah ramini's Scientology series." Scientology has appeared in the news, but more as material and headlines, "she continued



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jessie first partnered with South Beach as ambassador and social media influencer in April 2017 after her second child and will appear again in a 360-degree marketing campaign including television, online, digital and social media.”
“'I've been very open about how the weight hasn't come off as easily after my third baby and although I haven't reached my goal yet, I can honestly say that I feel so good and incredibly healthy.'”
“And Jessie James Decker learned this first hand as she boarded a Southwest flight with her children Vivianne, four, Eric Jr., three, and seven-month-old Forrest on Wednesday.”
“'First we kept getting in trouble from the flight attendant for how many kids we could have in the rows and we truly were confused and kept doing musical chairs and I don’t think we ever got it right,' began the country star, 30, in an Instagram post.”
“Troubled traveler: Jessie James Decker had a chaotic flight as she boarded a Southwest flight with her children Vivianne, four, Eric Jr., three, and seven-month-old Forrest on Wednesday'Bubby puked (my nauseous baby) all over his clothes poor baby.”
“Forrest was the squirmiest wormy because he wants to be cool like his big brother and sister and refused to sit still,' she detailed the experience.”
“'Pacis dropping, bottles rolling under seats and people rollin eyes but hey we made it!”
“'Oh and all I had with me were Vivs clothes since she insists on having a carry on which was smart because we had to change Bubby into her clothes.”
“'All n all wouldn’t change a thing lol love these babies!”
“Let the thanksgiving week of gratefulness begin, any parents relate to traveling with a wolf pack?”


"After the birth of her second child, Jesse worked with South Beach for the first time in April 2017 as an ambassador and social media influencer, and will again participate in 360 degree marketing activities including TV, online, digital and social media."
"I've always been very frank that it's not so easy to lose weight after the birth of my third child. Although I haven't reached my goal, I can honestly say that I feel very good and very healthy."
On Wednesday, Jesse James Decker, along with her four-year-old Vivian, three-year-old Eric and seven month old Forrest, boarded the Southwest Airlines flight and learned that for the first time
The 30-year-old country star said in an instagram post: "first of all, we keep getting trouble from the stewardess, because how many children we have in a row, we are really confused, we have been making music chairs, and I don't think we have ever done it right."
"Troublesome traveler: Jesse James Decker and her child Vivian, four-year-old Eric, three-year-old boy and seven month old Forrest boarded the Southwest Airlines flight together, and the flight was in chaos. On Wednesday, Bubby threw up all his clothes, poor boy
"Forrest is the easiest worm to wriggle because he wants to be as calm as his brother and sister and refuses to sit still," she details his experience
"The bottle fell, the bottle rolled under the seat, people's eyes rolled, but hey, we made it!"
"Oh, I only have Vivs' clothes on me, because she insists on bringing a beautiful handbag, because we have to change Bubby into her clothes."
"Everything will not change, ha ha, I love these children!"
"Let Thanksgiving week begin. Do parents travel with wolves?"



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A bitter custody battle followed, which was settled just weeks before April's pregnancy was announced.”
“However his attempts were unsuccessful with 41-year-old Paula filing for divorce in October 2014.”
“After they separated in February 2014, Robin waged a public campaign to get Paula back, including an album called Paula with a lead single entitled Get Her Back.”
“The two married in 2005 after dating since they met as teens in the 1990s.”
“'Only got eyes for you': April announced her pregnancy August 17Blurred Lines singer Robin, 40, is already father to seven-year-old son Julian with ex-wife Paula Patton.”
“- Alan being Robin's late father.”
“April announced her pregnancy August 17, posting an ultrasound photo to Instagram and explaining in the caption that she was due 'March 1, Alan's birthday!'”
“'Only got eyes for you,' she wrote.”
“A second picture showed her posing in her bra top, hearts around her head.”
“Robin Thicke's pregnant girlfriend April Love Geary shows off her growing bump in her underwear, writing on Instagram 'Already so in love with you''Already so in love with you,' she wrote, adding a heart emoticon.”


A fierce custody battle ensued, which was resolved just weeks before the announcement of the pregnancy in April
"However, his attempt failed, and Paula, 41, filed for divorce in October 2014."
"After their separation in February 2014, Robin launched a public campaign to get Paula back, including an album called Paula with a single called let her back
"They got married in 2005 after meeting in their teens in the 1990s."
"Only your eyes: April announced on August 17 that she is pregnant. 40 year old singer Robin and ex-wife Paula button are the father of her 7-year-old son Julian."
"Alan is Robin's late father."
"April announced that she was pregnant on August 17. She posted an ultrasound photo on instagram and explained in the title that her due date was' March 1, Ellen's birthday!"
"Only your eyes," she wrote
"The second photo shows her wearing a bra with a heart around her head."
"Robin Hick's pregnant girlfriend, April love gear, showed growing lumps in her underwear. She wrote on instagram," I love you so much, "" I love you so much, "and added a heart-shaped illustration



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“Even so, it seems we don’t have to worry about any sudden changes in the royal family just yet.”
“She may be 92 years old, but she seems more lively and upbeat than ever — and we’re sure she’s loving the recent royal marriages as well as the arrival of new little members of the family.”
“While she may still be participating in royal engagements, there’s no doubt that many worry about the old age of her and her husband, Prince Philip.”
“And many wonder what may happen if Prince Philip, who’s currently 97, outlives his beloved wife.”
“‘London Bridge Is Down’ is code for when the queen diesShe’s held the title of queen for 65 years, Marie Claire notes — but the country still has to be prepared when she eventually passes.”
““London Bridge Is Down” is code for the queen’s death, and it will first be uttered by the queen’s private secretary over a secure phone line to the prime minister.”
“From there, 15 governments outside the U.K. where Queen Elizabeth is the head of state as well as 36 other Commonwealth nations will be alerted far before the media catches wind.”
“While it’s widely reported that the BBC will be the first to break the news when Philip dies, the Press Association news agency and other global news will be told about the queen’s death at once.”
“This plan, as well as the rest of the protocol, has been laid out since the ’60s and is carefully revised each year.”


"Check out the memo on Facebook!"
"Even so, we don't seem to have to worry about any sudden changes in the royal family."
"She may be 92 years old, but she seems to be more lively and optimistic than ever - we believe she loves the recent royal marriage and the arrival of new family members."
"Although she may still be taking part in the Royal Engagement, there is no doubt that many people are worried about the later years of her life with her husband, Prince Philip."
"Many people want to know what would happen if Prince Philip, now 97, lived longer than his beloved wife."
"London Bridge down" is the code name 65 years after the Queen's death, Mary Claire pointed out, but when she finally dies, the country still needs to be ready. "
"London bridge collapsed" is the Queen's death code, which will first be conveyed by the Queen's private secretary to the prime minister through a secure telephone line
"There, 15 governments outside the UK, with Queen Elizabeth as head of state and 36 other Commonwealth countries, will be warned before the media blows."
"Although it is widely reported that the BBC will take the lead in disclosing the news after Philip's death, the News Association news agency and other global news organizations will immediately learn about the Queen's death."
"This plan and other parts of the protocol have been developed since the 1960s and are carefully revised every year."



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Who knew child's play could make such an awesome workout?”
“Available in 13 different languages in more than 30 countries, they've trained instructors all over the world to help you master the art of hooping.”
“Hoopnotica is just one of the companies rocking the trend.”
“The low-impact, tummy-toning routine will work the whole body—back, abs, arms, and legs—as well as raise your heart rate to burn calories in a big way.”
“Fortunately it's so fun you won't even feel like you're exercising.”
“Celebrity Fans: Zooey Deschanel, Marisa Tomei, Liv Tyler, Michelle Obama, Beyonce, Olivia WildeHoop it up and burn seven calories per minute with the fitness craze that's heating up Hollywood!”


"Who knew that children's games could make such a great exercise?"
"There are 13 different languages in more than 30 countries, and they have trained coaches around the world to help you master the art of basketball."
"Hoopnomica is just one of the leading companies."
"The low impact, abdominal conditioning program will work the whole body back, ABS, arms and legs, as well as raising your heart rate and burning calories in a big way."
"Fortunately it's fun and you don't even feel like you're exercising."
"Star fans: Zooey Deschanel, Marisa Tomei, Liv Tyler, Michelle Obama, Beyonce, Olivia wildehoop, with the rise of fitness craze, burning 7 calories per minute, Hollywood is heating up!"



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Charges from both of those incidents have been dropped, but the incidents led to today’s court date to review whether or not he had violated his probation.”
““We will always stand by and support Meek Mill, both as he attempts to right this wrongful sentence and then in returning to his musical career.”Meek Mill was arrested in March for misdemeanor assault charges, and again in August for reckless driving and reckless endangerment.”
““The sentence handed down by the Judge—against the recommendation of the Assistant District Attorney and Probation Officer—is unjust and heavy handed,” he wrote.”
“Tonight, JAY-Z shared a note on Facebook decrying the sentence.”
“Meek Mill was sentenced to 2-4 years in prison today when a Philadelphia judge ruled that he violated his probation.”


"The charges have been dropped in both cases, but they led to today's court date to review whether he violated the probation."
"We will always support Mick, whether he tries to correct this wrong verdict and then return to his music career." Milk was arrested in March on misdemeanor assault charges and in August on reckless driving and reckless endangerment charges
"The judge's judgment on the recommendations of the assistant district attorney and probation officer was unfair and harsh," he wrote
"Tonight, Jay-Z shared a statement on Facebook condemning the verdict."
"Wink mill was sentenced to two to four years in prison today when a judge in Philadelphia ruled that he had violated probation."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Bruno Mars' '24K Magic' Hits Major Music Milestones: Find Out What!”
“Watch below to find out more!”
“His hit single "24K Magic" hit a major music milestone last month.”
“The "Versace on the Floor" singer has much to celebrate these days.”
“Meanwhile, Beyonce and JAY-Z also attended Mars' show at Madison Square Garden in New York earlier this week.”
“Earlier this month, Garth Brooks surprised his wife, Trisha Yearwood, with a Mars concert date night for her birthday.”
“Mars has had a slew of celebs attend his 24K Magic Tour.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"This video is not available because we were unable to load the sponsor's email."
Bruno Mars' 24K magic 'hit the main musical milestone: find out what
"Look down, learn more!"
His hit single 24K magic set an important musical milestone last month
"Now the singer of" Versace on the floor "has a lot to celebrate."
Meanwhile, Beyonce and Jez took part in the Mars show at Madison Square Garden in New York earlier this week
Earlier this month, Garth Brooks surprised his wife, Theresa ilwood, with a Mars concert on her birthday
"Mars has a lot of celebrities on his 24K magic tour."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Kim Kardashian/Instagram...”
“The star’s favorite body part: “My upper stomach, if that is even a thing,” she said.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Kardashian took the hot seat on Ellen Degeneres‘ Ellen’s Show Me More Show (which airs exclusively on YouTube) to answer the comedian’s burning questions for the KKW Beauty mogul.”
“The biggest bombshell?”
“Kardashian admitted that back in high school, she’d use her school uniform skirt to score good grades.”
“Image zoom“We would wear uniforms, so I would wear this little skirt,” the star said.”
““I used to cheat on all of my tests.”
“I would flip up the skirt and write all of the answers in washable ink.”


"Image zoom source: Kim Kardashian / instagram..."
The star's favorite body part is: "my upper abdomen, if that's one thing," she said
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Kardashian took a hot spot on Ellen DeGeneres' show me more show (only on YouTube), answering the comedian's pressing questions about the kkw beauty tycoon."
"The biggest bomb?"
"Kardashian admits that as early as high school, she used school dress to get good grades."
"Image zooming" we'll wear uniforms, so I'll wear this little skirt, the star said
"I used to cheat in exams."
"I'll turn my skirt over and write down all the answers in washable ink."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But the thing I ask every parent that I really admire, the one comment they all have is that they wish they had kids earlier."”
“...inspiration...”
“...public...”
“The actress, who is expecting her first baby, said she is "really excited" about it and said that the unknown is a "fun feeling".”
“Speaking during a sit-down with Willie Geist for Sunday Today, Mindy, 38, said: "It's so unknown to me.”
“I have a lot of control over a lot of aspects of my life, and this is one where I'm like, 'Okay, it's out of my hands,' which is kind of a fun feeling."”
“The Mindy Project star who has not publicly revealed her baby s paternity also joked As you know it s so easy to criticise parenting until you re a parent so one of the nice things about becoming a parent...”
“...is that I ll be able to openly criticise other parenting because I ll have a child...”
“Mindy debuts baby bump VIEW GALLERY Mindy has been keeping mum about her pregnancy And in terms of her parenting style Mindy said she will be looking to her own late mother who died of pancreatic cancer in 2012 for...”
“"My mum was incredibly fierce and so devoted to us, just loved us and really wanted us to be happy no matter what we did," she said.”


"But when I ask every parent, I really admire them. They all have a comment that they want to have children early."
“… Inspiration... "
“… Open... "
The actress, who is about to have her first child, said she was "very excited" about it and said the unknown is a "funny feeling."
"It's so strange to me," Mindy, 38, said in a meeting with Willie geist on Sunday
"I have a lot of control over many aspects of my life. It's a place I like," well, it's something I can't control. "It's an interesting feeling."
"Mindy plan star who did not publicly disclose her child's parent-child relationship also joked that you know it's easy to criticize parenting until you are a parent, so one of the benefits of being a parent..." "
“… That is, I can criticize other parents openly, because I will have a child... "
"Mindy made her debut at the baby lump landscape gallery. Mindy has always been silent about her pregnancy. In terms of her parenting style, Mindy said that she will look to her late mother who died of pancreatic cancer in 2012..."
She said: "my mother is very fierce, very devoted to us, just love us, really hope we can be happy no matter what we do."



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...a Moana themed bash the singer and fashion designer threw for Ace s 4th birthday in June...”
“FROM PEN Former Bachelorette DeAnna Pappas Stagliano is Already Dreading her Infant Son s Future Wedding The school year may be in full swing now but Simpson s little ones have some amazing summer memories to keep with them including...”
““KINDERGARTEN  #MAXIDREW,” Simpson wrote alongside the snap of her mini-me.”
“Last week, she shared a photo of 5-year-old daughter Maxwell “Maxi” Drew, decked out in her first-day-of school best and striking a precious pose for the camera.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Jessica Simpson Reveals She Has an IUD and Won’t be Having Any More Kids, Thank You Very MuchIt’s been an emotional milestone-laden time for the mom of two.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““First haircut ✔️ (Thanks @jessieholiday for making my stud look all grown up ) #ACEKNUTE,” the proud mama captioned the memory.”
“Ace’s signature shoulder-length blond locks have been sheared to reveal a shorter, yet still adorably shaggy cut as the little guy wades in the water in front of a stunning mountainous landscape.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


“…… Singer and fashion designer held a carnival with the theme of Mona for ACE's 4th Birthday in June.... "
"From pen before bachelor Diana Papas Stagliano has worried that her baby son's future wedding year may be in full swing now, but Simpson's children have some amazing summer memories to keep them including..."
"Kindergarten maxidrew," Simpson wrote next to her mini me snapshot
Last week, she shared a picture of her five-year-old daughter Maxwell "Maxi" draw, wearing the best clothes she wore on her first day of school and making a precious gesture in front of the camera
"Related video: Jessica Simpson revealed that she has an IUD and will not have another child. Thank you very much. It's an emotional milestone for a mother of two
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"First haircut ✔️  (thanks to Jessie Holliday for making my stallions look big) # aceknute, "proud mother wrote in her memory."
"Ace's signature shoulder length blonde hair is cut short, revealing a shorter, but still lovely, fluffy cut, and the little guy wades in front of an amazing mountain landscape."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ross told Us in August that he and his wife “want to take the kids on the tour.” She added: “Make it a family thing.””
“Now that her father is doing better, Ashlee can focus on the future, which includes making music with her husband … and their children.”
““It’s such a blessing,” the “Pieces of Me” singer, 33, told E!”
“News of her dad’s recovery in a new interview published on Saturday, September 1.”
““He’s doing good now and feeling good.”
“I’m so happy he’s healthy now.”Us Weekly reported in November 2016 that Joe was diagnosed with prostate cancer earlier that year.”
“He underwent surgery in September 2016.”
“A source revealed to Us in February 2017 that the fashion photographer was beginning treatment for his condition.”
““Joe just started radiation.”
“He feels fine, he’s getting through it and still working.”


Rose told us in August that he and his wife "want to take the children on a trip." "Make it a family thing," she added
"Now that her father is doing better, Ashley can focus on the future, including with her husband Make music with their kids. "
"That's great," the 33 year old "my fragment" singer told e! "
"In a new interview published on Saturday, September 1, her father recovered."
"He's doing well now and he feels good too."
"I'm glad he's healthy now." US Weekly reported in November 2016 that Joe was diagnosed with prostate cancer earlier that year
"He had surgery in September 2016."
"In February 2017, a source revealed to us that the fashion photographer's condition was beginning to be treated."
"Joe just started radiation."
"He feels good, has survived and is still working."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Mehera Bonner Contributor Mehera Bonner is a news writer who focuses on celebrities and royals— follow her on InstagramThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“And speaking of A Simple Favor, go ahead and watch the trailer below because it's definitely more entertaining than sitting at work scrolling through Instagram, right?”
“Honestly, here for this pairing.”
“Tell my story."”
“I'll miss you both.”
“Shoutout to always-on-it Instagram account Comments By Celebs for catching Ryan's response to this, which consisted of "The most ambitious crossover event in history.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Blake posted two new posters from her upcoming thriller A Simple Favor, and joked that she wants to date her co-star Anna Kendrick, AKA the "female(r)" version of Ryan.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Mehera Bonner writer Mehera Bonner is a news writer who follows celebrities and royalty - follows her on instagram. This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Speaking of a simple help, keep watching the trailer below, because it's definitely more fun than sitting in the office browsing instagram, right?"
"To be honest, this is our partner."
"Tell my story."
"I'll miss you all."
Yelling always captures Ryan's reaction with celebrity reviews on its instagram account, which includes "the most ambitious cross event in history."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
Blake posted two new posters for her upcoming thriller "a simple help" and joked that she wanted to date her partner Anna Kendrick, Ryan's "woman (R)" version



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch Cher perform at the 2017 Billboard Music Awards:”
“Cher is trailblazer, a fashion trendsetter, truly iconic looks at every single point in her career, a role model for preservering and showing us how to be strong and how to be true to ourselves.”
“With not one but two performances of her greatest hits and a Billboard Icon Award acceptance speech, she wowed the audience.”
““I think luck has so much to do with my success.”
“I think it was mostly luck with a little bit of something thrown in,” Cher said as her son Chaz Bono watched from the audience.”
“Cher joins an esteemed list of past award recipients, including Celine Dion, Prince, Jennifer Lopez, Stevie Wonder and Neil Diamond.”
“With more than 100 million albums sold worldwide and a No.”
“1 single in every decade from the 1960s to the 2010s (she was the first artist to have a No.”
“1 single on a Billboard chart in each decade), Cher has certainly earned the honor of icon.”
“Gwen Stefani presented Cher with the award, saying:“It is an honor for me to be here tonight to present the Billboard Icon Award to a woman who is truly the definition of the word icon: Cher.”


"Watch Cher perform at the 2017 Billboard Music Awards:
"Xueer is a pioneer and a leader of fashion trends. She has a real symbolic vision in every aspect of her career. She is an example of how to preserve and show us how strong and how true she is."
"She not only performed her greatest works once, but also twice. She also published the award-winning speech of billboard icon award, which surprised the audience."
"I think luck has a lot to do with my success."
"I think it's mainly luck and something to throw in," Cher said, as her son chazbono watched from the audience
"Cher has joined the past winners list, including Celine Dion, Prince, Jenny Lopez, Steve wonder and Neil Diamond respected."
"The global album sales exceeded 100 million, ranking first."
"From the 1960s to the 2010s, there was a single every decade (she was the first artist to have no."
"There is a single on the billboard charts every ten years), and of course Cher has won the honor of her idol."
Gwen Stephanie, who presented the award to Cher, said: "it's a great honor for me to be here tonight to present the billboard idol award to a woman who really defines the word" Cher. "



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Lovato and Aguilera have been teasing a duet for quite some time, with the track finally coming to fruition on Aguilera's forthcoming album, Liberation (due June 15), which the Billboard cover star announced last week.”
“The pop divas will debut their highly anticipated collaboration "Fall In Line" on the show, as they each announced on their social media accounts Tuesday morning (May 8).”
“When the biggest names in music come together for the 2018 Billboard Music Awards on May 20, two of pop's powerhouses will join forces for what might just be the most dynamic performance of the night: Christina Aguilera and Demi Lovato.”


"It's been quite a while since Lovato and Aguilera teased the duet, and the song finally blossomed on Aguilera's upcoming album Liberation (to be released on June 15), which the billboard cover star announced last week."
Pop divas announced on their social media accounts on Tuesday morning that they would make their debut in the much anticipated collaboration "queue"
"When the big names of the music industry gather on May 20 for the 2018 Billboard Music Awards, the two big powers of the pop music industry will join hands in what may be the most dynamic performance of the night: Christina Aguilera and Demi Lovato."



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““We referred to each other as Chicago and Green Bay — it was very cute.””
““She eats really healthy.”
“...afraid to let the world know...”
“While the Green Bay Packers quarterback, 34, has a history of being tight-lipped about his personal life, now that he’s dating Patrick, 36, he doesn’t “feel like I have to be reserved all the time.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s more normal,” he explained in an interview with Artful Living, before adding that there’s still a “right time and right place” for opening up about his personal life.”
““We’re just two people who enjoy being around each other and love each other.”
“We’re really into each other,” he shared, adding that given the depth of their feelings for one another, all of their Instagram photos together are only natural.”
““There are going to be posts with each other because we enjoy each other’s company a lot,” he remarked.”
“We re really attracted to one another Shedding light on how the couple likes to spend their time Rodgers shared that the pair both really enjoy traveling She s up for anything travel wise which is fun he told Artful Living adding that she s a good travel partner because...”
“...she s so laid back and low maintenance And it doesn t hurt that she has a trick or two up her sleeve when it comes to the kitchen She s a hell of a cook so we love just staying in too he told the outlet...”


"We call each other Chicago and Green Bay - that's lovely."
"She eats healthily."
“… Afraid to let the world know... "
Although the 34 year old Green Bay Packers quarterback has always been secretive about his private life, now he is dating 36 year old Patrick, and he does not "feel I have to keep quiet all the time." He can get push notification through news, feature, etc
"It's more normal," he explained in an interview with art life, then added that there is still a "right time and right place" to open up his personal life
"We are just two people who like to be together and love each other."
"We really like each other," he said, adding that given the depth of their feelings for each other, all their photos on instagram are natural
"We post to each other because we enjoy each other's company," he said
"We're really attracted to each other, which shows how the couple like to spend their time. Rogers said that the couple both like traveling very much, and she likes to do any wise travel, which is very interesting. He told art life magazine that she is a good travel partner because..."
“…… She's very laid back, maintenance costs are low, and it doesn't hurt that she has one or two tricks in the kitchen. She's a great cook, so we like to stay at home, too He said to the store



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““All the PR in the world cannot change the reality that the burden is on her to step up to the plate and do the right thing and not ignore our father,” she continued.”
“@KensingtonRoyal.”
“...holding you responsible Meg...”
“Try refreshing your browser or Meghan Markle s half sister slams her for ignoring dad calls royal family an embarrassment Back to video Next Samantha even alluded to Thomas s recent health scare tweeting If our father dies I m...”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
“Act like a humanitarian act like a woman!”We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
““Enough is enough.”
“!” she wrote.”
““How about you pay tribute to your own father?”
“The angry tirade began when Samantha shared an article on Meghan, 36, and Harry’s tribute to Nelson Mandela.”


"No PR in the world can change the reality that the burden is on her, that she has to stand up and do the right thing and not ignore our father," she added
"@ Kensington Royal."
“… Hold you responsible, MEG... "
"Try refreshing your browser, or Megan markel's half sister criticizes her for ignoring her father, calling the royal family an embarrassment. Back in the next video, Samantha even mentions Thomas's recent health scare tweet, if our father dies, I am..."
“… Click here to see other videos of our team. "
"Act like an individualist, act like a woman! "Sorry, this video can't be loaded."
"Enough is enough."
"!" she wrote. "
"Why don't you honor your father?"
"The angry tirade began when Samantha shared an article about Megan and Harry, 36, paying tribute to Nelson Mandela."



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Get a number of extra weeks’ use out of this celeb-authorised staple, then put on it every single day come subsequent fall.”
“Retailers put their winter put on on main sale to allow them to make room for spring stock.”
“You could have reservations about shopping for a winter coat or any chilly-climate piece so late within the season, however truly, it is one of the best time to take action.”
“Extra like snow-bunny robust!”
“Snow-bunny stylish?”
“She layered the jacket with an all-white ensemble, together with a white hoodie, cropped tee and excessive-waist denims.”
“The actress wore the price range-pleasant topper whereas working in Toronto final week (so it is obtained to be fairly cozy).”
“Fortunate for us, Olivia Munn‘s shearling-lined jacket from Ann Taylor is now on sale for $forty eight.88, down from $198.”


"Use it for a few more weeks, and then wear it every day for the next fall."
"Retailers put winter clothes on sale to make room for spring stock."
"At this late time of the season, you may have reservations about buying a winter coat or any cold weather suit, but it's really one of the best times to take action."
"Especially like a snow rabbit!"
"Snow rabbit fashion?"
She dressed her jacket in all white, plus a white Hoodie, a cropped T-shirt and oversized jeans
"In her last week in Toronto, the actress wore a top that was comfortable in price range (so she got quite comfortable treatment),"
"Fortunately, Olivia Munn's wool lined jacket from Ann Taylor is now selling for $48.88, less than $198."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Celebrity kids then and now: See how they've grownNow a father himself, Robin shares three kids, Luca, Mia and Lola, with April Love Geary, as well as a son, Julian, with his ex, Paula Patton.”
“"When I saw the phrase 'On Earth, and in Heaven,' I realized that's what I'm singing about: the people who aren't here and the people who are here that made me who I am."”
“MediaPunch/ShutterstockWhen he announced the album last month, Robin described the new music as, "the sunshine coming out after the rain," according to Billboard.”
“The album trailer that accompanied the announcement suggests the rain was the intense period of years in which the Masked Singer star lost his dad Alan Thicke and his professional mentor Andre Harrell a music industry scion who started out at Def Jam in the 80s served as Motown s...”
“CEO and founded Uptown Records before his death last year...”
“As Robin told fans on social media on Friday, Feb. 5, he had both Andre and his dad in mind when he wrote what became the first track on the new album.”
“"You know that feeling you have when you're all alone but you know that you're not alone," he tweeted, sharing the new track.”
“"That's what 'Lucky Star' is about.”
“That presence in your life that holds you tight, gives you hope, and lights the way," Robin added, naming Alan and Andre as his own "lucky stars."”
“You know that feeling you have when you're all alone but you know that you're not alone.”


"Related reports: then and now celebrity children: look at how they grew up and are now a father. Robin and April love Gehry have three children, Luca, Mia and Lola, and a son, Julian, and his ex boyfriend, Paula button."
"When I saw the phrase" on earth, in heaven, "I realized that this is what I sang: those who are not here and those who are here are me."
Robin described the new music as "sunshine after rain" when he announced the album last month, billboard reported
"The trailer accompanying the album shows that the rain has been a tense period for many years. The masked singer lost his father, Alan hick, and his professional mentor, Andre Harrell, who was a successor in the music industry and began working as a motor city in def jam in the 1980s..."
"CEO, founded Shanghai records company before he died last year..."
On Friday, February 5, Robin told fans on social media that when he wrote the first song of his new album, he thought of Andre and his father
"You know how you feel when you're alone, but you know you're not alone," he tweeted about the new song
"Lucky star is like this."
Robin also said: "in your life, the kind of existence that holds you tight, gives you hope and lights up the road," he called Alan and Andre his "lucky stars."
"You know how it feels when you're alone, but you know you're not alone."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Welch and Jeremy Scott to toast and post about the movement...”
“We were up against the holidays but I said I could do it and the first person I called was my partner in crime Los Angeles jewelry designer Michael Schmidt Phillips and Schmidt who has made custom clothing and jewelry for every pop star under the sun from Madonna to...”
“The hottest accessory on the Golden Globes red carpet on Sunday will be the Time s Up pin expected to be worn by leading ladies and men alike to draw attention to the sexual harassment prevention initiative launched Monday by Shonda Rhimes Reese Witherspoon Emma Stone and other prominent Hollywood...”
“...women...”
“Witherspoon asked costume designer and stylist Arianne Phillips (Kingsman, Nocturnal Animals, W.E.)”
“...to design the pin during a private meeting last month at CAA where the Time’s Up initiative was hatched by studio heads, producers, agents and actresses who split into discussion groups to tackle different aspects of the issue.”
“I was probably one of very few women there who would be considered below the line says Phillips referring to her role as a costume designer she also has worked on fashion projects with Prada Mr Porter and Jeremy Scott over the years and with pop stars Madonna and Lenny...”
“Kravitz on their onstage wardrobe...”
““Reese asked me to come to the actors' group, and told me they were going to be wearing black and would I consider creating a pin for the nominees and male presenters.”
“Miley Cyrus first put their heads together with a few other creatives to design the Time s Up logo then designed the pin and had 500 of them manufactured in the U S A in just two weeks time...”


"Welch and Jeremy Scott toast and post about the movement..."
"We were going to face the holiday, but I said I could do it. The first person I called was my partner in crime in Los Angeles, jewelry designers Michael Schmidt Phillips and Schmidt, who were working for everything from Madonna to "Every pop star of our company has custom-made clothes and jewelry."
"The most popular accessory on the red carpet of the Golden Globes on Sunday will be the time pin, which is expected to be worn by both the hero and heroine to draw attention to the sexual harassment prevention initiative launched on Monday by Shonda Rhimes Reese Witherspoon Emma stone and other Hollywood celebrities..."
“… Women... "
Witherspoon asked Kingsman, we.e., fashion designer and stylist
“…… The pin was designed at a private meeting of CAA last month, where studio directors, producers, agents and actresses launched the time initiative and divided into discussion groups to discuss different aspects of the issue. "
"I'm probably one of the very few women there who are considered to be below the bottom line," Phillips said of his role as a fashion designer. Over the years, she has also been involved in fashion projects with Mr. Prada Porter and Jeremy Scott, as well as pop stars Madonna and Lenny... "
"Krawitz is in the wardrobe on stage..."
"Reese asked me to come to the cast and told me they were going to wear black. Would I consider designing a pin for the nominees and the host?"
"Millie Cyrus first designed the up logo of the times with several other creative people, and then designed the pin. In just two weeks, 500 pieces were made in the United States..."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While Mulder tries to figure out an answer without coming back to alternate universes, he gets a call from Dr.”
“Brilliant.”
“Now Mulder and Scully decide to talk to Reggie together, and we learn his trigger that allowed him to see the falsity of his memory, his “Lost Martian” or his Goop-o ABC.”
“It’s a Jell-o knock-off called Goop-o ABC, which Reggie hands her before yelling “Just prove that I’m real!” Of course, his fingerprints on the box don’t match anyone’s in the system.”
“!”Now it’s Scully’s time to meet with Reggie and learn what her Mandela Effect is.”
“Do you even KNOW ME?!?”
“He rummages through his belongings to find it, leading to the great line when Scully suggests it might be a different series: “Confuse The Twilight Zone with The Outer Limits?!”
“Of course, we know it doesn’t, but Mulder is convinced that he saw it when he was a kid.”
“He knows he’s going to seem crazy, so he gives Mulder a very personal example of the Mandela effect, revealing to him that his favorite episode of The Twilight Zone, “The Lost Martian,” doesn’t really exist.”
“We meet him in full Deep Throat mode, chewing sunflower seeds in a parking garage, having a clandestine meeting with Mulder.”


"When Mulder tried to find out without going back to other universes, he got a call from the doctor."
"Great."
"Now Mulder and Scully have decided to talk to Reggie together. We know his fuse and let him see his false memory, his" lost Martian "or his stupid ABC."
It's a jelly replica called goop-o ABC, and Reggie hands it to her and yells, "prove I'm real! "Of course, the fingerprints on the box don't match anyone in the system."
"!" it's time for Scully to meet Reggie and find out what her Mandela effect is. "
"Do you know me?"
When Scully suggested that it might be a different series, he came up with a great sentence: "confused twilight zone with external restrictions?"
"Of course, we don't know, but Mulder is sure he saw it as a child."
"He knew he was going to look crazy, so he gave Mulder a very personal example of Mandela effect and revealed to him that his favorite Twilight series, the lost Martian, didn't exist."
"We met him in deep throat mode, chewing sunflower seeds in the parking lot, meeting Mulder in secret."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He’s a liar,” she told Deadline.”
“Albert, however, says Kramer is being dishonest about several key aspects of the incident, including the girl’s age.”
“Joel had sex with the 16-year-old girl.”
“Even today, she feels guilty for having left her friend.”She continued, “My sister ended up leaving and she left her friend there with Joel.”
“That’s when my sister left.”
“...this and then began to swim towards them...”
“It wasn t until a month later that I learned of the events that happened that night Albert said Kramer brought the girls back to the hotel to swim and that while the three of them were in the pool he pulled his dick out and said You cannot handle...”
“Unbeknownst to me, my boss, Joel Kramer, had lured the girls to go swimming at the pool in his hotel.”
““That night, after going karting, the stunt department had to leave as we all had early calls the next day.”
“I wanted her to have the experience of having some ‘good clean fun’ in the setting of a professional industry.”


"He's a liar," she told reporters
"However, Albert said Kramer was dishonest about several key aspects of the incident, including the age of the girl."
"Joel had sex with that 16-year-old girl."
"Even today, she still feels guilty about leaving her friends." She went on, "my sister finally left, and she left her friends there with Joel."
"Then my sister left."
“… And start swimming towards them... "
"I didn't know what happened that night until a month later. Albert said Kramer took the girls back to the hotel to swim. When the three of them were in the swimming pool, he pulled out the second one and said," you can't manage... "
"Without my knowledge, my boss, Joel Kramer, lured girls to swim in his hotel pool."
"That night, after driving the go kart, the special effects department had to leave because we had a call in advance the next day."
"I want her to have some 'clean and happy' experience in a professional background."



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Grande broke down in tears while closing out the show with a cover of “Somewhere Over the Rainbow.” The concert raised more than $13 million.”
“Justin Bieber, Miley Cyrus, Niall Horan, Katy Perry, Robbie Williams and Coldplay were among the many artists who took the stage.”
“Grande hosted a televised benefit concert titled One Love Manchester in June 2017 in honor of the victims and families affected by the bombing.”
“And hopefully it will be a fitting remembrance and recognition of what happened, which was so terrible.”Former Oasis frontman Liam Gallagher is rumored to step in for the pop star during the tribute.”
““I can’t say any more than that but people should tune in and watch.”
““Unfortunately she was not able to travel on doctor’s orders, she’s not well, and I can say that there will be something tonight,” he continued.”
““We think it’s really important to recognize that terrible atrocity and the impact on so many lives, so I can confirm we did have Ariana Grande lined up to make a performance tonight,” Brit Awards chief executive Geoff Taylor told the BBC.”
“The “One Last Time” singer, 24, was scheduled to perform a surprise tribute to the 22 people who were killed in a terror attack at her May 2017 concert at Manchester Arena.”
““Ariana fell ill and was going to come in spite of that, but was ordered by her doctor to not fly,” a source tells Us Weekly.”
“Ariana Grande was forced to pull out of her performance at the 2018 Brit Awards in London on Wednesday, February 21, due to an illness.”


Grande ended the show with tears streaming down his face with "somewhere on the rainbow" as the cover. The concert raised more than $13 million
Justin Bieber, Millie Cyrus, Neil Holland, Katie Perry, Robbie Williams and Coldplay are all on the stage
"Grand held a TV charity concert called" one love Manchester "in June 2017 to commemorate the victims and their families affected by the explosion."
"Hopefully it will be a fitting occasion to commemorate and acknowledge what happened, which is so terrible." Former oasis forward Liam Gallagher is said to replace the pop star at the memorial
"I can't say it anymore, but people should watch it."
"Unfortunately, she can't travel according to the doctor's instructions. She's not in good health. I can say something will happen tonight," he continued
"We think it's very important to recognize this terrible atrocity and its impact on many lives, so I can confirm that we did arrange Ariana grand's performance tonight," Jeff Taylor, chief executive of the awards, told the BBC
"The 24 year old 'last' singer was scheduled to perform a surprise memorial service for 22 people killed in the terrorist attacks at a concert at the Manchester arena in May 2017."
"Ariana is ill, she will come anyway, but the doctor ordered her not to fly," a source told us
"On Wednesday, February 21, at the 2018 British awards in London, Ariana Grande was forced out of the show because of illness."



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“Please attempt to sign up again.”
“Although Jenner and rapper Travis Scott welcomed the baby, their first child, on February 1, PEOPLE reports, Jenner waited nearly a week to post her first photo of the new addition to their family: a close-up shot of the baby clutching her finger.”
“In 2017, the title of most-liked photo on Instagram went to Beyoncé, whose surprise pregnancy announcement of her twins Rumi and Sir Carter took the top spot, much to the delight of the Internet.”
“As of February 2018, it had garnered 11.2 million likes.”
“See Kylie’s Instagram post below.”
“Get The Brief.”
“Sign up to receive the top stories you need to know right now.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“* The request timed out and you did not successfully sign up.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
"Please try to register again."
Although Jenner and rapper Travis Scott ushered in their first child on February 1, Jenner waited nearly a week to release the first picture of their new family member: a close-up of a baby clenching her fingers, people reported
"In 2017, the title of the most popular photo on instagram was Beyonce, and the news that her twins rummy and Sir Carter unexpectedly announced their pregnancy topped the list, which made the Internet very happy."
"As of February 2018, it had 11.2 million likes."
"Check out Kelly's instagram post below."
"Get the briefing."
"Sign up now to receive the top stories you need to know."
Please enter a valid email address
"* the request timed out. You did not register successfully."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Adidas CEO Speaks Out About Kanye West’s Controversial Slavery CommentsKanye West Gets Candid on Nike, Twitter & Politics in New InterviewKim Kardashian Throws Chrissy Teigen Surprise Baby Shower...”
“The year prior, the couple rocked his-and-hers custom Roberto Cavalli by Peter Dundas gear.”
“A lot has happened since Kim Kardashian and Kanye West’s Met Gala red carpet debut together in 2013.”
“Babies have been born, the rapper signed a major deal with Adidas, thus causing Yeezy to grow exponentially, the reality star founded KKW Beauty, and that just seems to scratch the surface.”
“Last year Kardashian walked solo on the carpet, and that might be a possibility again at the forthcoming soiree on Monday.”
“FN is taking a look back at the couple’s bold looks from the fashion gala through the years.”
“In 2016, the duo dressed in head-turning futuristic Balmain ensembles for the event, which was themed “Manus x Machina: Fashion in an Age of Technology.”Kanye West and Kim Kardashian wore Balmain to the 2016 Met Gala.”
“Kim paired her dress with Tom Ford heels.”
“CREDIT: REX Shutterstock.”
“Watch on FNThe “Life of Pablo” artist donned an oversized bling-embellished trucker jacket from the French fashion house, ripped Fear of God Jeans and suede tan Saint Laurent boots complete with light blue contact lenses.”


"Adidas CEO speaks frankly about Kanye West's controversial comments on slavery. Kanye West speaks frankly about Nike, twitter and politics in a new interview. Kim Kardashian holds a surprise baby shower for Chris tegan..."
"The year before last, the couple shook his and her custom Roberto Cavalli gears by Peter Dundas."
"A lot has happened since Kardashian and Kanye West made their debut on the red carpet at the metropolitan event in 2013."
"The baby has been born, the rapper has signed a major agreement with Adidas, which has doubled yeezy's growth, and the reality TV star has founded kkw beauty, which seems to be only a superficial phenomenon."
"Last year, Kardashian walked on the carpet alone, which may reappear at the coming party on Monday."
"FN is looking back on the couple's bold looks at fashion parties over the years."
"In 2016, the pair wore" manus X " Machina:Fashion In  Balmain ensemble with the theme of "a age of technology". Kanye West and Kim Kardashian attended the 2016 metropolitan celebration in Balmain. "
"Kim matched her skirt with Tom Ford's high heels."
"L / C: Rex stuttstock."
The artist who watched "Pablo's life" put on an oversized Blazer truck driver's jacket from a French fashion house, and suede Brown Saint Laurent boots with torn jeans of God's fear and light blue contact lenses



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That's probably for the best, as there's a good chance Federer would've shot the idea down if he knew he was going to be asked if he was a vampire just minutes after a match.”
“Ferrell also brought up another recent stunt he pulled at the Australian Open, and informed the audience that tennis legend Roger Federer had no idea Ferrell was going to interview him after the match.”
“It's not the only time a website has been created for a Will Ferrell related bit, as the actor later shared with Fallon the same thing was done for his fictional character that hosted the Rose Parade on Amazon.”
“It's a fair amount of work to put into such a short but funny sketch on The Tonight Show, but totally worth it.”


"It's probably the best, because if Federer knows that he's a vampire just minutes after the game, he'll probably veto the idea."
"Ferrer also mentioned another of his recent stunts at the Australian Open and told the audience that tennis legend Federer didn't know Ferrer would interview him after the game."
"This is not the only time that a website has been created for Will Ferrell's related films, because the actor later shared with Fallon what he did with his fictional role in hosting the rose parade on Amazon."
"It's a lot of work to do such a short and interesting sketch on the tonight show, but it's totally worth it."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mike was then live-in partner of June.”
“After TCL’s show ‘Here Comes Honey Boo Boo’ got canceled, June and Mike Thompson were approached.”
“At that point in time, she gave birth to her first child, Anna.”
“June Shannon left school when she was 15 years old.”
“Last live-in mate was Mike Thompson who publicly revealed his infidelities leading to separation in 2016.”
“Personal Life: Affair, Boyfriend, Husband, KidsThroughout her life, June Shannon was seriously involved with four men who fathered one child with her.”
“Though, she is 5 feet 4 inches tall, she weighs about 75 kg.”
“Age, Height, Weight & Body MeasurementMama June’s age is 41 years old as of today’s date 7th February 2021 having been born on 10 August 1979.”
“When June was two years old, her parents divorced.”
“She has a sister named Joanne aka Doe Doe.”


"Mike was June's cohabiting partner at the time."
"Joan and Mike Thompson were contacted after the cancellation of TCL's show" dear baby is here. "
"At that time, she had her first child, Anna."
"Joan Shannon left school when she was 15."
"The last cohabitant was Mike Thompson, who publicly disclosed the infidelity that led to the separation in 2016."
Personal life: extramarital affairs, boyfriends, husbands, children in her life, Joan Shannon had a serious relationship with four men who had a child with her
"But she's five feet four inches tall and weighs about 75 kilograms."
"Age, height, weight and body measurements mother's age in June is 41, as of today, February 7, 2021, born on August 10, 1979."
"When Joan was two, her parents divorced."
"She has a sister named Joanne, also known as doe."



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Main cast [ edit ]Recurring cast [ edit ]Guest stars [ edit ]Episodes [ edit ]Ratings [ edit ]”
“Renee Young; who joined the cast of Total Divas in season 6.”
“Maryse; who joined the cast of Total Divas in season 6.”
“Lana; who joined the cast of Total Divas in season 6.”
“[9]Cast [ edit ]Naomi; who rejoined the main cast in season 6.”
“[8]On July 7, TJ, Nattie's husband, confirmed via Twitter that he would not be appearing on the upcoming season of Total Divas.”
“Network with a fall premiere date and the majority of last season's cast returning, along with Naomi returning as a series regular and Renee Young, Lana, and Maryse replacing Rosa Mendes, Alicia Fox, and Mandy Rose.”
“[7]Production [ edit ]Season 6 was officially confirmed on April 18, 2016, by the E!”
“[3][4][5][6] Season 5 ended on April 19, 2016 (2016-04-19) with 625 thousand viewers.”
“Behind the scene footage of the Divas is also included.”


"Main actor [editor] regular actor [editor] guest star [editor] drama [editor] ratings [editor]"
"Renee young; she joined total divas in season 6."
"Maryse; joined the total divas cast in season 6."
"Lana; she joined the queen in season six."
"[9] cast [editor] Naomi; he rejoined the main cast in season 6."
"On July 7, Nadi's husband TJ confirmed through Twitter that he would not be in the upcoming total divas season."
"The network will premiere in the fall, most of the actors of last season will return, Naomi will return as a regular in the series, and Renee young, Lana and Maris will replace Rosa Mendes, Alicia Fox and Mandy Ross."
"[7] production [Edit] Season 6 on April 18, 2016 by E!"
"The fifth season of [3] [4] [5] [6] ended on April 19, 2016 (April 19, 2016), with a total audience of 625000."
"Behind the scenes scenes scenes of Tian Tian are also included."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From: Harper’s BAZAAR AU”
“Here are eight handbags that celebrities love.”
“And we’re not talking classic classics like the Hermès Birkin or the Chanel 2.55.”
“Just like their approach to footwear, there are a handful of handbag styles that celebrities wear on high rotation.”
“But they don’t.”
“Celebrities have it slightly easier – working with multi-million dollar salaries they can afford to swap out handbags on a day-to-day basis.”
“Ask any fashion industry veteran and they will tell you that when they started out (and couldn’t afford a wardrobe full of designer threads), they trusted a great bag and a classic pair of designer heels to elevate their outfits.”
“It’s a well-known fashion idiom that shoes and a handbag are the cornerstone to any good ensemble.”


"From Harper market"
"Here are eight popular handbags."
"We're not talking about classics like Hermes Perkin or chanel 2.55."
"Just like their attitude towards shoes, celebrities will wear some handbag styles when they are in high rotation."
"But they didn't."
"The jobs of celebrities are a little easier - they're making millions of dollars and they can afford a handbag every day."
"Ask any fashion veteran and they'll tell you that when they first started (they couldn't afford a wardrobe full of designer designs), they believed that a great bag and a pair of classic designer heels could improve their clothes."
"Shoes and handbags are the foundation of any good combination, which is a well-known fashion idiom."



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A healthy approach to eating is centered on savoring flavor, eating to satisfaction, and increasing energy, rather than focusing on weight.”
“Check your food ’tudeWhat we eat and how we feel are linked in very complex ways.”
“This includes improving eyesight, normalizing blood pressure, improving lean muscle, lowering cholesterol, and improving bone density.”
“Exercise dailyDid you know that daily exercise can reduce all of the biomarkers of aging?”
“4.”
“A "5 meal ideal" will help you manage your weight, keep your cool, maintain your focus, and avoid cravings.”
“Set a “5-meal ideal”What, when, and how much you eat can keep both your metabolism and your energy levels steadily elevated, so you’ll have more all-day energy.”
“3.”
“And many of the most powerful phytonutrients are the ones with the boldest colors — such as broccoli, cabbage, carrots, tomatoes, grapes, and leafy greens.”
“A diet high in vegetables is associated with a reduced risk of developing cancers of the lung, colon, breast, cervix, esophagus, stomach, bladder, pancreas, and ovaries.”


"A healthy diet is centered on tasting, eating well and increasing energy, not on weight."
"Checking your food, what we eat and how we feel are linked in a very complex way."
These include improving vision, normalizing blood pressure, improving lean muscle, lowering cholesterol and increasing bone mineral density
Do you know that daily exercise can reduce all the biomarkers of aging? "
“4.”
"The ideal five meals" can help you control your weight, stay cool, stay focused and avoid appetite
"Set a" five meal ideal "- what you eat, when and how much you eat can keep your metabolism and energy level rising steadily, so that you can have more energy in a day."
“3.”
Many of the most effective plant nutrients are brightly colored, such as broccoli, cabbage, carrots, tomatoes, grapes and green leafy vegetables
Eating more vegetables can reduce the risk of lung cancer, colon cancer, breast cancer, cervical cancer, esophageal cancer, gastric cancer, bladder cancer, pancreatic cancer and ovarian cancer



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m gonna get there.””
““But do you know what I’m trying to say?”
“Story continues below advertisement“And I know that sometimes it feels publicly like I’m dragging cement blocks, but like, the pyramids were made out of cement blocks — or not cement,” she adds.”
““It’s a departure, and it’s a necessary evolution that I have to take,” she says of her new direction.”
“Katy Perry changes Taylor Swift Swish Swish lyric tears her pants during livestream concert She describes her new album Witness as being perfectly reflective of where she s at now...”
“I literally know nothing Yet reacting to the constant stream of social media criticism she says can be a maddening game adding They want you to stand for something but once you do and if you don t do it perfectly they re ready to take you right down RELATED”
““So I stand here today, more so than any other day, saying I know nothing.”
““Every day when I think I know something, the universe shows me that I need to learn another lesson,” she says.”
“That evolution, she says, is constant and ongoing.”
“And amazing and beautiful and horrible all at the same time,” pointing out that Perry now, she explains, is simply the result of her own personal evolution over the years.”


"I'm going there."
"But do you know what I want to say?"
She added: "the story under the ads goes on, and I know that sometimes the public thinks I'm dragging mud, but the pyramids are made of cement, or not cement."
"It's a departure and a necessary evolution that I have to take," she said of her new direction
"Katie Perry changed Taylor Swift swish lyrics to tears in her pants at the livestream concert, and she described her new album witness as a perfect reflection of her current position..."
"I really don't know how to respond to the constant criticism of social media, she said it could be a maddening game, adding that they want you to stick to something, but once you do it, if you don't do it perfectly, they are ready to take you down."
"So I'm standing here today more than ever, saying I don't know anything."
"Every day when I feel like I know something, the universe tells me I need to learn another lesson," she said
"This evolution, she said, is ongoing."
What Perry is doing, she explains, is the result of her own personal evolution over the years



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“...const FP = tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's what I'd like to know. What I'd like to know before I buy my first book is that it's famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers."
“… Const FP = tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Experts who have learned a lot from the whole process of purchasing my first house have acquired the skill of starting a side push. "



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“IG about betrayal and an unnamed person who she feels stabbed her in the back It s that type of impulsive behavior and lack of self control that is why she is off the show the source said...”
“For the record Warner Bros wanted to work out an exit agreement with Braxton that wouldn t make viewers aware she was being fired but before they could hammer out a joint statement and an agreement that was good for both parties Tamar had already posted that cryptic message on...”
“The fire was the firing of popular co host Tamar Braxton for basically five major reasons including On set tantrums p ssing off sponsors and a focus group that revealed Tamar s aggressive eye rolling and mouth smacking turned off educated women viewers as they are indicative of behavior African...”
“American women have worked years to overcome Executives of The Real reportedly fired Tamar from The Real for three real reasons Negative feedback on her ghetto persona received from focus groups of the daytime talk show On set insubordination Advertiser complaints The show s sales team made it clear that...”
“...advertisers did not want her in their segments due to her antics and lack of cooperation...”
“On Saturday, May 21, Braxton and her co-hosts (Adrienne Bailon, Jeannie Mai, Loni Love and Tamara Mowry) all got phone calls from the show’s parent company Telepictures/Warner Bros. to inform the group that the popular talk show would be moving forward without Braxton.”
“Braxton was blindsided by the news, as were all of her co-hosts.”
““Everyone was caught off guard.”
“None of them saw it coming and everyone was completely blindsided by the decision,” a source close to production tells Daily Mail Online.”
“The cast was also taken aback because, as Loni Love stated in her video response, all five cast members had just completed a new photo shoot for images that were supposed to be used to promote their upcoming third season.”


"About betrayal and an unknown person, she felt that she was stabbed in the back. It was that kind of impulsive behavior and lack of self-control. That's why she left the source of the program and said
"For the record industry, Warner Bros. wants to reach an exit agreement with Braxton, not to let the audience know that she is fired, but before they finalize a joint statement and a mutually beneficial agreement, Tamar has been The secret message was posted on the Internet
"The fire was caused by the popular co host Tamar Braxton Braxton) was fired for five main reasons, including a tantrum on the set, rejection of sponsors and a focus group, which revealed that Tamar's aggressive rolling eyes and slapping mouth disgusted the educated female audience because they were symbols of African behavior... "
"It is reported that American women have been working hard to overcome real for many years, and senior executives fired real for three real reasons. The focus group of the daytime talk show gave negative feedback on her image in the ghetto, and the sales team of the show made it clear that... "
“… Advertisers don't want her in their segment because of her antics and lack of cooperation... "
"On Saturday, May 21, Braxton and her co hosts (Adrian Byron, Jenny may, love and Tamara Murray) received a call from the show's parent company, Telepictures / Warner Bros., informing the group that without Braxton, the hit talk show will continue to move forward."
"Braxton was stunned by the news, as were all her co hosts."
"Everyone was caught off guard."
"None of them expected this to happen, and everyone was completely blinded by the decision," a source close to the production department told the Daily Mail Online
"The crew was also surprised because, as Ronnie love said in the video reply, all five crew members have just finished taking new photos, which should be used to promote their upcoming third season."



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As the couple sped off, the photographers out front got tipped off about the escape, quickly catching up on their motorcycles.”
“The couple did get away, but what happened next was the subject of lengthy investigations and conspiracy theories that live on today.”
“She sneaked a call to Richard Kay a friend who covered the Royals for the Daily Mail and told him as he later wrote she had decided to radically change her life Diana had decided that starting that weekend she would withdraw from public life and wrap up her obligations...”
“The princess knew it.”
“That Saturday — Aug. 30, 1997 — promised to be a moment of change.”
“The tabloid attention on them was intense.”
“Diana was the mother of the future King of England and the most photographed woman in the world.”
““They were always laughing, holding hands.”ADFayed, the son of Harrod’s department store owner Mohamed Al-Fayed, was a rich playboy.”
“AD“They were in a good mood,” his butler remembered later.”
“She and Fayed sipped their coffee, marveling at the breathtaking Emerald Coast in Sardinia.”


"As the couple sped away, the photographer in front got the news of their escape and soon caught up with their motorcycle."
"The couple did escape, but what happened next was the subject of a long-term investigation and conspiracy theory, which is still circulating today."
"She secretly called Richard Kay, a friend of the royal family reported by the daily mail. When he later wrote to him, he told him that she had decided to completely change her life. Diana decided that from that weekend, she would quit public life and end her obligations..."
"The princess knows."
"That Saturday - August 30, 1997 - promises to be a time for change."
"The tabloids are very concerned about them."
"Diana is the mother of the future king of England and the most photographed woman in the world."
Adefayed, the son of Mohamed Fayed, the owner of Harold's department store, is a rich playboy
"They were in a good mood," his housekeeper later recalled
"She and Fayed sipped coffee and marveled at Sardinia's stunning Emerald Coast."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“...to Protest Harassment at Golden Globes Exclusive This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“Hear more on Time s Up and everything we know about the awards show so far in the video below Additional reporting by Angelique Jackson Reese Witherspoon Is Responsible For the Time s Up Pin Everyone Will Be Wearing at the Golden Globes Saoirse Ronan on the Plan in Place...”
“Hosted by Seth Meyers, the Golden Globes will broadcast live from The Beverly Hilton in Beverly Hills, California, on Sunday at 8 p.m. ET/5 p.m. PT on NBC.”
“"That's not what this moment is about."”
“"This time the industry can't expect us to go up and twirl around," she added.”
“"For years, we've sold these awards shows as women, with our gowns and colors and our beautiful faces and our glamour."”
“"This is a moment of solidarity, not a fashion moment," Longoria explained to The New York Times.”
“Additionally, expect to see a lot of black on the red carpet, in protest of sexual harassment and misconduct in Hollywood, and everyone wearing the official "Time's Up" pin, created by Nocturnal Animals costume designer and stylist Arianne Phillips.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
“… To protest the harassment of exclusive Golden Globe Awards, this video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's message... "
"Please learn more about the award ceremony in the video below. Angelique Jackson Reese Witherspoon's supplementary report will be responsible for the time pin everyone wears at the Golden Globe Awards ceremony
"The Golden Globe Awards ceremony, hosted by Seth Meyers, will be broadcast live on NBC from Beverly Hilton in Beverly Hills, California, at 8:00 p.m. EST / 5:00 p.m. Pacific time on Sunday."
"This is not the moment."
"This time, the industry can't expect us to go around," she added
"For many years, we have been selling these awards programs as women, our dresses, colors, beautiful faces and glamour."
"It's a time of unity, not fashion," Longoria explained to the New York Times
"In addition, a lot of black is expected to appear on the red carpet to protest against sexual harassment and misconduct in Hollywood, and everyone will wear the official 'time is up' badge designed by night animal costume designer and stylist Arianne Phillips."



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Before Superstore, Santos — who was born in Manila, Philippines — spent years rounding the stand-up circuit, eventually making appearances on Chelsea Lately.”
“The NBC comedy, which also stars America Ferrera, premiered in 2015.”
“Oh, haaayyy @nicosantos"Zeke Smith and Nico Santos have made their relationship social media official.”
“The couple — Smith of Survivor fame and Santos, an actor on Superstore — have been sharing photos together on their respective Instagram accounts over the past few weeks.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Monday, Smith, 30, confirmed their pairing on Twitter, writing, “I guess everybody knows about my hot little 25 year-old boyfriend now.”
“Oh, haaayyy @nicosantos.”Santos, meanwhile, was all jokes on the social media site — writing to a news outlet reporting on their relationship, “Stop spreading lies!”
“I am NOT, I repeat, NOT…25!”Photos of Smith and Santos first surfaced online in April when the two attend the 29th Annual GLAAD Media Awards’ Hyundai afterparty at the Beverly Hilton Hotel in Beverly Hills, California.”
“Image zoom Nico Santos and Zeke Smith | Credit: Vivien Killilea/GettyWhile in the Big Apple in May, the two saw the acclaimed Broadway musical SpongeBob SquarePants — Santos sharing a photo of the two holding hands at the Palace Theater.”
““Here with this handsome fella,” he wrote.”


"Before the superstar appeared, Santos, born in Manila, Philippines, spent several years on the reserve track and finally made his debut at Chelsea
NBC comedy Ferreira also premiered in 2015
"Oh, haaayyy@nicosantos ”Zeke Smith and Nico Santos made their relationship public on social media
"The couple - Smith of survivor fame and Santos of superstore - have been sharing photos on their respective instagram accounts for the past few weeks."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
On Monday, 30-year-old Smith confirmed their match on twitter, writing: "I think everyone now knows my sexy 25-year-old boyfriend."
"Oh, haaayyy@nicosantos 。” Meanwhile, Santos is full of jokes on social media sites - writing to a news agency that reports on their relationship and saying, "stop spreading lies!"
"I'm not, I repeat, not 25 years old! "Photos of Smith and Santos first appeared online in April, when they attended the Hyundai Motor after party at the 29th GLAAD media awards at the Beverly Hilton Hotel in California."
"Image zooming Nico Santos and Zeke Smith | source: Vivien killiea / gettyle in May this year, they watched the popular Broadway musical spongeb in the big apple Square pants) - Santos shared the two hands at the Palace Theatre
"With this handsome guy," he wrote



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...fall off...”
“If you try to insult your skin one more time now while it s healing there s a high possibility that if you let one of these doctors touch your nose now this will turn black and then die and...”
“Ken doll is at risk of losing it altogether...”
“Alves, 33, can no longer breathe through his nose, and it’s so severely damaged that he heads to the Botched doctors for help on Sunday’s episode.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“His nostrils are so small and after what he s gone through with the MRSA this is probably one of the worst results and complications that I ve seen in my entire career Dr Paul Nassif says in this exclusive...”
“...clip...”
““The issue is that what we call the ‘soft tissue envelope,’ that’s the skin.”
“So by you having three surgeries in a time of 12 to 15 months, you destroyed your tissue,” Dr. Nassif tells Alves as Dr. Terry Dubrow looks on.”
““The skin’s no good.”Dr. Nassif was unable to properly examine Alves’ nostrils, because there was no space to fit an otoscope.”


“… Fall off... "
"If you try to insult your skin when it heals now, it's very likely that if you let one of these doctors touch your nose now, your nose will turn black, then die, and then..."
"Ken Doyle is in danger of losing it completely..."
"Alves, 33, can no longer breathe with his nose, and his nose has been seriously damaged. He asked the poor doctor for help on Sunday's show."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"His nostrils are too small, and after treatment with methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus (MRSA), it's probably one of the worst outcomes and complications I've seen in my entire career," Dr. Paul nasif said in this exclusive report
“… Clip
"The problem is that what we call the" soft tissue capsule "is the skin."
"So, after three surgeries in 12 to 15 months, your tissue is destroyed," Dr. nasif told Alves under the gaze of Dr. Terry dubro
"Bad skin." Dr. nasif was unable to examine Alves' nostrils properly because there was not enough room to install an otoscope



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You want to be happy, you want your kid to be happy and you want everyone in your life to be healthy and happy.”For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“Us Weekly exclusively confirmed in September that the O.C.”
“Rachel Bilson purchased a $3.25 million mansion in the affluent Linda Vista neighborhood of Pasadena, California, after her split from Hayden Christensen.”
“The six-bedroom, four-bathroom home, known as “Ralph’s House,” was built in 1950 and designed by Gregory Ain, according to Trulia.”
“The single-level property measures 3678-square-feet and features floor-to-ceiling windows for natural light and refurbished wood floors.”
“The spacious living room has a cozy fireplace, built-in bookshelves and paneled walls that conceal a stereo system and wet bar.”
“The galley kitchen has also been renovated with new appliances and improvements to the original cabinetry.”
“A sliding glass door leads outside to a stunning backyard that boasts rolling gardens, an open-air courtyard, a swimming pool, a dry rock stream and a deck that overlooks the city’s nearby canyons and mountaintops.”
“Bilson and Christensen, both 36, previously lived in a four-bedroom and four-and-a-half-bathroom home in Sherman Oaks, California.”
“...alum and the Star Wars actor, who share 2-year-old daughter Briar Rose, called it quits after nearly 10 years together.”


"You want to be happy, you want your children to be happy, you want everyone in your life to be healthy and happy." For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to us weekly's YouTube page
"US weekly confirmed exclusively in September, O.C."
"After breaking up with Hayden Christensen, Rachel Bilson bought a $3.25 million mansion in the affluent Linda Vista community of Pasadena, California."
Trullia said the six room, four room house, known as the Ralph house, was built in 1950 and designed by Gregory ayne
"This single story 3678 square foot building has floor to ceiling windows with natural lighting and refurbished wood floors."
The spacious living room has a cozy fireplace, built-in bookshelves and paneled walls with hidden stereo systems and bars
"The kitchen has also been decorated with new appliances and improved cabinets."
A sliding glass door leads to an amazing backyard with a rolling garden, an open-air courtyard, a swimming pool, a dry rock flow and a deck overlooking the canyons and peaks near the city
"Bilson and Christensen are both 36 years old and used to live in a four bedroom, four and a half bathroom home in Sherman oak, California."
“…… Alum and Star Wars hero, a 2-year-old daughter, Briar Rose, announced their separation after nearly 10 years together



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.)”
“All Rights Reserved.”
“The former first lady tweeted Sunday that the book, to come out a week after the 2018 midterm elections, is called “Becoming.”“Writing ‘Becoming’ has been a deeply personal experience,” she said in a statement.”
““It has allowed me, for the very first time, the space to honestly reflect on the unexpected trajectory of my life.”
“In this book, I talk about my roots and how a little girl from the South Side of Chicago found her voice and developed the strength to use it to empower others.”
“I hope my journey inspires readers to find the courage to become whoever they aspire to be.”
“I can’t wait to share my story.”Writing BECOMING has been a deeply personal experience.”
“I talk about my roots and how a girl from the South Side found her voice.”
“I can't wait to share my story.”


This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.)
"All rights reserved."
"The former first lady tweeted on Sunday that the book will be published one week after the mid-term elections in 2018, entitled" to be. " "Writing to be is a profound personal experience," she said in a statement
"It's the first time I've had the opportunity to honestly reflect on the unexpected trajectory of my life."
"In this book, I talk about my roots and how a little girl from South Chicago found her voice and developed the power to empower others with it."
"I hope my journey will inspire readers to find the courage to be what they want to be."
"I can't wait to share my story." Writing has become a profound personal experience
"I talk about my roots and how a girl from the South found her voice."
"I can't wait to share my story."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Donations may be made to Restoration Ministries’ Nelsan Ellis Foundation.”
“In addition to his fan-favorite role as Lafayette Reynolds on HBO’s “True Blood,” he also appeared in “The Soloist,” “The Butler,” “Elementary,” and “The Help.”Ellis is survived by his grandmother, his father, and his son, Breon, as well as seven siblings.”
“After joining the Marines for a short period of time, he studied at Illinois State University and went on to get a degree from Juilliard School.”
“The actor was born in Harvey, Ill., and lived in Alabama with his aunt and siblings before moving back to Chicago at age 15.”
“His family issued a statement attributing the heart failure to longtime alcohol and drug abuse.”
“...heart failure complications at age 39”
“Prior to the funeral there will be a public viewing on Friday July 21 from 6 p m to 9 p m at Leak Sons Funeral Home in Country Club Hills Ill Pastor Tyrone Gaston will officiate Saturday s service starting at 11 a m Ellis died July 8 from...”
“A public funeral for “True Blood” star Nelsan Ellis will be held on Saturday, July 22 at Holy Temple Cathedral in Harvey, Ill., a suburb south of Chicago.”


"The donation may go to the Nelson Ellis foundation in the Department of restoration."
In addition to playing Rafael Reynolds in HBO's true blood, he also starred in soloist, housekeeper, elementary school and help. Ellis's grandmother, father, son Brian and seven brothers and sisters all survived
After joining the Marine Corps for a short time, he studied at Illinois State University and earned a degree at Julia college
Born in Harvey, Illinois, the actor moved back to Chicago when he was 15 and lived in Alabama with his aunt, brothers and sisters
"His family issued a statement attributing heart failure to chronic alcohol and drug abuse."
“… Complications of heart failure at 39 years of age
"Before the funeral, the public will watch the ceremony from 6:00 p.m. to 9:00 p.m. on July 21 (Friday) at lexen funeral home in Country Club Hill, Illinois. Pastor tyron Gaston will preside over the ceremony on Saturday. The ceremony starts at 11:00 a.m. and Ellis died on July 8..."
On Saturday, July 22, in Harvey, Illinois, the temple Cathedral in the southern suburb of Chicago will hold a public funeral for Nathan Ellis, the star of true blood



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more on the singer, watch the video below.”
“WATCH: Demi Lovato Opens Up About Her Sobriety: I Know 'My Life Depends On It'Lovato has been sober for five years.”
“"I knew that I had a lot of life ahead of me but one of the main reasons of getting sober was so that I could be around my little sister because my [mom] and dad [said I couldn't be around her] if I was doing stuff," she said.”
“Lovato has always been very close to her family, especially her little sister, Madison de la Garza.”
“"This time I knew… I had hit rock bottom and I just needed to do this for myself," the "Stone Cold" singer continued.”
“"That was the moment when I thought, ‘OK I really need to get help and get sober.'"”
“WATCH: Demi Lovato Claps Back After Being Criticized for Not Disclosing Her Sexuality"The final one, everyone was like, 'We are no longer going to leave, we are leaving,'" she said.”
“The "Sorry Not Sorry" singer said that it took multiple attempts by her family for her to realize just how bad her addiction was.”
“During an interview on The Jonathan Ross Show on Thursday, the 25-year-old singer recalled the final intervention her family held before she finally hit "rock bottom" and decided to get sober.”
“Demi Lovato hopes her story will help others.”


"For more information about the singer, watch the video below."
"Observation: Demi Lovato reveals her lucidity: I know 'my life depends on it', and Lovato has been awake for five years."
"I know I still have a lot of life to live, but one of the main reasons to stop drinking is that I can be with my sister because I (MOM) and Dad (say I can't be with her) if I'm working," she said
"Lovato has always been close to her family, especially her sister Madison dragarza."
"This time I know I've fallen to the bottom, and I just need to do that for myself, "continued the" cold rock "singer
"At that moment, I thought," well, I really need help. Wake up. "
"Watch: Demi Lovato clapped back after being criticized for not revealing her sexuality," she said. "For the last time, everyone said," we're never going to leave again, we're going to leave. "
The "I'm sorry, I'm not sorry" singer said her family had tried many times to make her aware of how serious her addiction was
"In an interview on Thursday's Jonathan Ross show, the 25-year-old singer recalled the last intervention by her family before she finally fell to the bottom and decided to quit drinking."
"Demi Lovato wants her story to help others."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and long bus trips to other districts for jobs are somehow considered acceptable...”
“She added that she knows her political positions have often been labeled as controversial but the real controversy is how decades of government corruption and political disempowerment have created a system where skyrocketing home prices dirty needles in the streets...”
“Actress and former Fox News commentator Stacey Dash will withdraw from her congressional race just one month after filing the necessary paperwork to run as a Republican in California's 44th District.”
“Insiders told The Hollywood Reporter on Friday that her decision was partially based on fear she had for the safety of her family.”
“"There were too many threats against her and her family.”
“It was overwhelming," said one person close to her campaign.”
“Dash perhaps best known for her role as Dionne in the 1995 comedy Clueless was a Democrat who voted for President Barack Obama in 2008 though by 2012 she had switched parties and she has been controversial at least among...”
“...liberals practically ever since...”
“In 2016, for example, she criticized feminists for not allowing men to "be masculine" and she criticized the notion of transgender people choosing which public restroom to use, calling it a "tyranny by the minority."”
“Dash a black and Hispanic woman also criticized the BET Awards and Black History Month opinions that led to an appearance at the 2016 Oscars where Chris Rock jokingly introduced her to a baffled audience as the new director of...”


“…… To some extent, it is considered acceptable to take a long-distance bus to find a job in other areas... "
"She added that she knows her political stance is often labeled controversial, but what is really controversial is how decades of government corruption and the loss of political power have created a system of soaring house prices and dirty needles in the streets..."
"Actress and former fox news commentator Stacey dash will withdraw from the Congressional race one month after submitting the necessary documents to run for the Republican Party in California's 44th district."
"Insiders told Hollywood Reporter on Friday that her decision was based in part on concerns about the safety of her family."
"There are too many threats to her and her family."
"It's overwhelming," said one person close to her campaign
"Dash's role as Dion in the 1995 comedy incompetence is probably best known as a Democrat who voted for President Barack Obama in 2008, but by 2012, she had changed parties, at least in It's controversial. "
“… Liberals since then
"In 2016, for example, she criticized feminists for not allowing men to be" masculine. "She criticized the idea that transsexuals choose which public toilets to use, calling it" tyranny of a few. "
"A black and Hispanic woman also criticized the bott awards and black history month ideas that led Chris Rock to playfully introduce her as The new director



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The Trust, which offers support services for youth and parents, played an important part in helping the community recover from the devastating blaze.”
“Getty ImagesEarlier this week, Kate Middleton was on Santa duty when she gave out presents to families during her visit to The Rugby Portobello Trust's community centre in North Kensington.”
“It was due to conclude with bereaved family members and survivors leaving together holding white roses.”
“A Green For Grenfell banner adorned with a heart was carried into the cathedral and a pre-recorded sound montage from people from the Grenfell community was played during the service, The Evening Standard reports.”
“St Paul's Cathedral said it had worked with residents to hold a service that "will enable the nation to stand together with those directly affected by the Grenfell Tower fire and together express hopes for the future."”
“Getty ImagesThe memorial was designed to remember those who died and to give thanks for everyone who assisted on the ground at the time of the tragedy and since it.”
“Speaking before the memorial, the Bishop of Kensington, who has worked with the west London community since the fire, said: "I am sure that the presence of the royal family will be a reassurance and support to those at the heart of this service."”
“Prime Minister Theresa May and Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn were among the politicians in attendance.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"The trust provides support services for teenagers and parents and plays an important role in helping communities recover from catastrophic fires."
"This week, Kate Middleton was on duty for Santa Claus and distributing gifts to families when she visited the rugby Portobello trust community center in North Kensington."
"It's because the families of the dead and the survivors left with white roses."
A green grenfeld flag decorated with heart-shaped patterns was carried into the cathedral, with a montage of the pre recorded voice of grenfeld community residents played during the ceremony, the evening news reported
St. Paul's Cathedral said it had held a ceremony in cooperation with local residents, "which will enable people across the country to stand with those directly affected by the grenfelta fire and express their hope for the future."
"Getty Images is a memorial designed to honor those who died and to thank everyone who helped in the area during and after a disaster."
Bishop Kensington, who has been working with the West London community since the fire, said in front of the monument: "I believe that the presence of the royal family will be a kind of comfort and support for the core figures of this ceremony."
"Prime minister Theresa May and Labour leader Jeremy Corbin were politicians present."



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...allegedly failing drug tests and violating his parole...”
“According to a criminal report obtained by PEOPLE witnesses reported that he shouted profanities at crew and passengers including I am going to f kill you The son of Kathy and Rick Hilton was ordered into a substance abuse treatment center in January 2016 for at least 90 days after...”
“LAPD spokesperson Jenny Houser confirmed to PEOPLE that the 23-year-old heir to the Hilton family fortune was arrested early Saturday morning on charges of grand theft auto and violated a restraining order.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“His bail has been set at $60,000, the LAPD told PEOPLE.”
“It is not clear if he has retained an attorney.”
“The youngest brother of Paris, Nicky and Barron Hilton, Conrad had allegedly tried to break into the home of voice actress E.G.”
“Daily, TMZ reports — violating a 2015 restraining order E.G.’s daughter, Hunter Daily Saloman, had against him.”
“Hunter and Conrad had dated previously, but split in 2015.”
“He was arrested in June 2015 for violating the restraining order, after police found him inside Daily’s home.”


“… It is said that he failed the drug test and violated his parole... "
"According to a criminal report obtained by the people's daily, witnesses reported that he yelled at the crew and passengers, including me to kill you, Casey and Rick Hilton's son, in After that, he was ordered to enter the drug abuse treatment center for at least 90 days in January 2016. "
"LAPD spokesman Jenny Houser confirmed that the 23-year-old heiress to the Hilton family property was arrested early Saturday morning on suspicion of car theft and violated a restraining order."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"His bail has been set at $60000, LAPD told people."
"It's not clear if he hired a lawyer."
Conrad, the brother of Paris, Nicky and Baron Hilton, is said to have tried to break into dubbing actress E
"Daily, TMZ reports - violating the 2015 restraining order, such as his daughter, Hunter daily Salman, against him."
"Hunt and Conrad dated before, but broke up in 2015."
"In June 2015, after the police found him in daily's home, he was arrested for violating the prohibition order."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MailOnline has contacted Scott, Bella and Liam's representatives for comment.”
“Through her eyes It s believed the music video is shot from Bella s point of view with Liam playing her conscience But while the Blended actress might be the singer s leading lady for Bedroom Floor s steamy video it s believed his girlfriend Cheryl was his main inspiration...”
“So it's no surprise Liam Payne recruited American actress Bella Thorne to play his love interest in the titilating music video for his sultry second single, Bedroom Floor.”
“If the teaser shots are anything to go by, the 20-year-old actress lives up to her screen siren name as she poses in a racy red frock.”
“Scroll down for video Screen siren Liam Payne recruited American actress Bella Thorne to play his love interest in the titilating music video for his sultry second single Bedroom Floor The Famous In Love star hints at her ample assets in the images slipping into a semi sheer skintight scarlet...”
“...frock...”
“Upping the sex appeal, Bella's signature red tresses are styled into glamorous waves, while her pout is painted an alluring red shade.”
“Bella shoots a seductive stare at the camera in the shots, while Liam gazes broodingly out of shot.”
“Scantily-clad: The former Disney star showcases her toned physique in a skimpy floral bikini and striped trousers in one sexy sceneRed hot!”
“The Famous In Love star hints at her ample assets in the images, slipping into a semi-sheer, skintight scarlet frockAnother image depicts the former Disney star showcasing her toned physique in a skimpy floral bikini and striped trousers.”


"Mailonline has contacted representatives of Scott, Bella and Liam for comments."
"Through her eyes, people believe that this music video is shot from Bella's perspective, Liam plays her conscience, but although the mixed actress may be the singer's heroine in the hot video of bedroom floor, people believe that his girlfriend Cheryl is his main inspiration..."
"So it's no surprise that Liam Penn recruited American actress Bella Thorne to play his sultry second single, bedroom floor, and his interest in music."
"If there's any use to these banter shots, the 20-year-old actress is wearing a lively red dress and putting on a full screen look."
"Scrolling down the video screen, siren Liam Payne recruits American actress Bella Thorne to play his interest in music for his stuffy second floor single bedroom. The famous love Star hints that her rich assets in the image slide into a translucent tight scarlet..."
“… "Robes..."
Bella's signature red hair is designed in a charming wavy shape, while her pout is painted in attractive red shadows, which makes her more sexy
"In the camera, Bella stares at the camera with attractive eyes, while Liam stares thoughtfully out of the camera."
"Ragged: the former Disney star is wearing a slightly laced bikini and striped trousers, displaying her strong physique in a sexy hot pants!"
"The famous love Star hinted at her wealth in the photo, wearing a translucent, tight scarlet dress. Another photo depicts the former Disney star wearing a slightly LACE BIKINI and striped pants, showing her strong physique



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A MAC Cosmetics line inspired by her signature looks was created, once again proving her legacy was alive in 21st century pop culture.”
“The star is a culmination of a busy year for the deceased singer.”
“The ceremony, held on Friday in Hollywood, was attended by hundreds of the late singer’s fans who lined the famed Hollywood Boulevard for hours waiting for the star to be unveiled.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Stars like Eva Longoria and Edward James Olmos (who played Selena’s father, Abraham, in the 1997 film about her life) attended, along with Los Angeles Mayor Eric Garcetti.”
“Image zoom Credit: Michael Tran/FilmMagic via GettyHer family, including her father, sister Suzette, brother A.B., and her widower Chris Perez, were also there.”
““Selena was an angel,” Garcetti said before reporters and fans.”
““While she was taken from us way too early, we now have something permanent that generation after generation after generation can see in the most famous neighborhood anywhere in the world.”Image zoom Selena’s family and band members honored the singer at the Hollywood Walk of Fame.”
“Credit Tommaso Boddi WireImage via Getty Longoria also spoke about the fellow Texan and Dreaming of You singer saying It s beyond humbling to stand here on behalf of a person that I myself owe so much to Tearing up the actress said I promised myself I wasn t going...”
“...to cry Because as Eric said this star isn t only for Selena Longoria continued...”


"The MAC Cosmetics series inspired by her iconic styling is born, proving once again that her legacy still exists in the 21st century pop culture."
"This star is the climax of a busy year for the late singer."
Hundreds of dead fans attended the awards ceremony in Hollywood on Friday. They waited for hours on both sides of the famous Hollywood avenue for the singer to appear
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Stars like Eva Longoria and Edward James Olmos (who played her father Abraham in a 1997 film about Selena's life) attended the wedding, as did the mayor of Los Angeles, Eric gassetti
"Photo zooming credit: Michael tran / movie magic via gettyher's family, including her father, sister Susette, brother A.B. and her widower Chris Peres, are also there."
"Selena is an angel," gasetti said in front of reporters and fans
"Although she left us too early, we now have something permanent that generations can see in the most famous communities in the world." Family and band members of image zoom Selena salute the singer at the Hollywood Walk of fame
"Credit Tommaso boddi WireImage via Getty Longoria also talked about the Texan compatriot. She dreamed of you as a singer and said that it's too humble to stand here for a person who owes so much to me. She said that I promised myself that I would not go..."
“… Crying because Eric said the star wasn't just for Selena Longoria... "



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“These oils are great for soothing the scalp and retaining moisture without building up and clogging your pores like generic braid sprays often will.”
“Instead, opt for natural oils similar to the ones I just mentioned earlier like coconut oil and almond oil.”
“What did you do?”
“She would take one look at my scalp and scold, “Your head is dry!”
“I had a stylist who could tell when I had skipped a few days of wearing my satin headscarf.”
“If your headscarf comes off in the night you still have the protection of your satin pillowcase.”
“Wrap your head and invest in a satin pillowcase.”
“If you are really a keener – do both.”
“If you find satin headscarves uncomfortable then place a satin pillowcase over your pillow for a similar type of protection.”
“Covering your head with a satin headscarf at night not only keeps your edges looking fresh it also protects your roots from drying out when you sleep.”


"These oils are very effective in soothing the scalp and keeping moisture. They will not accumulate and clog pores like ordinary braid spray."
"Instead, choose natural oils similar to those I just mentioned, such as coconut oil and almond oil."
"What did you do?"
She looked at me and scolded me: "your head is dry!"
"I have a hairdresser who can tell me when to skip a few days of wearing a satin headband."
"If your scarf falls off at night, your Satin pillowcase can still protect you."
"Wrap your head up and buy a satin pillowcase."
"If you're really enthusiastic, do both."
"If you find a satin scarf uncomfortable, put a satin pillowcase on the pillow to provide similar protection."
"Covering your head with a satin scarf at night will not only make your edges look fresh, but also protect your roots from drying when you sleep."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And let’s be honest, we all wish we looked as good as Xi does when we stumble.”
“...fall happens and that they are all a team Xi addressed the fall on Instagram...”
“Originally, it was reported that the fall would not be televised, but it was shown on Tuesday night’s CBS broadcast, reports E News.”
“It appears that the 28-year-old model got tangled in her flowing, sheer ensemble.”
“But the Chinese model was a total pro, and did not let the fall affect her on stage.”
“She kept a smile on the whole time, and even seemed to laugh at herself as she adjusted her hair and continued to walk down the catwalk.”
“She received applause from the other models and the audience, reports E News.”
“It’s not about how we fall, it’s about how we get up.”
“#VSFashionShow pic.twitter.com/NCe08O8OjU — CBS (@CBS) November 29, 2017But the backstage footage shows some completely different emotions.”
“Once she was away from the audience, Xi burst into tears.”


"To be honest, we all want to be as good as Xi Jinping when we stumble."
“… The fall happened. They were all a team and solved the problem on instagram... "
"Initially, it was reported that autumn would not be on TV, but CBS broadcast the news on Tuesday night."
"It seems that the 28 year old model is obsessed with her flowing, pure clothes."
"But the Chinese model is a full professional player, and did not let the fall affect her performance on stage."
"She kept smiling and even seemed to laugh at herself as she straightened her hair and continued to walk on the catwalk."
"She got applause from other models and the audience," e-news reported
"The problem is not how we fall, but how we stand up."
“#VSFashionShow” pic.twitter.com/NCe08O8OjU -CBS (@ CBS) November 29, 2017, but backstage footage shows some completely different emotions. "
As soon as he left the audience, Xi Jinping burst into tears.



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“Saturday Night Live airs on NBC Saturdays at 11:30 p.m.”
“Later on, Styles performed his new single, “Sign of the Times,” and debuted a second song, “Ever Since New York,” from his upcoming debut self-titled solo album.”
“...dance moves and irresistible smile essentially stole the show.”
“And while the former One Direction singer only appeared for approximately 15 seconds, his charming (and funny!)”
“While he sang the 1983 tune, he was joined by the SNL cast members and the evening’s musical guest, Styles, 23.”
““It’s a party!”SNL‘s house band then began playing “Let’s Dance” as Fallon walked off the stage and through the halls of the studio, surrounded by dozens of backup dancers.”
““Tonight is bigger than a show,” he said during his opening monologue.”
“...celebrate the first ever episode that aired live from coast to coast...”
“Jimmy Fallon kicked off Saturday Night Live on April 15 with an epic flash mob featuring Harry Styles dancing to the late David Bowie s Let s Dance The Tonight Show host 42 returned to host the NBC late night sketch comedy show for the first time since 2013 to...”


"Wait a minute."
"NBC 11:30 Saturday night live"
Later, stiles sang his new single "the symbol of the times" and released his second song "since New York" for the first time, which is his upcoming debut album of the same name
“… Dance moves and irresistible smiles basically steal the show. "
"Although the former one-way singer only appeared for about 15 seconds, his charm (and fun!)"
When he sang the song of 1983, SNL actors and the evening's music guest styles, 23 also joined him
"It's a party! "Then SNL's family band began to play" let's dance. "Fallon stepped off the stage and walked through the studio hall surrounded by dozens of backup dancers."
"Tonight is more important than a show," he said in his opening remarks
“… Celebrate the first episode of live from coast to coast... "
"On April 15, Jimmy Fallon kicked off with an epic lightning mob on Saturday night live, with Harry styles and the late David Bowie s dancing let's dance the tonight show Host 42 returns to host NBC's late night comedy show, which



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“No No Primary Port Lightning Lightning Iris Scanner?”
“Yes Yes Headphone Jack?”
“Sadly, unlike their pricier iPhone X sibling, neither new iPhone has made the switch to an OLED panel, and use the same IPS screen tech as older iPhones.”
“Once again they both don’t feature a 3.5mm headphone jack, which will remain an annoyance for audiophiles.”
“Unlike the iPhone X which has a close to a bezel-less, button-free design, both iPhone 8s have a physical home button and fingerprint scanner.”
“We’re not sure we’d want either to have an accidental meeting with a pavement, but glass definitely looks nice and has also let Apple build the Qi open wireless charging standard into both iPhones, which is supported in many airports.”
“...copper reinforcing structure...”
“Some people may bemoan the move to glass fearing the ever present threat of cracking that an accidental drop poses but Apple claim the iPhone 8 and iPhone 8 Plus skin is the most durable glass in a smartphone thanks to the use of a special laser welded steel and...”
“Both have a reworked mixed-material design, featuring a custom glass back and front and aluminium sides.”
“From a distance both iPhones look pretty similar.”


"No main port lightning iris scanner?"
"Is it the headphone jack?"
Unfortunately, unlike the more expensive iPhone x, neither new iPhone has switched to the OLED panel and uses the same IPS screen technology as the old iPhone
"Once again, none of them has a 3.5mm headphone jack, which is still a worry for the enthusiasts."
"Unlike the borderless, keyless design of the iPhone x, the iPhone 8 has a physical master key and a fingerprint scanner."
"We're not sure if we want to have an unexpected encounter with the sidewalk, but glass definitely looks good. It also enables apple to establish Qi open wireless charging standard in both iPhones, which is supported in many airports."
“… Copper reinforced structure... "
"Some people may sigh that they turned to glass for fear that the accidental fall would cause the glass to break, but Apple claims that the iPhone 8 and iPhone 8 plus cases are the most durable glass in smartphones due to the use of special laser welded steel, and that..."
"Both have a redesigned hybrid design with custom glass back and front and aluminum sides."
"From a distance, both iPhones are very similar."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's Personal At NewBeauty, we get the most trusted information from the beauty authority delivered right to your inbox...”
“We tapped a couple facial plastic surgeons to get a better understanding of facial anatomy.”
“In the 12-minute video, Glanville reveals that she had suffered third-degree burns from a laser hair removal treatment gone wrong, causing “nerve damage” and “scar tissue,” and resulting her in inability to “talk straight.”“Everyone wants to know why my top lip doesn’t move.”
“You can see it right here.”
“It’s a little white circle,” Glanville says in the video.”
““I had laser hair removal on my upper lip, oh gosh, 2009, maybe 2008, and I got a third-degree burn.”
“And my face on the right side doesn t move the way my face on the left side moves You May Also Like This Botched Laser Hair Removal Proves It s a Treatment You Should Take Seriously Needless to say with laser hair removal being such a sought after treatment...”
“...we were a little unnerved ha...”
“...to hear of this potentially paralyzing side effect.”
““Timeline-wise, it’s not clear when the facial paralysis started after laser hair removal.”


"Newbeauty is a private website. We get the most reliable information from beauty agencies and send it directly to your in box..."
"We have hired several plastic surgeons to better understand the anatomy of the face."
"In this 12 minute video, Granville revealed that she had suffered third degree burns due to a mistake in laser hair removal treatment, causing" nerve damage "and" scar tissue ", which made her unable to" speak frankly "and" everyone wants to know why my upper lip doesn't move. "
"You can see it here."
"It's a small white circle," Granville said in the video
"I had laser hair removal on my upper lip. My God, in 2009, maybe in 2008, I got a third degree burn."
"My right face won't move like my left face. You may also like this clumsy laser hair removal, which proves that it's a treatment you should take seriously. Needless to say, laser hair removal is a very popular treatment..."
“… We're a little nervous... "
"I heard about the potential paralytic side effects."
"In terms of time, it's not clear when laser hair removal started."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Brands has now addressed the gravy shortage in a statement to CNBC.”
“A spokesperson for KFC’s parent company Yum!”
“Click here to subscribe to the People Food newsletter.”
““We won’t compromise on quality, so no deliveries has meant some of our restaurants are closed, and others are operating a limited menu, or shortened hour.”Want the ultimate dish on the latest celebrity food news, plus exclusive recipes, videos and more?”
“Image zoom Credit: Ricardo Dearatanha/Los Angeles Times/Getty“The chicken crossed the road, just not to our restaurants,” KFC said in a statement on Twitter.”
“GMB — a trade union whose members worked for the Bidvest Group — told the outlet that DHL is “not geared up” to deliver chicken around the country with only one distribution depot operating out of Rugby, a town in central England.”
“KFC’s chicken snafu first started when the company moved its food delivery service from Bidvest Group to DHL, Business Insider reported.”
““WHAT IS GOING ON,” another tweeted as the news broke.”
““This is worse than the chicken shortage,” one user posted.”
“Lovers of the chain have taken to Twitter to voice their grievances after learning the chain’s most popular side dish remains left off the menu.”


"Branz has addressed the gravy shortage in a statement to CNBC."
"The spokesman of KFC parent company Yum
"Click here to subscribe to people's food news."
"We won't compromise on quality, so not delivering means that some of our restaurants are closed, while others have limited menus or shorter business hours." Would you like the ultimate dish on the latest celebrity food news, with exclusive recipes, videos, etc
"Image zooming source: Ricardo dearatanha / Los Angeles Times / Getty 'chicken crossed the road, but didn't come to our restaurant," KFC said in a twitter statement
GMB is a trade union whose members work for the bidvest group. GMB told the media that DHL was "not ready" to ship chicken across the country, with only one distribution station outside rugby, a town in Central England
According to business insider, KFC's chicken trap began when the company moved its food distribution service from bidvest group to DHL
After the news came out, another netizen said on Weibo, "what's the matter?"
"It's worse than chicken shortage," one user posted
"After learning that the chain's most popular side dish is still not on the menu, fans of the chain have expressed their dissatisfaction on twitter."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You are Bachelor live tweets, the favorite pastime of Bachelor fans.”
“Just wear whatever (or for extra pizzazz, wear Twitter blue) and pin or tape a bunch of Bachelor tweets to yourself.”
“Chris Harrison & RosesStraight-cut Jacket, $35, H&MCotton Shirt, $13, H&MRed Artificial Rose Heads, $4, Factory Direct CraftCrew Neck Short Sleeve T-Shirt, $6, TargetAnother simple one.”
“2.”
“"Neil Lane" should also carry around a fake diamond ring.”
“...needs to be really sparkly...”
“One of you needs a suit and the ability to keep a straight face while someone tells you they re going to spend the rest of their life with a person they met eight weeks ago and one of you...”
“Neil Lane & A DiamondBlazer Slim Fit, $70, H&MParisian Petite Sequin Dress, $24, ASOSDiamond Ring Bottle Opener, $3, Party CityDiamond Ring Headband, $4, Ziggos PartyIt's easy.”
“1.”
“Also, while these costumes can work for couples, they can also work for friends if you are still on your own journey to find love.”


"You are a bachelor's live microblog, a favorite pastime for bachelor fans."
"Just put on any clothes (or blue twitter for extra excitement) and post a bunch of bachelor tweets on yourself."
"Chris Harrison & Roses straight cut jacket, 35 dollars, H & mcotton shirt, 13 dollars, H & mred artificial rose head, 4 dollars, factory direct craftcrew collar short sleeve T-shirt, 6 dollars, targetother simple."
“2.”
"Neil lane should also carry a fake diamond ring with him."
“… It needs to be very shiny... "
"One of you needs a suit, and when someone tells you they're going to spend the rest of their life with someone they met eight weeks ago, one of you..."
"Neil Lane & a diamond Blazer slim fit, US $70, H & mparisian Sequin dress, US $24, asosdiamond ring bottle opener, US $3, Party City diamond ring headband, US $4, zigos partyit's easy."
“1.”
"In addition, although these clothes can serve lovers, they can also serve friends if you are still on your own journey to find love."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#Grammys pic.twitter.com/Wxeb1IWWju @EmJJokinenBlue let them know who's REALLY in charge here  @queen_abgJAY-Z was nominated for eight nominations.”
“I have no idea what Blue Ivy is doing but I'm here for it.”
“IN LIVE See more reactions below...”
“Many took to Twitter to share their reaction to Blue Ivy taking charge with one writing Blue really told Beyoncé and Jay Z to calm down Another wrote THIS VIDEO BLUE TELLING BEYONCE AND JAY Z TO STOP CLAPPING SO SHE COULD LISTEN TO CAMILA TALK IS ALL I NEED”
“In response, Beyoncé and JAY-Z clapped, with the cameras capturing Blue Ivy gesturing toward her famous parents with her hands, apparently urging them to stop clapping while Camila was speaking.”
“After Camila Cabello performed with Kesha, she made a moving speech about her Cuban roots.”
“Watch Blue Ivy Shut Down Beyoncé & JAY-Z without a Word at Grammys 2018GettyOn Sunday, JAY-Z was joined at the Grammy Awards by his wife Beyoncé and their daughter Blue Ivy.”


"Grammy Awards pic.twitter.com/Wxeb1IWWju @EMJ jokinenblue let them know who is really in charge here, and @ queen-u abgjay-z won eight nominations. "
"I don't know what blue ivy is doing, but I'm here."
"In the live broadcast, please see more reactions below..."
"A lot of people tweeted about their reaction to blue ivy. One of them said that blue really told Beyonce and jay z to calm down. The other wrote this video. Blue told Beyonce and jay z to stop clapping so that she could listen to Camilla. That's what I need."
"In response, Beyonce and Jay-Z clapped, and the camera caught blue Ivy gesturing to her famous parents, apparently urging them to stop clapping as Camilla spoke."
"Camilla Cabello gave a touching speech about her Cuban roots after her performance with Kesha."
"Watching blue Ivy close, Beyonce and Jay-Z don't say a word. On Grammy's gettyon Sunday, Jay-Z joined the Grammy Awards, his wife Beyonce and their daughter blue ivy."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more: 6 New Ways to Use Dry Shampoo...”
“To make the shampoo last, I spray a little dry shampoo onto my roots every morning.”
“It was like the godsend we didn’t know we were waiting for.”
“Finally a product that allowed us to skip showers without having the world know how lazy we are!”
“You could practically hear the scalps of oily-haired girls rejoicing.”
“Unfortunately, we’ve taken things a bit far.”
“We’re misusing the product, and our hair is paying the price.”
“When I went to visit Nunzio Saviano‘s salon for a new cut, he took one look at my hair and asked, “How often are you using dry shampoo?” Apparently my dull color and rough texture were telltale signs that I’d been hitting the bottle a little too often.”
“Since my hair is pretty thick and incredibly hard to dry, I tend to wash it once every five days.”
“This, according to Saviano, is far too often.”


"Read more: 6 new ways to use dry shampoo..."
"To make the shampoo last, I spray a little dry shampoo on the roots every morning."
"It's like a gift we don't know we're waiting for."
"Finally, we have a product, let us not take a bath, but let the world know how lazy we are!"
"You can almost hear the scalp of girls with greasy hair cheering."
"Unfortunately, we've come a little far."
"We abused the product, and our hair paid the price."
"When I went to nuzio Saviano's salon for a new haircut, he looked at my hair and asked me," how often do you use dry shampoo? "Obviously, my dull color and rough texture are a clear sign that I've hit the bottle a little too many times."
"Because my hair is thick and hard to dry, I tend to wash it every five days."
"According to Saviano, it's too common."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Photo by Andrew Milligan PA Images via Getty Images Andrew Milligan PA Images PA Images via Getty Images Carey Mulligan and Marcus Mumford British musician Marcus Mumford and British actor Carey Mulligan arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain s Prince Harry Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St...”
“Gareth Fuller—PA WireOprah WinfreyOprah Winfrey arrives at Windsor Castle ahead of the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle.”
“Chris Jackson—PA WireGeorge Clooney and Amal ClooneyAmal Clooney and George Clooney arrive at St George's Chapel at Windsor Castle for the wedding of Meghan Markle and Prince Harry, May 19, 2018.”
“Chris Jackson—AFP/Getty ImagesElton JohnSir Elton John leaves St George's Chapel in Windsor Castle following the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle, May 19, 2018.”
“Chris Jackson—AFP/Getty ImagesCharlotte Riley and Tom HardyTom Hardy and Charlotte Riley arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Alastair Grant—AFP/Getty ImagesAbigail SpencerAbigail Spencer (left) and Priyanka Chopra arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and US actress Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Ian West—AFP/Getty ImagesSarah RaffertySarah Rafferty and Santtu Seppala arrive for the wedding of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Ian West—AFP/Getty ImagesGina TorresGina Torres arrives for the wedding ceremony of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Marcus Mumford, a British musician, and Kerry Mulligan, a British actor, have arrived in St. Louis for the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan markel."
"Gareth fuller and Winfrey Oprah Winfrey arrive at windsor castle before the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle."
"On May 19, 2018, Chris Jackson and George Clooney arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle for the wedding of Megan Marcel and Prince Harry."
"On May 19, 2018, after Prince Harry married Megan markel, Chris Jackson left St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."
"On May 19, 2018, Chris Jackson / Getty Images Charlotte Riley, Tom Hardy, Tom hardy and Charlotte Riley arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, Windsor, for the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan Markle."
"On May 19, 2018, Alastair grant AFP / Getty imagesabigail Spencer (left) and Priyanka Chopra arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle to attend the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and American actress Meghan Markle."
"Ian West AFP / Getty Images Sarah Rafferty, Sarah Rafferty and santtu seppala arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle on May 19, 2018 to attend the wedding ceremony of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan Marcel."
"On May 19, 2018, Ian West AFP / Getty Images Gina Torres Gina Torres arrived in Windsor to attend the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Enjoying the view: The duo broke up their walk with a relaxing time on the rocks...”
“The Manhattan native has been linked to Carino for just more than four months, since the pair were seen together in Houston prior to her memorable Super Bowl performance in February.”
“The 31-year-old Just Dance singer and Carino, a 48-year-old agent for CAA, looked very much in love as they walked through a rocky seaside area in the ritzy New York community.”
“The Grammy-winner looked fit and sexy in a black top with a graphic of The Little Mermaid's Ariel tied around her midsection.”
“The performer, whose real name is Stefani Germanotta, wore denim cutoff shorts held up by a black belt and white sneakers on the trot.”
“Hot couple Lady Gaga 31 and her boyfriend Christian Carino 48 looked to be having a romantic first day of summer in the Hamptons Tuesday Carino looked ready for a bit of a workout wearing a black long sleeved shirt with the sleeves rolled up grey men s Nike leggings...”
“...and black Nike trainers...”
“The Bad Romance beauty and the entertainment industry professional, both wearing sunglasses and white caps, alternated between holding hands and going arm-in-arm as they took a methodical stroll along the coast, periodically stopping to enjoy the amazing scenery.”
“Out and about The couple held hands as they strolled around the well heeled area Affection The duo walking arm in arm with one another enjoyed the beautiful nature in the area on their trot Growing closer The pair have been spotted a number of times over the past four...”
“'Over the years, no matter what creative transformation that I've gone through, he’s always been very supportive of that and loving.'”


"Enjoy the scenery: they relax on the rocks and finish their walk..."
"The Manhattan native's relationship with carrino lasted just over four months because they were seen together in Houston before her unforgettable Super Bowl performance in February."
"Just dance singer, 31, and CAA agent karino, 48, seemed to fall in love as they strolled along a rocky beach in New York's luxury community."
"The Grammy winner looks healthy and sexy in a black top with a little Mermaid Ariel on his waist."
The performer, whose real name is Stephanie gemanota, trots in black belt denim shorts and white sneakers
"Spice girl Lady Gaga 31 and her boyfriend Christian Carino 48 spent a romantic early summer in Hampton on Tuesday. Carino looked ready for exercise in a black long sleeve shirt and grey men's Nike tights with rolled up sleeves..."
“… And black Nike sneakers... "
"Bad romantic beauties and entertainment professionals are wearing sunglasses and white hats. They walk along the coast in an orderly way, sometimes hand in hand, sometimes hand in hand, sometimes stop to enjoy this magical scenery."
"The couple are walking hand in hand in the rich area. They are holding hands and enjoying the beautiful natural scenery of the area in a trot. They are getting closer and closer. In the past four years, the couple has been found many times..."
"Over the years, no matter what creative changes I have experienced, he has always been very supportive and loving."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[NATL]'One Love': Stars, Fans Flock to Manchester Concert...”
“Grande was joined onstage at the One Manchester Concert by the likes of Miley Cyrus, Coldplay, Justin Bieber, Katy Perry and the Black Eyed Peas, with whom she sang their breakout hit "Where Is the Love?"”
“#OneLoveManchester."”
“"But tonight she's putting on a fabulous show.”
“"I thought Ariana Grande was wrong to fly off after #ManchesterAttack," Morgan tweeted earlier.”
“Respect.#OneLoveManchester pic.twitter.com/r4v6NQMr97 — Piers Morgan (@piersmorgan) June 4, 2017One Love Manchester Benefit ConcertMany people praised Morgan for apologizing and some expressed shock over his initial statements.”
“You're an admirable young woman & this is a magnificent night.”
“I misjudged you, @ArianaGrande & I apologise.”
“Respect.”


"[country] 'one love': stars and fans flock to Manchester concert..."
Grande, along with Millie Cyrus, Coldplay, Justin Bieber, Katy Perry and black eyed peas, attended the "one Manchester" concert and sang their hit song "where is love?" 》”
"A love."
"But she's going to have a wonderful performance tonight."
"I think it's wrong for Ariane Grande to fly away after Tucker in Manchester," Morgan tweeted earlier.
"Respect": a love pic.twitter.com/r4v6NQMr97 -Pierce Morgan (@ piersmorgan) 2017one love Manchester, "many people praised Morgan for his apology, and some people were shocked by his initial statement."
"You're an admirable young woman. It's a wonderful night."
"I misjudged you, @ Ariana Grande & I apologize."
"Respect."



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Until they inherit their new titles, Pippa can take on the title of Mrs. Matthews of Glen Affric the younger, which she can use anywhere in the Commonwealth, according to The Express.”
“According to the Daily Mail, Pippa's future father-in-law, David Matthews, is currently the Laird of Glen Affric and when he passes away, his son James will take on the title, which will make Pippa the Lady of Glen Affric.”
“SplashAnother unique element of Pippa's big day the reception's theme.”
“In honor of the celebrations, a glass marquee from Belgium was installed on the Middleton family grounds.”
“...earlier this year.”
“"Pippa is a traditional girl and wanted to marry close to home," a source told Hello!”
“Marrying in her hometown was important to Pippa.”
“Guests had to check in with security at a separate location and were then ferried to the Middleton home in Range Rovers.”
“St Getty ImagesThe receptionThere was a break of several hours between the church service and the evening party, and according to People, some guests were seen around town wearing black tie—men in tuxedos and women in evening gowns.”
“Splash NewsFollowing the church service, the congregation headed to the reception on the grounds of Carole and Michael Middleton’s Georgian property in nearby village of Bucklebury.”


According to the express, Pippa can inherit the title of Mrs. Matthews of Glenn Affleck before they inherit the new title, which she can use anywhere in the Commonwealth
"Pippa's future father-in-law, David Matthews, is now Glenn Affleck's lair, according to the daily mail. After his death, his son James will take over the title, which will make Pippa Glenn Affleck's wife."
"Another unique element of Pippa's Day is the theme of the reception."
To commemorate the celebrations, a Belgian glass tent was installed in the courtyard of the Middleton family
"Earlier this year."
"Pippa is a traditional girl who wants to get married near home," a source told you
"It's important for Pippa to get married at home."
"Guests must check in with security at another location and then be transported to Middleton's home by Range Rover."
St. Getty imagined a reception with a few hours off between church services and parties. According to people, there were some guests in the city wearing black ties, men in tuxedos and women in evening dresses
After the church service, the congregation went to the Georgia estate of Carol and Michael Middleton in the nearby village of buckbury for a reception



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That's why I think what triggered so much when Sonja was saying the thing about her divorce and stuff."”
“I have a life now that's not the life that I expected.”
“BETHENNY: "I don't want you to get your fur up because I'm gonna be very, very kind.”
“The next day on the plane, Bethenny confronted Dorinda, and it was basically an intervention.”
“"I would say that acting this way at 7 o'clock at night to people who only have good intentions would indicate that there might be a problem."”
“"It's sad because Dorinda seems to abuse alcohol," she continued.”
“And I'm forgiving."”
“I know she'll wake up tomorrow and she'll be there on time and dressed and she'll have a good experience.”
“She won't even know what she's done.”
“She told Bravo cams, "The first feeling that I have is compassion for her, honestly.”


"That's why I think it's what triggered so much when Sonia said she was divorced and that sort of thing."
"My life is not what I expected."
"I don't want you to pick up your fur, because I'll be very, very friendly," he said
"The next day on the plane, bessonny confronted Dorinda, which was basically an intervention."
"What I want to say is that at 7 p.m., it means that there may be a problem for people who only have good intentions."
"It's sad because Dorinda seems to abuse alcohol," she continued
"I forgive you."
"I know she'll wake up tomorrow, she'll be there on time, get dressed and have a great experience."
"She didn't even know what she had done."
"My first feeling is to sympathize with her, to be honest," she told bravo



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...drink invented to encourage European colonial soldiers in South Asian tropical climates to take quinine...”
“The French made version is 14.8% alcohol by volume and the US version 19%.”
“For other uses, see Dubonnet (disambiguation)Dubonnet poster1915 advertisementDubonnet advertisement, 1907 — Napoleon and Madame de Pompadour share a bottle.”
“The caption, idiomatically rendered, runs something akin to this: (Napoleon Bonaparte to Mme.”
“...the Marchioness de Pompadour) ''My dear Marchioness, you must be perished with the cold.”
“Do, pray, alight from your carriage and take a glass of Dubonnet.”
“If, at the time, I had but had a few thousand bottles my retreat from Russia would have been metamorphosed into a triumphal procession!''”
“The scene is set during Fat Tuesday of carnival ; hence the characters are disguised people roleplaying.”
“Dubonnet ( , ,[1][2] French: [dybɔnɛ]) is a sweet, aromatised wine-based aperitif.”
“[3] It is a blend of fortified wine, herbs, and spices (including a small amount of quinine),[4] with fermentation being stopped by the addition of alcohol.”


“…… The drink was invented to encourage European colonial soldiers in south subtropical regions to take quinine... "
"By volume, the alcohol content is 14.8% in France and 19% in the United States."
Other uses see DuPont. Com (disambiguation) DuPont. Com post 1915 ad DuPont. Com ad 1907 Napoleon and Madame pombardo shared a bottle
The title is presented in the usual way, which is similar to this meaning: (to Madame Napoleon Bonaparte)
“…… Marquis pompadou: "my dear Marquis, you must be freezing to death."
"Please get out of the car and have a DuPont."
"If I had only a few thousand bottles of wine at that time, my retreat from Russia would have become a victorious team!"
"The scene is set on the Fat Tuesday of the carnival; so the character is a disguised human role play."
"Dubonnet (, [1] [2] French: [DYB ɔ n ɛ]) is a kind of sweet, aromatic wine appetizer."
It's a blend of fortified wine, herbs and spices (including a small amount of quinine) that stop fermentation by adding alcohol



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple is expecting their third child via surrogate this year.”
“My strong Saint.”Kardashian-West and her husband, Kanye West, are also parents to 4-year-old North West.”
““I’m sure he will still say the ambulance ride was cool!”
“He’s so resilient,” she wrote.”
““He’s home and all better.”
“Saint has made a full recovery, Kardashian-West said in her post.”
“We are so grateful for you all!”Kardashian-West did not say in her Instagram post when Saint went to the hospital, but her spokesperson told CNN that he was hospitalized from Wednesday to Saturday last week.”
“I just want to thank every nurse & doctor out there who works so hard around the clock.”
““Pneumonia is so scary.”
“After spending three nights in the hospital & seeing my baby get multiple IV’s and hooked up to oxygen machines, our end of year was challenging,” Kardashian-West wrote in the caption of a photo of herself holding her Saint.”


"The couple gave birth to their third child through surrogacy this year."
"My strong saint." Kardashian West and her husband Kanye West are also parents of the 4-year-old northwest
"I'm sure he'll still say ambulances are cool!"
"He's very resilient," she wrote
"He's back. Everything's better."
"The saint has fully recovered," Kardashian West said in her post
"We thank you so much! "Kardashian West didn't say on instagram when the sage went to the hospital, but her spokesman told CNN that the sage was hospitalized from Wednesday to Saturday last week."
"I just want to thank every nurse and doctor who worked hard day and night."
"Pneumonia is terrible."
"After three nights in the hospital, seeing my child receiving multiple intravenous injections and being connected to an oxygen machine, our year-end is full of challenges," Kardashian West wrote in a caption of a picture of herself holding a saint



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...life there have been too many times I have felt alone Willow said...”
“We didn’t have a blueprint.”
“In an interview with Access, Pinkett Smith and her mother Adrienne Banfield-Jones opened up about how Smith was separated from his first wife, Sheree Zampino, but not quite divorced when the couple, who have been married for 20 years, started dating.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I think initially when Will first called you, I think he was still married or he was just separated, or something, and I said, he’s not available to you,” Banfield-Jones said, after revealing she wasn’t the biggest fan of the actor at first.”
““He was ‘div,’ ” Pinkett Smith, 46, replied.”
“The orced hadn t happened yet Image zoom Jada Pinkett Smith and Will Smith Credit Trae Patton NBC NBCU Photo Bank via Getty Images Zampino and Pinkett Smith now have an amicable relationship and Will s ex even appears as the first guest on Pinkett Smith s new Facebook Watch...”
“...talk show Red Table Talk...”
““That’s our first episode.”
“That’s our Mother’s Day episode,” Pinkett Smith said.”


“… There are too many times in my life when I feel lonely. The willow said
"We don't have a blueprint."
"In an interview with access, pinkert Smith and her mother, Adrian Banfield Jones, told how Smith separated from her first wife, Cherie zanpino, but when the couple, who had been married for 20 years, started dating, they were not completely divorced."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I think when will first called you, I thought he was married or just separated or something, and I said, you can't find him," Banfield Jones said after revealing that he wasn't the actor's biggest fan at first
"He's div," pinkert Smith, 46, replied
"Orcs haven't had image zooming yet. Jada Pinkett Smith and will smith provided credit to train Patton NBC nbcu photo bank through Getty Images. Zampino and Pinkett Smith now have a friendly relationship, and will's predecessor even became Pinkett Smith's first guest on his new Facebook watch..."
“… Talk to the red table... "
"This is our first episode."
"It was our mother's Day episode," pinkert Smith said



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To learn more about the show, follow: Twitter – @PlatinumLifeOnE Instagram – @PlatinumLifeOnE Facebook – @ThePlatinumLifeOnE“The Platinum Life” is produced by STXtv and Tower 2 Productions with Ryan Holcomb, Jason Goldberg, Shanta Conic, and Kim McKoy serving as executive producers.””
“Eric Bellinger and more...”
“Asiah is a loyal friend and expects the same from others, but she continues to butt heads with Crystal over past unresolved issues.”
“She’s faced with figuring out how to juggle all of her responsibilities as of her career and being a mom to her daughter with husband, Kid Ink.”
“MEET THE LEADING LADIES:Asiah Collins (Married to multi-platinum recording artist, songwriter and producer Kid Ink)Asiah, the youngest woman in the circle of friends, is working to find the balance in her life between having fun and being responsible.”
“Will they fall in line or march to the beat of their own drum?”
“However, living in the spotlight comes with rules that all ladies have to follow.”
“While juggling their own careers and making a name for themselves, these women are headstrong and won’t let anything stand in the way from achieving success.”
“In the eight hour long episodes viewers follow Asiah Collins Alycia Bella La Myia Good Shantel Jackson Nazanin Mandi Lola Monroe and Crystal Smith as they indulge in the VIP life with their significant others who happen to be some of the biggest names in the music industry including Nelly...”
“With looks that could kill and a seemingly sweet demeanor, don’t let her fool you as, while she’s made it known that she’s respectful, she’ll come for you if you send for her.”


"To learn more about the show, please follow: Twitter – @ platinum lifeone instagram – @ platinum lifeone Facebook – @ platinum lifeone platinum life is produced by stxtv and tower 2 productions with Ryan Holcomb, Jason Goldberg, Shanta conic and Kim Mckoy as executive producers."
"Eric Bellinger and more..."
"Assia is a loyal friend and has the same expectations for others, but she continues to confront Cristo on the outstanding issues of the past."
"She is faced with how to balance all responsibilities in her career and how to be a mother to her daughter with her husband, kid ink."
"Meet the leading lady: Asiah Collins (married to multi platinum record artist, songwriter and producer kid ink) is the youngest woman in her circle of friends. She is trying to find a balance between fun and responsibility in her life."
"Will they line up or follow the rhythm of their drums?"
"However, living in the spotlight has rules that all women have to follow."
"While taking care of their own career and fame, these women are also very willful and will not let anything hinder their success."
"In the eight hour series, the audience follows Assia Collins Alicia Bella Ramia good Chantel Jackson Nazarin Mandy Lola Monroe and Christo Smith, and indulges in VIP life with their important figures, who happen to be some of the big names in the music world, including Nelly..."
"You are charming and sweet. Don't let her cheat you, because she let you know that she is respectful. If you ask her to come, she will come to you."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Duff was previously wed to former NHL pro Mike Comrie, with whom she shares 5-year-old son Luca, and has been linked to Jason Walsh and Eli Sandvik.”
“The duo had previously split in March after several months of dating.”
“On October 25, Duff shared a Boomerang clip in which she turned Koma’s head to reveal a kiss mark from her lipstick on his cheek.”
“...accounts...”
“...doesn t work out the first time the second time she continued as long as there s not too much damage done then it can always work out again The on again couple stepped out in October amid reconciliation rumors and have since been present on each other s Instagram...”
“But that doesn t mean caring for someone ever goes away During her appearance on The Talk Duff reiterated Gomez s sentiments Timing is such a big deal third time s the charm I think that you have history and a past with someone and love and just because it...”
“So maybe before, it could have been forcing something that wasn’t right.”
““I cherish people who have really impacted my life.”
“I’m not 18, or 19, or 20,” she told Billboard.”
““I’m 25.”


Duff previously married former NHL professional Mike comry, shared a five-year-old son, Luca, and had ties with Jason Walsh and Eli Sandvik
"After several months of love, they broke up in March this year."
In October 25th, Duff shared a boomerang fragment, revealing a kiss on his head from the lipstick on his cheek.
“… Account... "
“… The first time can't, the second time she continues as long as it doesn't cause too much damage, and then it can always be solved again. The couple walked out of the reconciliation rumor again in October and stayed on each other's instagram all the time... "
"But it doesn't mean that when Duff Gomez appears in the talk show, she cares about someone who has left. She reiterated Gomez's feelings. Timing is so important. The third time is charm. I think you have history and past, people and love, just because of it..."
"So, maybe before, it might have been forcing others to do something wrong."
"I cherish the people who really influence my life."
"I'm not 18, 19, 20," she told billboard
"I'm 25 years old."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See Hardy as Eddie Brock below.”
“Venom arrives in theaters Oct. 5, 2018.”
“The director said at Brazil Comic Con, “I can promise you badass action, Venom’s dark humor, and I can also promise you an absolutely stunning performance by Tom Hardy.” The film also stars Oscar nominee Michelle Williams, Golden Globe nominee Riz Ahmed and Jenny Slate.”
“Fleischer, the director of Zombieland, promises a true look at one of Marvel’s most exciting, complex and mysterious characters.”
“Filming on Venom has wrapped in Atlanta, but continues in San Francisco later this month.”
“Venom and his allies and the symbiotes...”
“Venom Lethal Protector follows Eddie s story as he moves from New York to San Francisco after coming to an agreement with his nemesis Spider Man while Planet of the Symbiotes examines Eddie s relationship with his symbiote and the influence it has on him resulting in a war between...”
“The film’s director, Ruben Fleischer, said the film is inspired by the 1992 limited series Venom: Lethal Protector and the 1995 five-issue comic Planet of the Symbiotes, both written by David Michelinie.”
“...s story distances itself from the Marvel Universe and instead offers a darker look at the iconic anti hero...”
“Hardy has explained his excitement for taking on the role telling IGN at Brazil Comic Con I just wanted to say that I give you my word of honor that I m going to do everything that I can to deliver the best Venom that I can possibly muster Venom...”


"Hardy plays Eddie Bullock below."
Venom is released on October 5, 2018
"I can assure you of the villain's action, the venom's black humor, and I can assure you of Tom Hardy's absolutely amazing performance," the director told the Brazilian comics conference The film also stars Oscar nominees Michelle Williams, Golden Globe nominees Liz Ahmed and Jenny Slater
Fleischer, director of zombie world, promised to take a real look at one of the most exciting, complex and mysterious characters in marvel
The filming of venom ended in Atlanta, but will continue in San Francisco later this month
"Venom and its allies and symbionts..."
"The deadly protector of venom" tells the story of Eddie moving from New York to San Francisco after reaching an agreement with spider man. Symbiotic planet explores the relationship between Eddie and his symbiont and its influence on him, which leads to a war... "
Ruben Fleischer, the film's director, said it was inspired by the 1992 limited release series venom: the deadly protector（ Venom:altall Protector ）And the 1995 issue of "planet of the symbiotes," both by David michelinie
“… The story goes away from the marvel world and instead offers an iconic anti hero dark look
"Hardy has explained how excited he is to play this role at the Brazil comics conference. I just want to say, I promise you, I will try my best to provide the best venom, I may summon the venom..."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So while he can take credit for what fans hear while watching and listening to The Greatest Showman’s soundtrack, he can’t quite say the same for the original High School Musical movie.”
“I was not really given an explanation.”
“Troy Bolton was good at two things during his reign as the superstar athlete in High School Musical — basketball and singing.”
“Yet, Zac Efron, who is known for playing the role of Troy, didn’t actually sing in the first High School Musical movie.”
“Basically, he just lip-synced to another singer’s voice and the world took it as his own.”
“Zac has since owned up to the fact that it was a singer by the name of Drew Seeley whose voice HSM fanatics fell in love with and not his.”
“In an old interview, he explained that he had to actually “fight” to get his vocals on the second and third movies’ soundtracks.”
““In the first movie, after everything was recorded, my voice was not on them.”
“It just kind of happened that way.”
“...looks fake Zac also mentioned that sometimes things needed to be added to the song further into filming which meant he would have to go back into the studio and re record the track...”


"So while he can win praise for what fans hear when watching and listening to the soundtrack of the greatest performer, he can't say the same thing about this original high school musical."
"I didn't get a real explanation."
"Troy Bolton was good at two things when he was a high school musical superstar - basketball and singing."
"However, Zach Efron, who is famous for playing Troy, did not actually sing in the first high school musical film."
"Basically, he's just lip synching the voice of another singer, and the whole world thinks it's his own voice."
"Zach later admitted the fact that he was a singer named drew Healy, and his voice was loved by HSM fans, not his own."
In an old interview, he explained that he had to "fight" to sing on the soundtrack of the second and third films
"In the first movie, after everything was recorded, my voice was gone."
"That's how it happened."
“…… It seems very fake. Zach also mentioned that sometimes he needs to add something to the song during shooting, which means he has to go back to the studio and re record the track... "



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...in the video below.”
“Hear more (and see the pics!)”
“The fashion magazine shared a series of sneak peek pics, including one where the diva was nude, covering her lady parts with her hands and feet.”
“Prior To Publication Backgrid WATCH Celine Dion Poses Nude for Vogue During Paris Couture Week See more photos of Celine Dion Earlier this week Dion was the star of another photo shoot for Vogue...”
“Celine was wearing a turn of the century grey dress with a wide brim black hat Pictured Celine DionBACKGRID USA 6 JULY 2017 BYLINE MUST READ Best Image BACKGRIDUSA 1 310 798 9111 usasales backgrid comUK 44 208 344 2007 uksales backgrid com UK Clients Pictures Containing ChildrenPlease Pixelate Face...”
“** RIGHTS: ONLY UNITED STATES, CANADA ** Paris, FRANCE - Singer Celine Dion is spotted doing a photo shoot in the garden of the Palais Royal in Paris, France.”
“Dion stared right into the camera as photographers snapped her pic, proving once and for all that she is, indeed, a style icon who's here to stay -- and slay.”
“Prior To Publication Backgrid At one point she stepped onto a ladder highlighting the skirt s gorgeous length while holding a pair of hedge shears...”
“** RIGHTS: ONLY UNITED STATES, CANADA ** Paris, FRANCE - Singer Celine Dion is spotted dancing during a video shoot for Vogue in the garden of the Palais Royal in Paris, France.”


“… In the video below. "
"Listen again (look at the picture!)"
Vogue shared a series of peeping photos, one of which was a naked picture of the heroine, covering her female parts with her hands and feet
"Before the publication of backgrid, look at Celine Dion's nude photos for vogue at Paris fashion week. Earlier this week, I saw more photos of Celine Dion, another star of vogue..."
"Celine is wearing a gray dress at the turn of the century and a wide black hat. The photo is Celine dionbackgrid USA. July 6, 2017 signed must read best picture backgridusa 1 310 798 9111 usaseles backgrid comuk 44 208 344 2007 uktales backgrid com UK customer picture contains children, please pixel face..."
**Copyright: Paris, France - singer Celine Dion takes photos in the garden of the Royal Palace in Paris, France
"When the photographer takes her picture, Dion stares at the camera and proves once and for all that she is really a fashion icon. She will stay - and be killed."
"Before the publication of beige Ge Ge, she once walked up a ladder with a pair of fence scissors in her hand, highlighting the gorgeous length of her skirt..."
**Copyright: only Paris, France, USA, Canada - singer Celine Dion was found dancing in the garden of the Royal Palace in Paris, France while filming a video for fashion



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Simpson.”
“Caitlyn really did not like O.J.”
“"He pounds the crap out of the Times," Caitlyn writes.”
“After finding out that the New York Times had been looking "to pin down a story" on Caitlyn wearing women's clothing, Caitlyn told her publicist Alan Nierob about her feelings and had him kill it.”
“Caitlyn’s publicist first killed a story about her gender identity in the 1980s.”
“3.”
“"The actual interview took place months before I was told I would be receiving the Arthur Ashe award."”
“"It is 100 percent wrong, complete bullshit," Caitlyn writes.”
“Because the ESPYs took place so soon after Caitlyn's Diane Sawyer interview and Vanity Fair cover, rumors circulated that she only agreed to do the 20/20 special if she got the award.”
“But wants you to know that it was not a prearranged publicity stunt.”


"Simpson."
"Caitlin really doesn't like O.J."
"He brought out the rubbish in the times," Caitlin wrote
"After discovering that the New York Times had been looking for a story about Caitlin wearing women's clothes, Caitlin told her PR Alan nileb how she felt and let him kill it."
"Caitlin's publicists first reported her gender identity in the 1980s."
“3.”
"The real interview took place a few months before I was told that I would win the Arthur Ashe prize."
"It's 100 percent wrong, it's all bullshit," Caitlin wrote
"Because shortly after Caitlin's interview with Diane Sawyer and the cover of vanity fair, there was a rumor that she only agreed to take part in the 20 / 20 special with an award."
"But I want you to know that this is not a pre arranged publicity stunt."



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She is also very happy with Harry,&r Read moreOlivia Culpo Enjoys a Boat Party in Miami Ahead of the Super Bowl Olivia Culpo is having fun in Florida ahead of the Super Bowl!”
“Olivia and Harry are currently working together on the upcoming movie Don’t Worry Darling, which she is directing, in addition to starring in alongside Harry and Florence Pugh.”
“Lucy Hale has adopted a new puppy!”
“He was nominated for Best Actor for his role in Ma Rainey’s Black Bottom, Best Supporting Actor for his role in Da 5 Bloods, and was Read moreLucy Hale's New Puppy Ethel Was Once Fostered by This Famous Actress!”
“Chadwick made history becoming the first actor to be nominated for four SAG Awards in a single year.”
“The 33-year-old Creed actor took to Instagram on Friday (February 5) to pay tribute to his late Black Panther co-star after he made history with all of his nominations at the 2021 SAG Awards.”
“A few days earlier, Emily took to Instagram to Read moreMichael B Jordan Honors Late Chadwick Boseman After Making History with SAG Awards Nominations Michael B. Jordan is remembering his late friend Chadwick Boseman.”
“Emily showed off growing baby bump in a short, black sweatshirt paired with black sweatpants, a gray blazer, and tan boots while the 33-year-old film producer sported bright orange sweats for their walk.”
“The 29-year-old pregnant model and actress stepped out for an afternoon walk around the neighborhood with hubby Sebastian Bear-McClard and their dog Colombo on Saturday (February 6) in New York City.”
“Well, after all these years I have just 7 words to say to you: ‘Live from New York, it’s Saturday Night!&r Read moreEmily Ratajkowski Shows Off Bare Baby Bump While Out with Hubby Sebastian Bear-McClard Emily Ratajkowski is showing off her bare belly!”


"She's happy to be with Harry, too, & R read more about Olivia cabo having a boat party in Miami before the Super Bowl! Olivia cabo had a good time in Florida before the Super Bowl!"
"Olivia and Harry are currently working on the upcoming film don't worry, honey, which she is directing and starring in with Harry and Florence pug."
"Lucy Hale has adopted a new puppy!"
"He was nominated for Best Actor for his role in Marlene's" black butt "and best supporting actor for his role in" big five blood ", and got more information. Lucy Hale's new dog Ethel was raised by the famous actress!"
"Chadwick made history as the first actor to be nominated for four sag awards in one year."
"The 33 year old creed actor saluted his late Panther partner on instagram last Friday (February 5) after making history by winning all nominations at the 2021 sag awards ceremony."
"A few days ago, Emily read more on instagram. Michael Jordan made history with his sag nomination in memory of the late Chadwick Bosman. Jordan is remembering his late friend, Chadwick Bosman
Wearing a black sweatshirt, black sweatpants, gray blazer and tan boots, Emily showed the audience the growing baby lump, while the 33 year old filmmaker walked in a bright orange sweatshirt
"The 29 year old pregnant model and actress took a walk in the neighborhood with her husband Sebastian bear mcclard and their dog, Colombo, in New York City on Saturday (February 6) and came out for an afternoon walk."
"Well, over the years, I have only seven words to say to you:" live from New York, today is Saturday night! &Read more Emily latajkovsky shows her naked belly when she's out with her husband Sebastian bell mcclard! Emily latajkovsky shows her naked belly



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s just totally himself and doesn’t give a sh*t about what anybody else thinks, and I really like that about him.””
“This is my lady and I’m proud of it,” he wrote.”
“...a new boyfriend and they just became Instagram official...”
“On Monday, Martinez, 23, officially shut down speculation that she might appear on the upcoming season of Bachelor in Paradise by posting a flirty photo with her new man on Instagram.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In the shot, Martinez wraps her arms around Grayston Leonard.”
““My own private paradise,” she captioned the photo.”
“Leonard, 29, also shared the photo on his own account.”
“He joked that Martinez finally allowed him to post a photo of her.”
““@whats_ur_sign has finally lifted the restrictions on my Instagram.”


"He's totally his own. He doesn't care what other people think. I really like him."
"This is my wife, and I'm proud of it," he wrote
“… A new boyfriend, they just became the official of instagram... "
"On Monday, Martinez, 23, released a picture of her flirting with her new boyfriend on instagram, officially dispelling speculation that she might be in the upcoming season of singles in heaven."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On camera, Martinez is holding greiston Leonard."
"My own private paradise," she wrote under the title of the photo
"Leonard, 29, shared the photo in his own name."
"He joked that Martinez finally got him to post her picture."
"@ What's finally lifted the restrictions on my instagram."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s also the #1 series on Disney Channel UK and it will be launching on Disney Channels around the world through mid-2018.”
“The scene, and what Buffy says to Cyrus, makes for positive role models both for kids and adult viewers.”
“In the episode, Andi's friend Cyrus lets Buffy know that he has a crush on the same boy Andi does.”
“For anyone not yet familiar with the show, "Andi Mack" is a contemporary coming-of-age story about a relatable girl (Peyton Elizabeth Lee) who's trying to determine where she fits in and the many amazing ways she can live her life.”
“On the eve of her 13th birthday, Andi learns that her older sister, Bex (Lilan Bowden), is actually her mother.”
“This revelation puts Andi on an unfamiliar path of self-discovery which she navigates with the help of her loving, albeit complicated, family; her two best friends, Cyrus (Joshua Rush) and Buffy (Sofia Wylie); and her middle school crush, Jonah Beck (Asher Angel).”
“Along the way, Andi learns that sometimes the unexpected is what makes life great.”
“And in this season’s premiere episode, Cyrus begins to realize something about himself.”
“Andi is hoping for her parents Bex and Bowie (Trent Garrett) to get married, all while awkwardly sorting out her feelings for classmate Jonah.”
“Meanwhile, a second storyline depicts one of Andi's two best friends, 13-year-old Cyrus, as he's beginning to realize that he too has feelings for Jonah.”


"It's also the" 1 "series of the British Disney Channel, which will be launched on the global Disney Channel in mid-2018."
"This scene, and what Buffy said to Cyrus, set a positive example for children and adults."
"In this episode, Andy's friend Cyrus let Buffy know that he fell in love with the same boy of Andy."
"For those who are not familiar with the play," Andy Mack "is a contemporary growth story about an amiable girl (Peyton Elizabeth Lee), who is trying to determine what kind of life she is suitable for and how she can live it."
On the eve of her 13th birthday, andI learns that her sister Becks (Lilan Bowden) is actually her mother
"This revelation makes andI embark on a strange road of self discovery, with the help of her family, although it is very complicated; her two good friends, Cyrus (Joshua rush) and buffy (Sophia Wylie); and her middle school lover, Jonah Beck (Asher angel)."
"Along the way, Andy learned that sometimes unexpected things are what make life great."
"In the premiere of this season, Cyrus began to realize something about himself."
"Andy wants her parents Becks and Bowie (Trent Garrett) to get married, and embarrassedly arranges her feelings for her classmate Jonah."
Meanwhile, the second story depicts one of Andy's two best friends, Cyrus, 13, who begins to realize that he has feelings for Jonah as well



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“Please attempt to sign up again.”
“Minnesota Twins baseball game Tuesday night...”
“Luna who s currently on the road with her famous parents for Legend s Darkness and Light tour not only threw the first pitch along with a little help from her dad but scored a monogrammed Mariners jersey of her...”
“...very own hung out in the dugout with the players and even absconded with some of the players bubble gum which honestly sounds like a very successful first baseball game experience...”
“Here’s hoping we see more of Luna from the baseball diamond!”
“Get The Brief.”
“Sign up to receive the top stories you need to know right now.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“* The request timed out and you did not successfully sign up.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
"Please try to register again."
"Minnesota Twins Tuesday night..."
"Luna is currently on a legendary journey of darkness and light with her famous parents. She not only threw her first ball with the help of her father, but also won her a sailor's shirt with letters printed on it..."
“…… I hang out with the players in the lounge myself, and even abscond with some players in bubble gum. It sounds like a very successful first baseball experience... "
"I hope we can see more Luna in baseball diamonds!"
"Get the briefing."
"Sign up now to receive the top stories you need to know."
Please enter a valid email address
"* the request timed out. You did not register successfully."



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That gives you plenty of time to watch all three movies *at least* a dozen times before Ocean’s 8 lands in theaters on June 8th, 2018 (nice work there with the multiple 8s).”
“Ocean’s Eleven, Ocean’s Twelve, and Ocean’s Thirteen all land on Netflix on February 1st, so mark your calendars.”
“(You don’t have to answer if you don’t want to.)”
“Would you show up to that?”
“Does that sound like the best night ever, or is it just me?”
“Would it be weird to throw an actual Ocean’s trilogy party?”
“Yes, along with binging (and re-binging) your favorite shows, you’ll be able to binge-watch Danny Ocean steal SO MUCH STUFF, thanks to Netflix.”
“Well, thankfully, someone has been looking at my vision board, and in February all three Ocean’s movies are coming to Netflix.”
“Can’t a girl get her Danny Ocean caper fix when she wants it??”
“It’s driving me mad.”


"It gives you enough time to watch all three films, at least a dozen times before the release of ocean 8 on June 8, 2018 (a number of ocean 8 were well done)."
"Ocean 11, ocean 12 and ocean 13 all land on Netflix on February 1, so please mark your calendar."
"If you don't want to answer, you don't have to."
"Can you come?"
"Does this sound like the best night ever, or just me?"
"Would it be strange to have a real ocean trilogy party?"
"Yes, in addition to Carnival (and carnival) your favorite shows, you can enjoy watching Denny ocean steal so many things, thanks to Netflix."
"Well, thank goodness, someone has been watching my board. In February, all three movies of ocean will be on Netflix."
"Can't a girl fix her Denny ocean cloak when she wants to?"
"It's driving me crazy."



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple split sometime that year and Knox started dating Seattle poet and author Christopher Robinson in late 2015.”
“'They took that to mean I was somehow guilty of something, instead of checking their judgment and letting the evidence speak.'”
“Pictured above is a behind the scenes look at her interview with Mischa Barton Knox right on right and Barton left filmed a segment of the show speaking about how the OC actress filed a lawsuit against an ex boyfriend who allegedly tried to leak a sex tape of her...”
“One of the women she interviews is model Amber Rose (above) who has publicly shared her own experiences with 's**t-shaming'Knox's show The Scarlet Letter Reports premiere's on Facebook Watch on Wednesday.”
“Knox wants to draw attention to other women who have been shamed because of their sexuality with her new show The Scarlet Letter Reports.”
“'I'm constantly having to juggle how someone is interacting with me based on that two-dimensional version of me that has been in the public's imagination for so long.”
“'I'm in a limbo space where Amanda Knox a real person exists and Foxy Knoxy an idea of a person exists,' she said.”
“In an interview with Good Morning America on Wednesday, Knox said her Foxy Knoxy nickname often made it feel like she was living a double life.”
“'The prosecutors and police looked at me and talked about me like I reeked of sex, that I was the weird, odd one out.”
“Knox started dating and then got engaged to musician Colin Sutherland in 2015.”


"The couple broke up sometime that year, and Knox started dating Seattle poet and writer Christopher Robinson at the end of 2015."
"They think it means that I'm guilty to some extent, rather than checking their judgment and letting the evidence speak."
"The picture above is a behind the scenes photo of her interview with Misha Barton Knox. On the right is Barton. On the left is Barton shooting a segment of the program, which tells how the OC actress sued an ex boyfriend who is said to have tried to divulge her sex video..."
"One of the women she interviewed was model amber Ross (above), who shared her experience with the scarlet letter, which premieres on Facebook watch on Wednesday."
"Knox wants to draw attention to other women who are ashamed of their sexual orientation through her new show the scarlet letter."
"Based on the two-dimensional version of me that the public has long imagined, I have to constantly deal with how others interact with me."
"I'm on the edge, Amanda Knox is a real person, and fox Knox is an idea about people," she said
In an interview with Good Morning America on Wednesday, Knox said her cunning nickname often gives the impression that she is living a dual life
"Prosecutors and police looked at me and talked about me as if I smelled of sex and said I was a freak."
"Knox started dating and was engaged to musician Colin Sutherland in 2015."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It was a jolly good party, but time to leave - and then maybe come back, but time to leave for now.”
“"It's good to know when to leave the part.”
“I think that's enough of Missy now.”
“When asked whether she could return, the 50-year-old was coy, saying: "Probably not.”
“While Michelle officially announced her departure from Doctor Who earlier this year, she seems to have partially rescinded that statement at San Diego's Comic-con yesterday.”
“...finale The Doctor Falls...”
“Sign up fornow and never miss out on your favourite TV shows again It seemed to be curtains for Missy played by Michelle Gomez after she was struck by a fatal swipe from The Master during season 10 s tense...”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“We will use your email address only for sending you newsletters.”


"It was a nice party, but it's time to go - and then maybe come back, but now it's time to go."
"It's good to know when to leave the role."
"I think that's enough, miss."
When asked if she could come back, the 50 year old said shyly, "probably not."
"Although Michelle officially announced her departure from who earlier this year, she seems to have partially withdrawn her statement at yesterday's San Diego comic show."
“… In the end, the doctor fell down... "
"Sign up now and never miss your favorite TV show again. Miss, played by Michelle Gomez, seems to be her curtain after being hit by her host's fatal blow in season 10 tense. "
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"We will only use your email address to send you a press release."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Flagg proposed to Boyd last summer in Paris.”
““Thank you @joshflagg1@bboydla for inviting me in, to such a special occasion,” she captioned the video.”
“Million Dollar Listing's Josh Flagg Gets Married to Bobby BoydCongratulations are in order for Josh Flagg!”
“The Million Dollar Listing Los Angeles star wed Bobby Boyd in a Jewish wedding at the Beverly Hills Hotel in California on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple exchanged their vows in front of an extravagant floral display before heading inside the ballroom for the reception where The Daily Dish reports they did their first dance to Etta James At Last The wedding was magical we danced the night away with all of our closest family...”
“...and friends Flagg told the outlet...”
“Some of those pals included fellow Bravo stars.”
“Former Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star Eden Sassoon posted a clip of the grooms, both donning black tuxedos, walking back up the aisle as white confetti rained down on them.”
““A night never to forget ….”Flagg’s Million Dollar Listing costar David Parnes and his wife Adrian Abnosi were also among the guests.”


"Flage proposed to Boyd in Paris last summer."
"Thank you @ Josh flage 1@bboydla "Thank you for inviting me to such a special occasion," she wrote in the video
"Millions of dollars listed Josh flage and Bob Boyd are married. Josh flage's marriage is orderly!"
"The million dollar Los Angeles star married Bobbie Boyd in a Jewish Wedding at the Beverly Hills Hotel in California on Saturday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The couple exchanged their vows before a big flower show, then walked into the ballroom for a reception where they danced with ETA James for the first time, according to daily dishes. In the end, the wedding was amazing. We danced with all our closest family members for one night... "
“… Friend vlag told the media
"Some of them include other stars."
Beverly Hills star Eden Sassoon's former housewife released a video of the groom, both wearing black tuxedos and walking back down the aisle as white confetti rained on them
"A night that will never be forgotten..." Flage's million dollar star David Paines and his wife Adrian abrossi were also among the guests



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And while a show like Total Bellas may not see a similar pop in viewership—the inaugural season averaged just over 640,000 viewers—it can certainly expect to grow its viewership in the likelihood that it continues to broadcast such intriguing life events.”
“The episode, which occurred in Season 11, drew an impressive 2.28 million viewers.”
“Credit: Eonline.comBrie Bella has adapted quite well to life after WWE as the Divas-era star has been featured in Total Divas, Total Bellas and the popular Bella Twins YouTube channel which, in partnership with WWE, has amassed a staggering 500,000 subscribers in just under a year.”
“The newest addition to the Bella dynasty could be its most important in terms of furthering a brand that has could one day put the Bella Twins on equal footing as some of the biggest giants in both reality television and digital media.”
“Baby Bella Raises Profile of WWE's Reality TV PortfolioIn its Q4 2016 earnings report, WWE singled out the Bella Twins YouTube channel and Total Bellas as highlights of its growing presence in digital media and reality television, respectably.”
“On the strength of reality shows like Total Bellas, WWE was able to increase its television revenues by 23 percent, compared to Q4 2015, with revenues of $68.6 million.”
“With the first Bella baby now conceived, Nikki Bella, Brie Bella, John Cena and Daniel Bryan stand to reap the benefits of surging interest in their monetized post-WWE lives.”
“Credit: WWE.comBirdie Joe Playlist will Attract Millions of Viewers on YouTubeSpecial events have translated to large viewership numbers on the Bella Twins YouTube channel.”
“All four of the aforementioned stars are either retired or part-time performers.”
“The Bella Twins YouTube channel has allowed fans continued access to their lives while they spend time away from the world wide leader and its famed squared circle.”


"Although programs like total Bellas may not have a similar popularity trend in ratings, the average ratings in the first quarter are only more than 640000, and its ratings will certainly increase, because it is likely to continue to broadcast such interesting life events."
"This episode took place in Season 11 and attracted 2.28 million viewers."
"Credit: Eonline.comBrie Bella has been well adapted to the life after WWE, because the star of the divas era has appeared in total divas, total Bellas and the popular Bella twins YouTube channel, which has cooperated with WWE and accumulated an amazing 500000 subscribers in less than a year. "
"The latest members of the Bella dynasty may be one of its most important brands. One day, the Bella twins will become some of the biggest giants in the field of reality TV and digital media."
"Baby Bella has increased the popularity of WWE reality show portfolio. In its Q4 2016 earnings report, WWE specifically pointed out that Bella twins YouTube channel and total Bellas are its growing highlights in digital media and reality TV, which are worthy of respect."
"With reality shows like total Bellas, WWE's TV revenue grew 23% to $68.6 million from the fourth quarter of 2015."
"With the birth of the first baby Bella, Nicky Bella, bribella, John Seine and Daniel Blaine will benefit enormously from their monetized life after World War II."
"Credit: WWE.comBirdie The company, Joe playlist, will attract millions of YouTube viewers, especially on the Bella twins YouTube channel
"These four stars are either retired or part-time."
"The Bella twins YouTube channel keeps fans in touch with their lives as they move away from the global leader and his famous square circle."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“8:00 a.m. Thursday, Oct. 19: Updated Bialik's apology.”
“"I support these women as we seek out and demand accountability from the only ones responsible for assault and rape: the people who perpetrate these heinous crimes."”
“Mayim Bialik has come under fire from several of her Hollywood peers after the Big Bang Theory actress wrote an op-ed column titled "Being a Feminist in Harvey Weinstein's World," for the New York Times.”
“In the piece published on Friday, Bialik, 41, describes coming of age as a "prominent-nosed, awkward, geeky, Jewish 11-year-old," and being aware that she was different from her onscreen contemporaries of the late '80s, who she says were praised for their curves.”
“"I have always had an uncomfortable relationship with being employed in an industry that profits on the objectification of women," she writes, adding that from an early age she made "wise" personal choices in order to protect herself, including dressing "modestly" and not acting "flirtatiously" with men.”
“"I am entirely aware that these types of choices might feel oppressive to many young feminists," she added.”
“"Women should be able to wear whatever they want.”
“They should be able to flirt however they want with whomever they want."”
“Despite her concession that it shouldn t be the duty of women to police our own behavior the suggestion that her strategies would be helpful in staving off sexual predators enraged many people on social media including Gabrielle Union Emily Ratajkowski and Patricia Arquette who all posted that dressing conservatively...”
“...is not effective many also accused Bialik of victim blaming...”


"Thursday, October 19, 8:00 a.m.: updated bialik's apology."
"I support these women because we seek and hold accountable those responsible for attacks and rapes: those who committed these heinous crimes."
"After the heroine of big bang wrote a review article for the New York Times entitled" be a feminist in Harvey Weinstein's world ", maim bialik was attacked by several Hollywood colleagues."
In the article published on Friday, bialik, 41, described her growth as a "nose protruding, clumsy, eccentric, 11 year old Jew." she realized that she was different from her peers on screen in the late 1980s, and she said their curves were praised
"I have always been uneasy about being employed in an industry that benefits from women's objectification," she wrote, adding that in order to protect herself, she has made "wise" personal choices since childhood, including dressing "modestly" and not "flirting" with men
"I am fully aware that these types of choices can depress many young feminists," she added
"Women wear whatever they want."
"They should be able to flirt with anyone they want."
"Despite her concession that women should not be held responsible for our own actions, her strategy will help to banish predators, which has infuriated many people on social media, including Emily ratajokowski and Patricia Arquette of the Gabriel League, who conservatively published this article."
“… It's ineffective, and many people blame bialik's victims for it. "



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Father-of-three: Coco's 60-year-old husband of 16 years is also father to 26-year-old son Ice (R) and daughter LeTesha (L), who's turning 42 later this month (pictured January 28)”
“Fans can catch more of the Body Count frontman as NYPD Detective Odafin 'Fin' Tutuola in the 19th season of Law & Order: SVU, which airs Wednesdays on NBC.”
“The Cocolicious designer - turning 39 next week - just loves twinning with her two-year-old mini-me as they posed in their Sugar Dollz 'Monster Mermaid' bikinis.”
“The mommy & me swimsuits and matching headscarves featured the same green-and-purple color scheme as Disney princess Ariel.”
“Scroll down for video'Striking more poses!'”
“Coco Austin and her daughter Chanel Nicole spent the third day of their Bahamas vacation chilling poolside at the SLS Baha Mar in Nassau on Monday'Having the time of our lives down in Bahamas!'”
“...the buxom blonde model wrote to her 14M social media followers.”
“'We made it out just in time before a big storm hit NYC.'”
“Coco born Nicole has been stressing about her sassy know it all dimpled princess following in the famous footsteps of herself and father Ice T She s definitely a performer which I was a little worried about because I don t really want her to be a performer Austin admitted...”
“...to People on December 4”


"Father of three: Coco's 60 year old husband, 16, is the father of her 26 year old son ice (right) and daughter letesha (left), who will turn 42 later this month (photo taken on January 28)"
"Fans can see more corpse count leaders in law and order: SVU season 19. They're New York police detective audafen Tutuola, who will air on NBC on Wednesday."
"The cocolicious designer, who turns 39 next week, loves to pair up with her two-year-old mini me and pose in a candy Doll" monster Mermaid "bikini
"Mommy and I use the same green and purple color scheme as Disney Princess Ariel in their swimsuits and matching headscarves."
"Scroll down to see the video 'make more poses!"
"Coco Austin and her daughter Chanel Nicole spent their third day in the Bahamas on Monday at the SLS BAHA Mar pool in Nassau." we spent our whole life in the Bahamas! "
“…… The plump blonde model wrote to 14 million social media fans
"We arrived just in time before the big storm hit New York City."
"Nicole, born in coco, has been emphasizing that her fashionable and omniscient dimple Princess follows her own and her father's famous footprints. She is definitely a performer. I'm a little worried because I really don't want her to be a performer. Austin admits that..."
“… December 4 for people



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In a statement, the Bahamas Ministry of Tourism said it was "extremely disappointed in the way the events unfolded," and apologized for the "total disorganization and chaos."”
“Here's their tropical private island owned by Escobar!”
“As of Friday afternoon, several attendees claimed they were stranded on the Exuma Cays — scenes that sounded like Coachella meets "Lord of the Flies."”
“Music, Lil Yachty, Major Lazer and Migos had also been slated to perform at the glitzy two-weekend festival, which had been hyped on social media by Kendall Jenner and other celebrities.”
“G.O.O.D.”
“The band bailed on Fyre almost a full day before its Friday kickoff.”
“#fyrefestival pic.twitter.com/I8d0UlSNbd — Tr3vor (@trev4president) April 28, 2017Blink-182 seemed to sense impending disaster.”
“#FyreFestival pic.twitter.com/TNzBDbNAUJ — FyreFestivalFraud (@FyreFraud) April 27, 2017The dinner that @fyrefestival promised us was catered by Steven Starr is literally bread, cheese, and salad with dressing.”
“Early report is that many of the tents aren't assembled.”
“A spokeswoman for Fyre Media Inc. told the paper that "artists have been paid according to terms."”


In a statement, the Bahamas Tourism Department said it was "extremely disappointed with the development of the situation" and apologized for "total confusion and confusion"
"This is a tropical private island owned by escoba!"
As of Friday afternoon, several participants claimed that they were trapped on the reef of exsuma, which sounds like cochella met the "king of flies"
"Music, lil Yachty, major Lazer and migos are also scheduled to perform at this magnificent two weekend Music Festival, with Kendall Jenner and other celebrities hyping on social media."
“G.O.O.D.”
"The band walked out of Fairey almost all day before Friday."
“#fyrefestival” pic.twitter.com/I8d0UlSNbd -Tr3vor (@ trev4 president) 2017blink-182 seems to feel the coming disaster
“#FyreFestival” pic.twitter.com/TNzBDbNAUJ -Fyrefestival fraud (@ fyrefraud) on April 27, 2017, @ fyrefestival promised us that the dinner was provided by Steven Starr, which was actually bread, cheese and salad with seasoning. "
"Early reports were that many of the tents were not assembled."
"Artists are paid on terms," a Fyre media spokesman told the paper



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Murray kept her gown — which was her “biggest splurge” for the wedding — under wraps for months.”
“Now after nearly a decade together, “we share the same beliefs, countless interests and passions.”Murray and Geyer are self-proclaimed “foodies” and splurged on fresh ingredients and a decadent menu by Field to Table catering.”
“Dean Geyer and Jillian Murray are officially husband and wife!”
“The entertainers — who got engaged last December — exchanged custom vows in front of 75 of their closest family and friends at a boutique venue in Santa Ynez Valley on Thursday, PEOPLE can exclusively reveal.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““She is the love of my life,” Geyer said before the wedding.”
““She is gorgeous, strong, hardworking and always the life of the party.”“Having my husband write me the most beautiful vows to me and then sing to me later in the evening was the highlight of my entire event,”says Murray.”
“Adds Geyer I thought I d already seen Jillian at her most gorgeous but her in that dress walking down the aisle took the meaning of hot to the next level Image zoom Credit Jana Williams Photography The Glee and Australian Idol alum 31 and the Code Black actress 33”
“...met on the set of their film Never Back Down 2 seven years ago...”
““From the beginning, I knew I liked her,” says Geyer.”


Murray has kept her "biggest spendthrift" wedding dress secret for months
"Now we've been together for nearly ten years," we share the same beliefs, countless interests and passions. "Murray and Gail call themselves" gourmets, "and they splurge on fresh ingredients and decadent menus
"Dean Gail and Gillian Murray are officially married!"
The artists, who were engaged last December, exchanged customized vows in front of 75 of their closest family and friends at a boutique in the valley of St. ines on Thursday, it can be revealed exclusively
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She's the love of my life," Gail said before the wedding
"She's beautiful, strong, hard-working and has always been the focus of the party." "Having my husband write me the most beautiful vows and sing to me at night is the highlight of my whole activity," Murray said
"Geyer added that I thought I'd seen Jillian at her prettiest moment, but she was walking down the aisle in that dress, taking sexiness to the next level, thanks to Jana Williams' photography of glee and Australian idol 31 alumni and dark star 33."
“… We met seven years ago on the set of their movie "never flinch 2."
"From the beginning, I knew I liked her," Gail said



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now I feel inadequate.””
“The first half-dozen times.”
“Awards and didn t miss a beat with his breakfast preparation...”
“The late-night host whipped up a batch of very special pancakes for his 3½-year-old daughter Jane, whom it seems didn’t have quite as late a bedtime as her dad judging from the excited look on her face in an Instagram photo he shared Monday morning.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Each circular flapjack on Jane’s plate is a different color, with black and red designs and small holes cut into the middle to resemble donuts.”
““When your 3 yr old wakes up at 6:56 am the morning after #Oscars, #pancakes disguised as #donuts,” Kimmel, 50, captioned the photo.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Kimmel has had a busy 24 hours.”


"Now I feel like I'm not enough."
"The first half."
"The prize and his breakfast preparation didn't miss any beat..."
"The late night host prepared a batch of very special pancakes for his three-and-a-half-year-old daughter Jane. From the excited expression on her face in instagram photos he shared on Monday morning, it seems that Jane didn't go to bed as late as her father."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Each round pancake on Jane's plate has a different color, with black and red patterns and a hole in the middle, similar to a doughnut."
"When your 3-year-old woke up at 6:56 a.m. after the Oscars, the pancakes disguised as doughnuts," Kim Mel, 50, wrote in the title of the photo
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Kimmel is busy 24 hours a day."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It still remains unknown whether Duchess of Cambridge Kate Middleton will serve in the wedding party, though the Palace also confirmed that she will be attending alongside Prince William.”
“As previously reported, Kensington Palace confirmed that both Prince George and Princess Charlotte will have starring roles in the wedding as a page boy and a bridesmaid.”
“While Markle has scored a place card at what’s expected to be the wedding of the year, the Canadian native will miss out on loads of cuteness during the ceremony.”
“Just this past Easter weekend, Prince Harry joined Markle in Toronto in lieu of formal Easter festivities with Queen Elizabeth II.”
“One source tells the magazine that an engagement is expected sometime in 2017.”
“The actress also recently joined Harry in Jamaica for his best friend Tom Inskip’s destination nuptials.”
“According to Us, this isn’t the first wedding the two have attended together.”
“Markle’s invite to the high-profile nuptials indicates that she and Prince Harry are getting rather serious.”
“According to Us Weekly, the outdoor party will be held at the Middleton family’s Bucklebury estate later that evening, and a luxury tent will be erected on the grounds of the garden.”
“While the Suits actress will not witness the nuptials, Markle has secured a seat at the couple’s reception.”


"Whether Kate Middleton, Duchess of Cambridge, will attend the wedding is still unknown, but the palace has confirmed that she will be with Prince William."
"As mentioned earlier, Kensington Palace confirmed that both Prince George and Princess Charlotte will be the leading actor and bridesmaid at the wedding."
"Although Marcel got a place card at this year's wedding, the Canadian Native will miss out on many lovely things during the wedding."
Just in the past Easter weekend, Prince Harry joined mackle in Toronto to replace the official Easter celebration with Queen Elizabeth II
"A source told the magazine that the engagement is expected sometime in 2017."
"The actress recently joined Harry at the destination wedding of his best friend Tom Inskip in Jamaica."
"According to us, it's not the first wedding they've been to together."
"Marcel's invitation to this high-profile wedding shows that she and Prince Harry are becoming quite serious."
"According to us weekly, later that evening, the outdoor party will be held at buckbury manor of the Middleton family and a luxury tent will be set up on the ground of the garden."
"Although the actress in suit won't witness the wedding, Marcel has won a seat at the reception for the couple."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You can help make this happen.”
“As Kate says, “You don’t need to wear fur to be beautiful.” All animals, whether human or not, should be able to wear their own skins.”
“...steal what rightfully belongs to these animals...”
“She says I think when you see yourself in the mirror and there s no regrets that makes you a beautiful person It s unfair that foxes minks rabbits dogs and cats are bludgeoned stomped electrocuted or gassed to death or even skinned while still alive so that humans can...”
“...clothing and that beauty comes from within...”
“The tagline of the stunning image in which she poses in an icy snowscape wearing nothing but frost on her bare skin reads I d Rather Go Naked Than Wear Fur In our exclusive behind the scenes video the international star explains that being beautiful has nothing to do with...”
“The actor braved frigid weather in NYC today to unveil her breathtaking ad.”
“Known for being brave and outspoken, Kate—who comes from acting royalty in Mexico—isn’t one to shy away from fighting for what she believes in, and this time, she’s taking on the animal-abusing fur industry to expose the suffering and death of animals.”
“Mega-celebrity and devoted animal advocate Kate del Castillo, also recognized as one of the most influential and beautiful women by People en Español magazine, joins forces with PETA once more.”


"You can help achieve that."
As Kate said, "you don't need fur to be beautiful." All animals, human or not, should be able to wear their own skins
“… Steal what these animals deserve... "
"She said," I think when you see yourself in the mirror and have no regrets to make you a beautiful person, foxes, minks, rabbits, dogs and cats are killed by sticks, tramples, electric shocks or poison gas, or even skinned while alive, so that humans can... "
“… Clothes and beauty come from within... "
"In our exclusive behind the scenes video, she poses in the cold snow in her bare skin, only wearing frost. The slogan of this amazing photo is: I would rather be naked than wearing fur. The international star explained that beauty has nothing to do with it.... "
"The actor opened her thrilling advertisement today in the cold weather of New York."
"Kate, known for her bravery and outspokenness, comes from the performing royal family in Mexico. She is not a person who avoids fighting for her faith. This time, she will take over the fur industry of animal abuse and expose the pain and death of animals."
"Kate del Castillo, a super celebrity and enthusiastic animal advocate, is also recognized by the Spanish people as one of the most influential and beautiful women. She once again joined forces with PETA."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And yet war has done things to them that make their reunion just as emotional as if they had been best friends, and perspective that helps them look back on the kids they were and wonder how things might have been different.”
“But Jon and Sansa were not close: he was sullen and removed, she was judgmental, and they never really bonded.”
“Those questions are not necessarily a problem—it gives the show a point of dramatic interest, provided that their return explains the missing time and reactivates our interest in the character.”
“Accordingly, however, it becomes less viable for the show to ignore a character for extended periods without the audience starting to ask questions.”
“Although episodes like “Blackwater,” “The Watchers On The Wall,” and “Hardhome”—among others—have replicated this tight focus on a single scenario, most episodes jump between stories often, rarely creating the same sense of immersion.”
“By comparison, though, the show can’t necessarily do the same.”
“The singular focus of the chapters is incredibly immersive, reconnecting you to a location, a set of characters, and a situation, and then spending a decent amount of time there.”
“While I would sometimes get impatient if I went too long between certain characters’ chapters—although this was not the case with those ADWD Bran chapters—I didn’t find myself spending each chapter wondering what those characters were up to.”
“AdvertisementReading the books, though, I got used to these absences.”
“And so while we could focus on Bran’s absence from A Feast For Crows—mirrored by his absence in season five—we could also focus on his absence for a 21-chapter stretch in A Dance With Dragons.”


"However, the impact of the war on them makes them emotional when they meet again, as if they were best friends, and this view helps them look back on their children in the past and wonder how things will be different."
"But Jon and Sansa are not close: he's depressed and driven away, and Sansa is a picky person, and they never really get in touch."
"These problems are not necessarily a problem, as long as their return can explain the missed time and re stimulate our interest in the role, it will bring dramatic interest to the show."
"However, it is not feasible to ignore a character for a long time without the audience starting to ask questions."
"Although dramas like black water, the catcher on the wall and tough man all copy this close attention to a single scene, most dramas often jump between stories and rarely produce the same immersion."
"By contrast, though, the show may not be able to do the same."
"What's unique about these chapters is the incredible immersion that reconnects you to a place, a group of characters and a scene, and then spends quite a long time there."
"Although I sometimes get impatient if I spend too much time between certain character chapters, although this is not the case with those adwd bran chapters - I don't find myself spending every chapter thinking about what these characters are doing."
"But after reading these books, I'm used to this kind of absence."
"So while we can focus on bran's absence from a crow feast, which reflects his absence in season 5, we can also focus on his absence from Chapter 21 in dance with the dragon."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Vote now to decide who will take home the trophy on July 10!”
“Best Play: All of these reigned on the SportsCenter Top 10, but which one will wear the ESPY crown?”
“In a crowded field of MVP candidates, vote now to determine who will walk to the ESPY podium.”
“Best Athletes: So many athletes, so little time.”
“Vote now to decide which of these achievements is truly ESPY-worthy.”
“Vote Now:Best Performance: The past 12 months have given us many heartwarming and heartbreaking moments.”
“Make sure to tune in to The ESPYS, hosted by Tracy Morgan, on July 10 at 8 pm | 7 pm central on ABC.”
“Welcome to the 2019 ESPYS presented by Capital One, where the awards are handed out by you, the fans, by letting your voice be heard in our polls!”


"Vote now on who will win the trophy on July 10!"
"Best play: all of these occupy the top 10 of the sports center, but who will wear espy's crown?"
"With a crowd of MVP candidates, vote now on who will be on the ESPY podium."
"The best athletes: too many athletes, too little time."
"Now vote on which of these achievements is really worth showing off."
"Vote now: the best performance: the past 12 months have given us many warm and heartbreaking moments."
"Please be sure to watch the espys program hosted by Tracy Morgan on ABC CCTV from 8pm to 7pm on July 10."
"Welcome to the 2019 espys award ceremony held by capital one. The award ceremony is held by you, the fans. Let your voice be heard in our opinion poll!"



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Us Weekly exclusively revealed that Alwyn was backstage at Madison Square Garden in New York City on Friday, December 8, to support Swift before her performance at Z100’s Jingle Ball.”
“He seemed completely besotted!”News of the “Blank Space” songstress and the British actor’s romance first broke in May, though there are reports that they began quietly dating months before then.”
““He couldn’t help singing along throughout her performance and barely took his eyes off her.”
““Joe looked so proud of Taylor as she commanded the stage in front of 20,000 screaming fans,” one witness told the British newspaper.”
“The Sun obtained a video of him filming his girlfriend’s “Shake It Off” performance from the sound booth at the O2 Arena.”
“...in the night...”
“2 26pm PST Taylor singing along to Ed Sheeran at the Jingle Bell Ball in London yesterday stefflondon A post shared by Taylor Swift Updates taylorswift updates on Dec 11 2017 at 5 45am PST As thrilled as fans were Alwyn was just as excited during Swift s set earlier...”
“Another social media user wrote TAYLOR AND JOE ARE SWAYING WITH HER HEAD IN HIS F KING SHOULDER KISSING TO PERFECT I GOTTA LEAVE THE ARENA Taylor and Joe Alwyn watching the Jingle Bell Ball together A post shared by Taylor Swift Updates taylorswift updates on Dec 10 2017 at...”
“Another concertgoer wrote, “TAYOR AND JOE ARE SWAYING WHILST ED SINGS PERFECT.”“taylor and joe… literally danced to perfect together like excuse me while I go call 911,” a third eyewitness quipped.”
“KEPT LOOKING AT EACH OTHER AND KISSING one excited fan tweeted...”


American weekly exclusively revealed that on Friday, December 8, Alvin was backstage at Madison Square Garden in New York, supporting swift to perform at the jingle ball of Z100
"He seems to be completely fascinated! "The news about the love affair between the singer and the British actor came out as early as may, but it is reported that they began to date quietly a few months ago."
"Throughout her performance, he couldn't help singing along and hardly looked away from her."
"When Taylor conducted the stage in front of 20000 screaming fans, Joe looked very proud of her," one witness told the British newspaper
The sun got a video from the studio at the O2 Arena of his girlfriend's "shake off" performance
“… At night... "
"At 2:26 p.m. PST, Taylor sang with ED Sheeran at the Bell Dance in London yesterday. Steflon and Taylor Swift shared a post and updated it. On December 11, 2017, at 5:45 a.m. PST, Taylor Swift updated the latest news of Taylor Swift. Fans were excited, and Alvin was in London It's just as exciting in the earlier show of swift. "
"Another social media user wrote that Taylor and Joe are rocking on his king F's shoulder and kissing her head, perfect I'm leaving the arena. Taylor and Joe Alvin watch the jingling bell ball together. Taylor Swift shared a post update. Taylor Swift updated on December 10, 2017 in..."
Another concert goer wrote, "Tyrol and Joe are rocking, and ED sings perfectly." "Tyler and Joe It's really perfect, like sorry, I'll call 911, "joked the third witness
"Keep looking at each other, kissing an excited fan and saying on Weibo..."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It seems that – sun or sleet, rain or shine – there’s no pleasing everyone when it comes to the changeable American weather.”
“There is disagreement in the WEST as 26% of those who dislike its weather say it is too rainy and 36% say it is too dry.”
“In a survey of the four seasons, summer rates high as 25% of Americans look forward to the warmer weather.”
“Fall is the favorite season of the nation, with 29% responding that they prefer an autumnal climate.”
“A winter chill is only preferred by 7% of us.”
“Summertime activities like swimming, sunbathing and outdoor sports may be why the solstice rates higher among younger than older people.”
“While for the majority (30%) of 18-34 year old Americans summer is their favorite season, this is the case for just 20% of those aged 55 and over.”
“37% of 55s and older prefer spring above all – the perfect time of year for gardening and enjoying the warmer weather before the height of summer.”
“The biggest proportion of winter fans was in the West and the South – where temperatures can reach over 100 degrees Fahrenheit in July – as 14% of westerners and 11% of southerners prefer cooler climes.”
“Those living in America’s Heartland came out as the most dissatisfied with their climate.”


"It seems that in the changeable weather of the United States, whether it is sunny or rainy, not everyone is satisfied."
"Western countries hold different opinions on this. 26% people don't like the weather there, and 36% think it's too dry."
In a survey of four seasons, up to 25 percent of Americans expect warmer weather in summer
"Autumn is the most popular season in the country, with 29% saying they prefer autumn weather."
"Only 7% of people like the cold in winter."
"Summer activities like swimming, sunbathing and outdoor sports may be the reason why young people have a higher winter solstice rate than the elderly."
"For most Americans aged 18-34 (30 percent), summer is their favorite season, compared with only 20 percent of people aged 55 and over."
"Among people over 55, 37% like spring best - the best time of the year to garden and enjoy the warm weather before midsummer."
"The largest proportion of winter fans are in the western and southern regions, where the temperature can reach above 100 degrees Fahrenheit in July, because 14% of westerners and 11% of southerners like cool weather."
"Those who live in the heart of the United States are the least satisfied with their climate."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Morgan was looking forward to hitting the 25-year mark of performing the anthem for NHL teams (which he would achieve during the 2018-19 season), but will now spend his summer doing some “soul-searching.””
“...from some fans in attendance...”
“Carrie Underwood, Luke Bryan, Little Big Town, Vince Gill, and Lady Antebellum have all taken the ice during the Predators home games in the first two rounds.”
“As the Predators hosted their first Western Conference Final game in franchise history, they also hosted a very special anthem singer.”
“VideoKeith Urban, a native Australian and four-time Grammy Award winner, performed the Star-Spangled Banner for the first time in his career.”
““I’ve lived in America for 25 years.”
“I’ve never been asked to sing the National Anthem, so it’s such an honor to do it here in Nashville for the Preds,” Urban said to NHL Network’s Jon Morosi after his performance.”
“Urban also spoke about how much the moment meant to him.”
““It’s a nerve-wracking experience, but above all, it’s a huge honor,” Urban said.”
““For me, for all the years I’ve lived here, it’s probably one of the proudest moments ever in my life.”Urban, who is married to Nicole Kidman, said while he is a fan of the Predators, his wife is definitely the biggest fan in their household.”


"Morgan was looking forward to singing the national anthem for the NHL team for 25 years (he will achieve this goal in 2018-19), but now he will do some 'reflection' in the summer."
“… From some of the fans present... "
"Carrie Underwood, Luke Bryan, small town, Vince Gill and the former lady all had ice in the first two home games of the predators
"While predator held the first Western finals in franchise history, they also held a very special national anthem concert."
"Videokeith urban is a native Australian who has won four Grammy Awards and performed the Star Spangled Banner for the first time in his career."
"I've lived in America for 25 years."
"I've never been asked to sing the national anthem, so it's an honor to sing the national anthem for preds in Nashville," urban told NHL's Jon morrosi after the show
"Urban also talked about how important this moment is to him."
"It's a thrilling experience, but most importantly, it's a great honor," said urban
"For me, having lived here for so many years is probably one of the proudest moments of my life." Urban married Nicole Kidman and said that although he was a fan of predator, his wife was definitely the biggest fan of the family



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Simmons has denied all allegations of assault.”
“The Blast broke the story, Russell has been accused of rape by another woman who claims the mogul assaulted her at his Los Angeles and New York home.”
“I have known him to be a caring and supportive father and someone who has worked tirelessly to uplift disenfranchised communities."”
“...that time...”
“When asked about how the family is holding up amid the scandal she said We re ok Lee Simmons later went on Instagram and elaborated explaining These allegations against him are nothing like the person I have known in all...”
“When asked point blank if she thought her ex-husband was innocent, Lee Simmons said "Yeah, I do."”
“She made it very clear that she still loves Russell and they remain friends.”
“Kimora Lee Simmons was in Beverly Hills when a photographer asked her about the allegations against Russell Simmons.”
“Russell Simmons ex-wife is standing by him in the wake of several women accusing the Def Jam mogul of sexual assault, including rape.”


"Simmons denied all charges of attack."
"The explosion broke the story that Russell was accused of raping another woman who claimed the tycoon had attacked her homes in Los Angeles and New York."
"I know that he is a caring and supportive father who works tirelessly to promote the disenfranchised community."
“… That time... "
"When asked about the family's performance in the scandal, she said we were OK, and Lee Simmons later explained in detail on instagram that the charges against him were totally different from those I knew..."
Asked directly if she thought her ex husband was innocent, Lee Simmons said, "yes, I am."
"She made it very clear that she still loved Russell and they were still friends."
"Kimora Lee Simmons was at Beverly Hills when a photographer asked her about the charges against Russell Simmons."
Russell Simmons's ex-wife stood next to him, and several women accused the tycoon of sexual assault, including rape



Number  201
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What a peak though.””
“Bardi, this is the only thing that matters!!!”
“This week Cardi B, social media star turned musician, became the first female rapper in 19 years to reach No 1 on the US Billboard chart, knocking Taylor Swift off the top spot.”
“It is a moment that has sent reverberations through the music industry not only because it highlighted how few female rappers have topped the charts before Cardi B Lauryn Hill was the last to do it with Doo Wop That Thing in 1998 but also because of her distinctive rise...”
“...to becoming a chart topping rapper with song Bodak Yellow Money Moves...”
“Born Belcalis Almanzar to a Dominican father and a Trinidadian mother, this 24-year-old New Yorker’s ascent to fame, as an onslaught of think-pieces have noted, has been meteoric, even by today’s standards.”
“It is a trajectory that moves from college drop-out to stripper to Instagram influencer to reality star to mainstream rapper with the vocal support of Missy Elliott and Nicki Minaj, and whose songs are being covered by Janet Jackson.”
“She also has over 10 million followers on Instagram, and she hasn’t released an album.”
“Facebook Twitter Pinterest Cardi B performing in New York.”
“Photograph Michael Loccisano Getty Images for Airbnb Almanzar s viral online presence from 2014 built on extremely honest stream of consciousness style videos and Instagram posts landed her a spot on the sixth season of VH1 s reality series Love Hip Hop New York in 2015 and she stayed for...”


"But it's a peak."
"Buddy, that's the only thing that matters!!"
"This week, social media star turned musician Katie B became the first female rapper to top the U.S. billboard charts in 19 years, sweeping Taylor Swift from the top."
"It's a moment of repercussion in the music world, not only because it highlights how few female rappers made it to the top of the charts before Cardi B Lauryn Hill's last collaboration with Doo wop in 1998, but also because of her unique rise..."
“… Become a chart top rapper with song bodak yellow money action... "
"The 24-year-old new Yorker was born in Dominica, his father was a Dominica, his mother was a Trinidad, and his road to fame, as many people have noticed, has been smooth even by today's standards."
"With the support of Missy Elliott and Nicky Minagi, this is a track from college dropout to stripper, to instagram influencer, to reality show star, to mainstream rapper, and Janet Jackson is covering their songs."
"She also has more than 10 million fans on instagram, and she hasn't released an album yet."
"Facebook Twitter pinterest Cardi B performs in New York."
"Since 2014, airbnb almanzar's photos of Michael locciano Getty, which are wildly spread on the Internet, are based on extremely honest stream of consciousness style videos and instagram posts, making her appear in the sixth season of VH1 reality TV series" love hip hop New York "in 2015. She left behind..."



Number  202
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’d never seen such amazing looking American food, and I was distracted to say the least.”
“And my boots were very new and stiff, and my clothes was itchy, and all I could think about really was how desperately I wanted to get to the catering truck because down the hill, there it was.”
“So [acting] was just a short step from the games I played, the imaginary games which all children do.”
“I don’t think we grew up as quickly.”
“Television wasn’t such a big thing, there were no iPhones or iPods or computers, and we stayed living in our imaginations as children.”
“I started acting at a time when children were younger.”
“If you can’t turn in a halfway decent performance with that kind of support around you, obviously you aren’t supposed to be doing it.”
“I worked with wonderful, experienced actors and actresses and excellent directors.”
“HAYLEY MILLS: The majority of the movies that I made when I was a child [were] very well-written.”
“What do you think now of your performances as a child actor?”


"I've never seen such a good American dish before. At least I'm upset."
"And my boots are new and hard, and my clothes itch. All I can think of is how desperately I want to get on the dining car, because it's there when I go down the mountain."
"So the game I played with, the imaginative game all the kids played with, was just a small step away."
"I don't think we're growing that fast."
"TV is not a big deal. Without iPhones, iPods or computers, we lived in imagination when we were children."
"I started acting when the children were young."
"If you can't give up a good result halfway with this kind of support, obviously you shouldn't do it."
"I've worked with great, experienced actors and actresses and great directors."
"Haley mills: most of the movies I made when I was a kid were well written."
"What do you think of your performance as a child actor now?"



Number  203
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I feel very male.”
“It’s just a comfort thing.”Last year, he told The Guardian, “In no way do I feel like a woman.”
“The history of pop music made by women but produced by men is often one of erasure.”
“That’s traditionally how it’s worked.”
“...it s singing jack antonoff songs she wrote in a now deleted tweet...”
“After GQ interviewed him their profile included the line He s still writing Jack Antonoff songs they just happen to be sung by people like Lorde now Lorde took issue with the characterization Knew there was a way to describe the personal and skillful work that I do turns out...”
“In late October, he appeared alongside Lana De l Rey for her performance of “How to Disappear” at an Apple event in Brooklyn.”
“...pop maker and ally with a unique respect for women he inevitably winds up consuming a lot of their spotlight...”
“It s enough to warrant articles like this Noisey post JACK ANTONOFF YOU STAY AWAY FROM THE DIXIE CHICKS in which the entire body is no no no no nope Because while Antonoff might be highly favored among artists we love promoted often via music critics as a fresh new...”


"I feel very masculine."
"It's just a consolation." Last year, he told the guardian, "I don't feel like a woman at all."
"The history of pop music written by women and by men is often a history of obliteration."
"It's the traditional way of working."
“… It's singing Jack antov's song she wrote on a deleted tweet... "
"After GQ interviewed him, their personal information included that he was still writing Jack Antonov's songs. They just happened to be sung by people like Lord. Now Lord has raised an objection to the role building. He knows that there is a way to describe my personal and skillful work results..."
In late October, he appeared with Lana del Rey at an apple event in Brooklyn to perform how to disappear for her
“… Pop music producers and allies have a unique respect for women, and he will inevitably become their focus in the end. "
"It's enough to prove that an article like this noisy Jack Antonov post, you should stay away from Dixie Chicks, because in these chicks, the whole body is unhealthy, because Antonov may be popular among our favorite artists, and we often promote it through music critics as a new newcomer..."



Number  204
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’re debating between three and four right now.””
“Now it s nice Roper Tolbert s next trip will include a visit to see her fellow Bachelor in Paradise alum and best friend Carly Waddell at the end of March so she and Emerson can meet Waddell and husband Evan Bass new baby girl Isabella Evelyn whom they welcomed...”
“The reality stars, who fell in love on season 2 of Bachelor in Paradise, welcomed their daughter Emerson “Emmy” Avery in August and now reveal to PEOPLE the ways their lives — and marriage — have shifted.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It changes your priorities in life and makes you think of things a little differently,” says Tolbert, 30.”
““Watching Jade be a mom has been pretty awesome.”Adds Roper Tolbert, 31, “I love being a mom.”
“We’ve been enjoying just being new parents and every new thing is so exciting for us.”
“She’s a little treasure.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Image zoom Jade and Tanner Tolbert with daughter Emerson Credit Jade Tolbert Instagram Image zoom Jade and Tanner Tolbert with daughter Emerson Credit Jade Tolbert Instagram Of their 6 month old s most recent milestones the couple says she has started eating solid foods rolling over making consonant sounds and...”


"We are now debating between three and four."
"It's good now. Roper Talbot's next trip will include a visit to her bachelor colleague and best friend Carly Waddell in paradise at the end of March, so that she and Emerson can meet Waddell and her husband Evan Bass's new baby girl, Isabella Evelyn, and they welcome her..."
"Reality TV stars fell in love in the second season of" Bachelor in heaven "and welcomed their daughter Emerson" Amy "avery in August. Now they reveal to people that their lives and marriages have changed."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It changes the priorities in your life and makes you see things a little differently," said Talbot, 30
"It's great to watch Jed be a mother," said 31 year old Roper Talbot. "I love being a mother."
"We've always enjoyed being new parents, and everything new has excited us."
"She's a baby." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Picture zooming jade and Tanner Tolbert and their daughter Emerson credit jade Tolbert instagram picture zooming jade and Tanner Tolbert and their daughter Emerson credit jade Tolbert instagram recent milestone for their 6-month-old child. The couple said she had started eating solid food, rolling, making consonants, and..."



Number  205
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the video below for more.”
“MORE: Tyrese Declares He's Out of the 'Fast & Furious' Franchise If Dwayne Johnson 'Is In'"Listen to me, if she doesn't wrap this up," he added, "this nightmare's not gonna end, my baby's not home."”
“I don't have my baby."”
“"Because... you're judging me because you still get to go home to your daughter.”
“"They call me crazy, they said I'm having mental meltdowns on the internet -- I am," Tyrese told ET's Kevin Frazier.”
“ET caught up with the actor on Thursday outside the courthouse where he got emotional over the custody battle over his 10-year-old daughter.”
“...costar Dwayne Johnson...”
“MORE Tyrese Gibson Sobs Please Don t Take My Baby in Emotional Plea to Ex Wife Later Says He s OK Tyrese has since shared that he s in London meditating and practicing yoga to deal with the turmoil in his life which also includes a feud with his Fast...”
“"I’m a positive father aka person who loves to laugh and inspire - I️ have a gift and that’s to connect to and with people."”
“"I hope and pray that all of this toxic bulls**t goes away soon," the 38-year-old actor wrote.”


"For more information, watch the video below."
"More: tyris claims that if Dwyane Johnson is' in ', he will quit the' fast and angry 'series." listen to me, if she doesn't end this, "he adds," this nightmare won't end. My child isn't at home. "
"I don't have children."
"Because... You judge me that way because you have to go home to see your daughter. "
"They said I was crazy, they said I had a mental breakdown Online - I was crazy," tyris told et's Kevin Fraser
"Et caught up with the actor outside the court on Thursday and he was excited about the custody dispute for his 10-year-old daughter."
“… Starring Dwayne Johnson
"More tiris Gibson crying, please don't take my child to plead with my ex-wife emotionally. Later, he said that he was OK. Tiris has shared that he meditated and practiced yoga in London to deal with the chaos in his life, including a quick discord with him..."
"I'm a positive father, someone who likes to laugh and inspire - I have a gift for connecting with people."
"I hope and pray that all these poisonous bulls will disappear as soon as possible," the 38 year old actor wrote



Number  206
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The network recently announced it would expand its primetime programming schedule to six nights, from Sunday to Friday, starting in October 2018.”
“News on the fates of Life Sentence, iZombie, The 100, and Valor is expected in May.”
“...will not confirm that season 4 will be the show s last...”
“Following the renewal Crazy Ex Girlfriend s co creator and star Rachel Bloom tweeted that the show had been picked up for a final season and although Bloom and her co creator Aline Brosh McKenna have both spoken previously about having a four season plan for the show The CW”
“Other renewals include Riverdale, which will return for season 3, freshman series Dynasty, Crazy Ex-Girlfriend, which has been renewed for season 4, and Jane the Virgin, which has been renewed for season 5.”
“All five of Greg Berlanti’s superhero dramas will return next season, as the network picked up a seventh season of Arrow, a fifth season of The Flash, fourth seasons of Supergirl and DC’s Legends of Tomorrow, and a second season for freshman drama Black Lightning.”
“Supernatural, which has been picked up for season 14, will continue its streak as the longest-running show in CW (and The WB) history.”
“The CW renews Supernatural, Arrow, Supergirl, Riverdale, and moreArrow type TV Show network The CW genre SuperheroThe CW handed out renewals to 10 current series on Monday, including Supernatural, Arrow, Supergirl and Riverdale.”


"LETV recently announced that from October 2018, the prime time program schedule will be extended from Sunday to Friday, a total of six nights."
"News about life imprisonment, izombe, 100 people and the heroic fate is expected to be released in May."
“… We won't confirm that the fourth quarter is the last one... "
"Continue dating crazy ex girlfriend s co creator and star Rachel bloom tweeted that the show has been selected as the final season, although bloom and her co creator Irene brosh McKenna have talked about a four season program CW before."
"Other renewals include Riverdale, which will return in the third season, Dynasty, crazy ex girlfriend, which will be renewed in the fourth season, and virgin Jane, which will be renewed in the fifth season
"All five of Greg brandy's superheroes will be back in the next season, as the TV station receives the seventh season of arrow, the fifth season of flash, the fourth season of super girl and DC's legend of tomorrow, as well as the second season of new drama black lightning
"Supernatural" has been released in Season 14 and will continue to be the longest running show in CW (and WB) history
CW has updated supernatural, arrow, Supergirl, Riverdale and more arrow type TV programs. CW type superheroes released 10 new series updates on Monday, including supernatural, arrow, Supergirl and Riverdale



Number  207
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Published in Daily Times, October 3rd 2017.”
“It will be released in 3D in theatres along with Pixar’s Coco on November 22, 2017.”
“The film features the voices of Josh Gad, Kristen Bell, Idina Menzel, and Jonathan Groff reprising their roles from the original 2013 film ‘Frozen’.”
“‘Olaf’s Frozen Adventure’ is an upcoming 2017 American 3D computer-animated holiday-themed musical fantasy featurette short film produced by Walt Disney Animation Studios and released by Walt Disney Pictures, directed by Kevin Deters and Stevie Wermers.”
“Check out all the goodies in store for the upcoming holiday season!”
“From Olaf mac ‘n’ cheese to a real-life sled built for two and Elsa costumes, there’s gobs of stuff to put a smile on a wee one’s face.”
“But before the short film skates into theatres, fans will be able to get their paws on a slew of ‘Olaf’s Frozen Adventure’ products for purchase.”
“The 21-minute animated short will open in theatres before in front of Disney/Pixar’s full-length animated feature Coco beginning on November 22.”
“That’s why Disney is releasing a featurette in November called ‘Olaf’s Frozen Adventure’, which is, of course, starring Olaf.”
“If you saw ‘Frozen’ than you know that Olaf, the snowman with the heart of gold, sure knows how to steal the show.”


"Published in the daily times, October 3, 2017."
"It will be released in 3D with Pixar's coco in cinemas on November 22, 2017."
"In the film, the voices of Josh Gard, Christine bell, Edina Menzel and Jonathan grove reproduce their roles in the original 2013 film frozen."
"Olaf's frozen adventures" is an upcoming 2017 US 3D computer animation holiday theme music fantasy special, produced by Walt Disney animation studio, released by Walt Disney film company, directed by Kevin deters and Stevie wermers. "
"Look at all the good things in the store for the coming holiday!"
"From Olaf cheese to real-life double skis to Elsa's clothes, there are many things that can make a person smile."
"But fans can buy a series of" Olaf's frozen adventure "products before the short film sneaks into the cinema."
"This 21 minute animated film will be released in cinemas on November 22 in front of Disney / Pixar's full-length animated film coco."
"That's why Disney released a special in November called Olaf's frozen adventures, starring Olaf, of course."
"If you watch frozen, you know Olaf, a snowman with a heart of gold, must know how to steal the show."



Number  208
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(The family opted to not release a card in 2016.)”
“It’s the toddler’s first holiday card, as he was only a few weeks old when sister North and cousins Penelope, Mason and Reign Disick starred in the 2015 photo wearing coordinating chic black outfits.”
“On Dec. 1, Kim posted the first image: a photo of son Saint, 2, in denim jeans as he posed by neatly wrapped brown presents with white ribbon.”
“Linnetz wrote on Instagram that the series is titled, The 25 Days of Xmas.”
“Since the start of the month, Kim Kardashian West and the photographer behind the card — Eli Linnetz — have been sharing images from the shoot on social media, much like an advent calendar.”
“The Kardashian-Jenner crew is expanding their annual, cheer-spreading Christmas card to cover an entire month — and keeping fans guessing with daily sneak peeks.”


"(the family chose not to issue cards in 2016)"
"This is the first holiday greeting card for this toddler, because when he was only a few weeks old, sister north and cousins Penelope, Mason and Regent disc starred in a 2015 photo in coordinated fashion black."
On December 1, Kim Jong Il released his first photo: his two-year-old son, saint, posed in jeans with a white ribbon and a brown gift wrapped neatly
The title of the series is "25 days of Christmas," linnetz wrote on instagram
"Since the beginning of this month, Kim Kardashian West and Eli linnetz, the photographer behind the card, have been sharing photos on social media, much like a calendar."
"Kardashian Jenner's staff are expanding their annual celebrations, extending Christmas cards throughout the month, and making fans guess through daily peeping."



Number  209
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and hopefully will be for this next generation...”
“That door is open in a way that it never has been and they really do know Oh this is so and so and this is his husband and this is so and so and this is her wife and that has completely been normalized at least for my kids...”
“Said Garner, “My kids are growing up saying, ‘Someday when I get married, I don’t know if I’ll marry a man or a woman.”
“...audience at the session that her kids already like to talk about whether or not they might marry a man or a woman...”
“I truly believe that s what it would be and maybe it s because I waited awhile before I became a parent More Everyone Lost Their Cool Over Jennifer Garner s Oscars Dress Garner who shares Violet 12 Seraphina 9 and Samuel 5 with ex husband Ben Affleck told the...”
““If he came out he was gay, so be it, if that makes him happy.”
““I truly just want my kid to be happy and passionate about what it is that he loves,” Duhamel said of his 4-year-old son (with ex-wife, singer Fergie).”
“According to People, Garner and Duhamel had no trouble fielding the question.”
“On Friday, during a Q&A session after a preview screening of the film, Garner and Duhamel were asked how they’d each handle it if their kids were to come out.”
“Jennifer Garner and Josh Duhamel aren’t parents together in real life, but in their new film, Love, Simon, they play parents of a gay teen who’s finding it difficult to come out.”


“… Hope is for the next generation... "
"That door was opened in a way that had never been before, and they really knew that, oh, this is so and so, this is his husband, this is so and so, this is her wife, this has been completely normalized, at least for my children..."
"My kids are saying, 'one day when I get married, I don't know if I'm going to marry a man or a woman,'" garner said
“… The audience said at the meeting that her children already like to talk about whether they can marry a man or a woman... "
"I really believe it will be, maybe it's because I've been waiting for a while to become a parent, and everyone has lost their cool about Jennifer Garner's Oscar dress. Jennifer Garner and ex husband Ben Affleck share violet 12, Serafina 9 and Samuel 5
"If he comes out, he's gay, that's it, if it makes him happy."
"I really just want my child to be happy and passionate about what he loves," Duhamel said of his 4-year-old son (with his ex-wife and singer Fergie)
"According to people magazine, Ghana and Duhamel had no difficulty in answering this question."
"On Friday, in the Q & a session after the film preview, Ghana and Duhamel were asked how they would deal with each other if their children were to be shown."
"Jennifer Garner and Josh Duhamel are not parents in real life, but in their new film love Simon, they play the parents of a gay teenager, and they find it hard to come out."



Number  210
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You’re opening the doors.””
“So thank you, Paramount and Sony, because you two are driving the game, you’re doing it.”
“And not only service, it would be — I don’t know — integrity.”
“So it would do you a service.”
“We do buy 1 in every 4 tickets every single weekend and make sure that your movies do well.”
““I mean, we do make [up] 55 million plus in the country — no big deal — you should throw us in a movie or two, it would make sense.”
““Yay, Sony, for putting a Latino in the lead, because barely people do that,” Rodriguez said, turning her attention to the camera to make her point.”


"You're opening the door."
"So thank you, paramount and Sony, because you're both drivers of the game, and you're doing it."
"It's not only about service, I don't know. That's honesty."
"So it helps you."
"We buy a quarter of the tickets every weekend to make sure you make a good movie."
"I mean, we do make more than 55 million in this country - no big deal - you should show us a movie or two, which makes sense."
"Yes, Sony, because it gives a Latino a lead, because almost no one does," Rodriguez said, turning her attention to the camera to make her point



Number  211
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I think the marriage of NeNe and Gregg from The Real Housewives of Atlanta, demonstrates the role that power can play in a relationship.”
“However, the instant fame associated with being one of Bravo’s Real Housewives necessarily disrupts a couple’s status quo and can leave both partners feeling uncomfortable.”
“Conversely, when there are few alternatives available, people report greater relationship dependence, and by extension greater commitment.”
“When people perceive desirable alternatives to their current relationship (be it another partner or just another way of life) they are less dependent on their relationship.”
“How dependent an individual is on his/her relationship is believed to be a function of available alternatives.”
“DependenceOne particularly important factor in determining relationship outcomes is dependence.”
“In particular, by focusing on the women, the show may inadvertently be altering relationship dynamics making them more volatile.”
“However, I believe there are situational issues that are contributing to the high rate of divorce.”
“Quite likely, the and lack of privacy associated with the show exacerbate all of these pre-existing vulnerabilities.”
“For instance, there are issues, ranging from to , not to mention dysfunctional styles, low , and, for some, even .”


"I think the marriage of Nene and Greg, a real housewife from Atlanta, proves the role power can play in a relationship."
"However, as one of Bravo's Real Housewives, instant fame is bound to break the status quo of a couple and make both sides feel uncomfortable."
On the contrary, when there are few options available, people will report greater relationship dependence, and thus greater commitment
"When people think that their current relationship (whether it's another partner or just another way of life) has an ideal alternative, they become less dependent on their relationship."
"A person's dependence on his / her relationship is considered to be a function of available alternatives."
"A particularly important factor that determines the outcome of a relationship is dependency."
"In particular, by focusing on women, the show may inadvertently change the dynamics of relationships and make them more unstable."
"However, I think there are some circumstances that contribute to the high divorce rate."
"It's very likely that the lack of security and privacy associated with the program exacerbates all of these pre-existing vulnerabilities."
"For example, some problems, from to, let alone dysfunctional styles, are low, even for some people, even low."



Number  212
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Rob Lowe Slams Bella Thorne's Tweet About Santa Barbara Traffic Following Fatal MudslidesEllen DeGeneres FaceTimes With Oprah Winfrey About Montecito Mudslides, Fights Back TearsOprah Winfrey Shares Video of How California Mudslides Affected Her Home...”
“For more on the devastation in Montecito, watch Oprah’s footage below.”
“The 53-year-old actor appeared on Thursday’s The Ellen DeGeneres Show where he talked to his neighbor, DeGeneres, about the destruction in their California town.”
““It’s been a really difficult week.”
“The sadness, I can’t get beyond it,” Lowe admitted.”
““I think people who live there, we kind of are holding onto each other,” DeGeneres, who has also spoken to neighbor Oprah Winfrey about the disaster on the show, said.”
“There are 20 dead and three still missing in Montecito with 179 homes destroyed and more than 200 homes damaged.”
“Lowe explained that his son, Matthew, stayed behind the night of the mudslide as they were only under voluntary evacuation.”
““I had a meeting out of town.”
“At 4 o’clock in the morning, I got a FaceTime from Matthew panicking… fires everywhere because gas lines were rupturing.”


"Related content: Rob Lowe criticizes Bella Thorne's tweet about the traffic in Santa Barbara after the deadly mudslide. Salen DeGeneres and Oprah Winfrey have a dialogue on the Montecito mudslide, fighting back tears. Oprah Winfrey shares a video about how the mudslide in California affects her home..."
"For more information about the Montecito disaster, see Oprah's video below."
The 53 year old actor appeared on Thursday's "Ellen DeGeneres Show," where he talked to his neighbor DeGeneres about the destruction of small California towns
"It's been a really tough week."
"Sadness, I can't go beyond it," Lowe admitted
"I think the people who live there, we're a little bit tied down," said DeGeneres, who also talked about the disaster with neighbor Oprah Winfrey on the show
"Twenty people died in Montecito, three are still missing, 179 houses were destroyed and more than 200 houses were damaged."
Roy explained that his son Matthew stayed on the night of the debris flow because they were only evacuating voluntarily
"I'm meeting out of town."
"At 4 a.m., Matthew sent me a text message. He was panicked There are fires everywhere, because the gas pipe is broken. "



Number  213
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related:Here’s Everything We Know about Anna Faris’s Rumoured New BFOlivia Munn Shut Down Rumours She’s Dating Chris Pratt in the Best WayGigi and Zayn Broke Up and We Are Beside Ourselves...”
“We wish you nothing but happiness, Anna—online and off.”
“On Monday, 41-year-old Faris was a guest on Dax Shepard’s podcast Armchair Expert and she opened up about her painful separation from 38-year-old Pratt.”
“The Mom actor—who announced in August 2017 that she and Pratt had broken up—told Shepard she isn’t sure what the purpose of marriage is anymore.”
““Is it safety for your children?”
“Is it convention?”
“Is it so other people respect your relationship more?” Faris mused.”
““For me, I’m just not quite sure where [marriage] fits.”Faris, who shares a five-year-old son with Pratt, said that “it feels so easy to get married” at first, but “the untangling” of a divorce gets messy, especially when it becomes a legal ordeal.”
““I am a romantic.”
“I believe in partnership, I believe in companionship,” she explained.”


"Related personnel: Here" all we know about Anna Faris' new boyfriend Olivia Munn has been dispelled by rumors that she dated Chris Platt in the best way. Jiji and Zane broke up. We're all crazy... "
"We only wish you happiness, Anna, both online and offline."
"On Monday, Faris, 41, visited DAX Shepard's podcast armchair expert, and disclosed her painful separation from Pratt, 38."
"The mom actor, who announced her break-up with Pratt in August 2017, told Shepard that she was not sure what the purpose of the marriage was."
"Is the child safe?"
"Is that routine?"
"Do other people respect your relationship more? "Faris mused."
"For me, I'm just not sure where (marriage) fits." Faris and Pratt, who share a five-year-old son, said, "it's too easy to get married," but the "resolution" of divorce can get messy, especially when it becomes a torture of the law
"I'm a romantic."
"I believe in partnership, I believe in friendship," she explained



Number  214
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pic.twitter.com/KnqJICe7fC — Inverse (@inversedotcom) April 24, 2018#InfinityWar is a whole lot to process.”
“Marvel just raised the stakes higher than you can believe.”
“— Tom Jorgensen (@Tom_Jorgensen) April 24, 2018"Avengers: Infinity War" is the culmination of the last 10 years in the MCU, coming to a point of flawless action, dramatic effect, and a breathtaking appeal for its fans.”
“Marvel fans, rest assured, you're gonna have fun.”
“Amazing action, more laughs than you'd expect, and A WHOLE LOT that you won't see coming.”
“Suffice to say it’s gonna be a looooong year until @Avengers 4... pic.twitter.com/aHnsgj5MK0 — KevinSmith (@ThatKevinSmith) April 24, 2018#InfinityWar was an impossibly huge, breathtaking blockbuster.”
“So much to say but I’ll stay Silent Bob til Monday so as not to slip in spoilers.”
“It’s a gigantic @Marvel masterpiece.”
“My legs are still shaking.”
“LOVED it.”


“... pic.twitter.com/KnqJICe7fC -Inverse (@ invertedotcom) April 24, 2018 - infinitywar has too many things to deal with. "
"The stakes in Marvel are higher than you think."
“-Tom Jorgensen（@Tom_ April 24, 2018 "Avenger: Infinite War" is the peak work of MCU in the past 10 years, with perfect action, dramatic effect and amazing appeal to fans. "
"Surprise fans, don't worry. You'll have a good time."
"Wonderful action, more laughter than you think, and a lot you can't see."
"It's been a long year until @ Avengers 4... pic.twitter.com/aHnsgj5MK0 -Kevin Smith (@ that Kevin Smith) April 24, 2018 "infinity war is an incredible masterpiece, amazing."
"It's too much to say, but I'll keep silent until Monday to avoid sneaking into the saboteurs."
"It's a great miracle."
"My legs are still shaking."
"I like it."



Number  215
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I love you in a place where there is no space or time.”On Monday, the couple stepped out together at the Angel Ball in New York City, with Jones calling it a “perfect night.””
““Happy #fathersday to my prince,” she gushed.”
“The bells of happiness are ringing right now.”RELATED VIDEO: Property Brothers‘ Drew Scott Explains When He Knew His Fiancee Was ‘The One’In the months that followed, she hasn’t been shy about showing off their relationship, celebrating Lugo on Father’s Day with a sweet post.”
““The extra heat is from the sun shining on my heart.”
““There appears to be a heatwave going across the Midwest,” she captioned the post.”
““I’m not married, but we’re together.”This summer, Jones subtly hinted at her engagement on Instagram, showing off her sparkly ring for the first time in June.”
““This is my family,” she told PEOPLE, introducing the Lugos.”
“Image zoom Credit: Gilbert Carrasquillo/FilmMagicJones, 55, went public with the romance at the 8th Annual Children’s Museum of the East End Family Affair in Bridgehampton, New York, last July, attending the event with Lugo and his son, Jake.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The former panelist on The View is engaged to her boyfriend Ricardo Lugo, her rep confirms to PEOPLE.”


"In a place without space and time, I love you." On Monday, the couple got together at an angel dance in New York City, which Jones called "the perfect night."
"Happy father's day to my prince," she gushed
"The bell of happiness is ringing now." Related video: drew Scott of real estate brothers explained that when he knew that his fiancee was "that person" in the next few months, she showed off their relationship and celebrated Lugo with sweet posts on father's day
"The extra heat comes from the sun shining on my heart."
"There seems to be a heat wave sweeping the Midwest," she wrote under the title of the post
"I'm not married, but we're together." This summer, Jones subtly hinted that she was engaged on instagram, and showed off her shiny ring for the first time in June
"This is my family," she said, introducing the lugos to people magazine
"Photo zooming credit: Gilbert calasquillo / filmmagic Jones, 55, unveiled the relationship with Lugo and his son Jack at the eighth east side children's Museum of family affairs in Bridgehampton, New York, in July last year."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Her agent confirmed to people that the former opinion panel member is engaged to her boyfriend Ricardo Lugo



Number  216
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With the wedding now behind them, the newlyweds will gear up for their next major role — as parents.”
“RELATED VIDEO: John Stamos and Caitlin McHugh Are Engaged!”
“...her Stamos said...”
“Before popping the question Stamos screened a short film that he made of romantic moments from animated Pixar and Disney films ending the display with The Little Mermaid which encouraged him to just ask the girl She loves Disneyland and at the park I got on my knee and asked...”
““So I called her parents to ask, and it was like, ‘You better!”
“Then I said, I better have a ring on her finger because it’s the right thing to do, and I wanted to marry her anyway,” Stamos told PEOPLE exclusively in December.”
““The [pregnancy] happened.”
“(McHugh is an active Disneybounder, a superfan who dresses up in character at the amusement park.)”
“After almost two years of dating, Stamos, 54, proposed Oct. 22, 2017, at Disneyland, one of McHugh’s favorite places.”
“Neither McHugh nor Stamos was in the room at the time and the incident remains under investigation.”


"With the end of the wedding, the newlyweds will be ready for their next important role - parents."
Related video: John Stamos and Caitlin McHugh are engaged
“… Her Stamos said
"Before asking this question, Stamos showed a short film about the romantic moments in Pixar Animation and Disney movies. At the end of the film, the little mermaid encouraged him to ask the girl that she likes Disneyland. In the park, I knelt down and asked..."
"So I called her parents and said," you'd better! "
"Then I said, I'd better wear a ring on her finger because it's the right thing to do and I want to marry her anyway," Stamos said in an interview with people last December
It happened
(McHugh is an active Disney man, a super flier dressed up in an amusement park.)
"After nearly two years of dating, 54 year old Stamos proposed on October 22, 2017 at Disneyland, one of McHugh's favorite places."
"McHugh and Stamos were not in the room at the time, and the incident is still under investigation."



Number  217
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Luann de Lesseps has reportedly accepted a plea deal after her humiliating Palm Beach arrest on Christmas Eve.”
“She didn t go to court on Friday May 25 but agreed to the plea than five months after the embarrassing incident in which The Real Housewives of New York star 53 was arrested and charged with felonies resisting an officer with violence disorderly intoxication and battery on a law...”
“...enforcement officer...”
“Yesterday, according to the Daily Mail, it was determined that de Lesseps will have those serious charges dropped in exchange for a plea of guilty to a lesser misdemeanor.”
“The reality TV star is due back in court for a plea conference in July, where the charges will be reduced.”
“As RadarOnline.com reported at the time, De Lesseps was arrested on Christmas Eve day, Dec. 24, in Palm Beach, Florida, early in the morning.”
“She allegedly attacked a police officer and In her drunken state, even told cops she would kill them!”
“After the news broke, the housewife checked into rehab, saying she was “truly embarrassed” about her trouble with the law.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"It is reported that LuAnn de Lesseps accepted the plea agreement after being humiliated and arrested in Palm Beach on Christmas Eve."
"On Friday, May 25, she did not appear in court, but more than five months after the real housewife of New York star 53 was arrested and charged with felony of violence, disorder, drunkenness and beating a police officer, she agreed to this plea..."
“… Law enforcement officers... "
"Yesterday, dreisepps was ruled to drop the serious charges in exchange for a plea to misdemeanor," the Daily Mail reported
"The reality TV star will return to court in July for a plea conference, when the charges will be reduced."
"As RadarOnline.com According to the website at that time, dreiseps was arrested in Palm Beach, Florida, early on Christmas Eve on December 24. "
"It is said that she attacked a police officer and even told the police that she would kill them when she was drunk!"
"After the news came out, the housewife went to the rehab center and said she was" very embarrassed "about her legal troubles



Number  218
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““That said, I’m glad I didn’t see Marla that day, or any other day since our two-minute confrontation in 1989 in Aspen,” Ivana writes, referencing the moment she confronted Maples about the affair on the ski slopes of Aspen, Colorado, during a vacation with Trump.”
“It was ridiculous,” Ivana writes, saying the real reason for her early departure was to get her elderly mother back home to New York.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Ivana Trump is still holding a grudge against Donald Trump s second wife Marla Maples and she doesn t care who knows it Ivana Trump Blasts Showgirl Marla Maples for No Class DWTS Stint And for Taking Away My Kids Father Ivana Trump is still holding a grudge against Donald...”
“Trump s second wife Marla Maples and she doesn t care who knows it...”
“In her new book, Raising Trump, out Tuesday, Ivana recounts how she’s rejected all of Maples’ public apologies for the actress’ headline-making affair with Trump in the mid-1990s that ultimately broke up his first marriage to Ivana.”
“(Trump was married to Ivana from 1977 until 1992, and to Maples — with whom he shares daughter Tiffany — from 1993 to 1999.”
“He married his third and current wife, First Lady Melania Trump, in 2005.)”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In her book Ivana refers to Maples almost exclusively as the showgirl and blasts her for knowingly entering into a relationship with my husband the father of three small children Image zoom Credit Arnaldo Magnani Getty She actively participated in humiliating me in the media and indirectly put my kids...”


"That is to say, I'm glad I didn't see Mara that day, or any day after our two minute confrontation in aspen in 1989," Ivana wrote, referring to the moment when she confronted maple leaf at Aspen ski resort in Colorado during her vacation with trump
"It's ridiculous," Ivana wrote, noting that the real reason she left early was to get her elderly mother home in New York
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Ivana trump still has a grudge against Donald Trump's second wife, Mara MEPs. She doesn't care who knows that Ivana trump revealed that the actress Mara MEPs didn't attend class and took my child. Her father Ivana trump still has a grudge against Donald..."
"Trump's second wife, Marla MEPs, doesn't care who knows..."
"In her new book raising trump, published on Tuesday, Ivana tells how she refused to accept all of MEPs' public apologies, because MEPs had a big fight with trump in the mid-1990s, which eventually broke his first marriage with Ivana."
"Trump married Ivana from 1977 to 1992 and maples from 1993 to 1999, who shared his daughter Tiffany."
"He married his third wife, Melania trump, in 2005."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In her book, Ivana almost refers to maple leaf as a showgirl, and criticizes her knowingly having a relationship with my husband (the father of three children). She actively participates in humiliating me in the media, and indirectly treats my children..."



Number  219
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I hope I've come in the right gear,' the Sunday Times reported.”
“We have three kids now and we had never left them before,' he explained.”
“In an interview last month on The Howard Stern Show, Andy Cohen - who attended the annual fashion event in early May - claimed Corden was the 'drunken guest'.”
“But the 39-year-old TV host visited Stern's studio on Tuesday and explained it wasn't intoxication but 'just my natural exuberance of life'.”
“Denial!”
“James Corden denied being the 'drunkest' person at the 2018 Met GalaHe explained he rarely drinks because of his schedule adding: 'I think people often think I'm drunk just because I'm just having such a nice time.'”
“Corden attended the New York fete with his wife Julia Carey as they enjoyed a rare night out together.”
“'The reason I was having such a nice time is that my wife and I were away together for the first time in like a year and a half.”
“'We had a baby six months ago.”
“Gossip king: In an interview last month on The Howard Stern Show , Andy Cohen - who attended the annual fashion event in early May - claimed Corden was the 'drunken guest'Corden and Carey share son Max, 7, and daughters Carey, 3, and Charlotte, whom they welcomed in December 2017.”


"I hope I came in the right way," the Sunday Times reported
"We have three children now and have never left them before," he explained
"In an interview on the Howard Stern Show last month, Andy Cohen attended the annual fashion event in early May and claimed that he was a 'drunk.'"
"But the 39 year old TV host visited Stern's studio on Tuesday and explained that it wasn't intoxication, it was" my natural life. "
"No!"
"James cordon denied that he was the" most drunk "person at the" meeting "in 2018, explaining that he rarely drank because of his schedule," he added. "I think people often think I was drunk just because I had a good time."
"Cordon and his wife, Julia Carey, went to a party in New York. They had a wonderful evening together."
"I had such a good time because my wife and I went out together for the first time in a year and a half."
"We had a baby six months ago."
"Gossip King: in an interview on the Howard Stern Show last month, Andy Cohen attended the annual fashion event in early May, claiming that he was" drunk. ". Cordon and Kelly, who have seven year old son Max and three-year-old daughter Carey and Charlotte, welcomed them in December 2017. "



Number  220
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2018 Phoenix AZ Talking Stick Resort Arena Wed August 1 2018 Fresno CA Save Mart Center Fri August 3 2018 Los Angeles CA Staples Center Sat August 4 2018 Las Vegas NV MGM Grand Garden Arena On sale date To Be Announced...”
“Center Sat July 21 2018 Nashville TN TBD Tues July 24 2018 Kansas City MO Sprint Center Wed July 25 2018 Des Moines IA Wells Fargo Arena Fri July 27 2018 Denver CO Pepsi Center Sat July 28 2018 Salt Lake City UT Vivint Smart Home Arena Mon July 30”
“These dates mark Shania’s first tour since “Rock This Country” back in 2015.”
“Produced by Live Nation, the tour kicks off May 3rd in Tacoma, WA and will run through the rest of the summer, culminating in Las Vegas on August 4th at MGM Grand Garden Arena.”
“American Express® Card Members can purchase tickets before the general public beginning Tuesday, August 22 at 10:00 a.m. local time until Thursday, August 24 at 10:00 p.m. local time.”
“Tickets will go on sale to the general public on August 25th.”
“For more presale details and ticket information, please visit www.ticketmaster.com.”
“One of the most highly anticipated albums of 2017, NOW, will be released on September 29 via Mercury Nashville, and is offered as both a 12-track standard and 16-track deluxe album.”
“Fans can pre order the album HERE and instantly receive Life s About to Get Good Poor Me and beginning tomorrow Aug 18 pre orders also receive Shania s brand new single impacting radio Sept 18 Swingin With My Eyes Closed Shania debuted Swingin With My Eyes Closed last night...”
“...on The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon...”


"2018 Phoenix AZ talking stick resort arena Wednesday August 1, 2018 Fresno CA save Mart center Friday August 3, 2018 Los Angeles CA Staples Center Saturday August 4, 2018 Las Vegas NV MGM Grand Garden Arena sale date to be determined..."
"Center Saturday July 21, 2018 Nashville TN TBD Tuesday July 24, 2018 Kansas City Mo sprint center Wednesday July 25, 2018 Des Moines IA Wells Fargo arena Friday July 27, 2018 Denver Pepsi Center Saturday July 28, 2018 Salt Lake City UT vivint smart home arena Monday July 30, 2018"
"These days mark Shania's first tour since rock the country in 2015."
The tour, produced by livenation, will begin in Tacoma, Western Australia, on May 3, and will run through the summer. It will eventually be staged at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas on August 4
"American Express members can purchase tickets in public from 10:00 a.m. on Tuesday, August 22, to 10:00 p.m. on Thursday, August 24, local time."
"Tickets will be available to the public on August 25."
"For more pre-sale details and ticket information, please visit www.ticketmaster.com 。”
"One of the most anticipated albums of 2017, now released through Nashville mercury on September 29, offering 12 track standard and 16 track luxury albums."
"Fans can pre order albums here, and immediately receive the life s is about to get good poor me, starting tomorrow, August 18 pre order also received Shania's new single impact radio, September 18 swinkin and my eyes closed Shania debut swinkin and my eyes closed last night..."
“…… In the tonight show starring Jimmy Fallon



Number  221
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Los Angeles airing live on NBC”
“Kelly Jenrette The Handmaid s Tale Cherry Jones The Handmaid s Tale Samira Wiley The Handmaid s Tale GUEST ACTOR IN A DRAMA 2017 winner Gerald McRaney F Murray Abraham Homeland Cameron Britton Mindhunter Matthew Goode The Crown Gerald McRaney This Is Us Ron Cephas Jones This Is Us Jimmi...”
“Saturday Night Live‘s Weekend Update anchors, Colin Jost and Michael Che, will serve as co-hosts.”
“Game of Thrones led the pack with 22 total nods, followed closely by Saturday Night Live and Westworld, which each netted 21.”
“Rounding out the Top 5 were The Handmaid’s Tale (20) and The Assassination Of Gianni Versace: American Crime Story (18).”
“Outlet by outlet, Netflix knocked perennial champ HBO from the top spot for the first time in a lonnnnng time, amassing 112 nominations to the pay cabler’s 108.”
“NBC was again the most nominated broadcast network, with 78; CBS and ABC followed with 34 and 31.”
“TVLine has detailed the major nominees below.”
“Your job, as opinionated consumers of TV, is to storm the Comments section with gushes of glee or eruptions of righteous indignation!”
“OUTSTANDING DRAMA 2017 winner The Handmaid s Tale The Americans The Crown Game of Thrones The Handmaid s Tale Stranger Things This Is Us Westworld LEAD ACTOR IN A DRAMA 2017 winner Sterling K Brown Jason Bateman Ozark Sterling K Brown This Is Us Ed Harris Westworld Matthew Rhys The...”


"NBC live in Los Angeles"
"Kelly Jarrett, the maid's story cherry Jones, the maid's story Samira Willie, the maid's story guest actor, 2017 winner Gerald McRaney f Murray Abraham's hometown Cameron Britton, mind Hunter Matthew good, crown Gerald McRaney, this is us Ron SEPAs Jones, this is us Jimmy..."
"Anchor Colin choster and Michael Chester will co host the weekend update, which is broadcast live on Saturday night."
Game of Thrones topped the list with 22 nods, followed by live on Saturday night and west world with 21 goals each
"The top five were the maidservant story (20) and the assassination of Jennie Versace: the American crime story (18)
"One by one, Netflix eliminated the perennial champion HBO from the top of the list for the first time in a long period of time, accumulating 112 nominations to 108 of the paid cable TV programs."
"NBC again became the most nominated radio and television network, with 78; CBS and ABC followed, with 34 and 31 respectively."
"Tvline details the main nominees below."
"As an opinionated TV consumer, your job is to publicize your joy and indignation in the comments column!"
"The story of the maid, winner of the 2017 outstanding Drama Award American crown game the story of the maid strange things this is Jason Bateman Ozark Sterling K brown, hero of the 2017 Drama Award winner Sterling K Brown of the western world of the United States, and this is Matthew Reese of the western world of ED Harris of the United States..."



Number  222
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I feel like I just had a baby!””
“I call it the SNL stress diet.”
“...cover of Bodak Yellow you can thank Tiffany Haddish...”
“Haddish, 37, hung out with the legendary singer at a party over Thanksgiving weekend, and she even shared a selfie to prove it.”
“The Girls Trip star smiled as Streisand, who Haddish lovingly referred to as her “big sister,” leaned in with her hand on her new pal’s shoulder.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Behind them, other partygoers helped themselves to the buffet of food — including Steisand’s actor husband James Brolin — but the two stars were busy catching up on the latest musicians moving up the charts.”
““Just so y’all know I taught my big sister about @CardiB_ today,” Haddish captioned the pic on Twitter.”
““Did you teach her a verse too?” asked a fan.”
““Yes,” the comedian replied.”


"I think I just had a baby!"
"I call it SNL stress diet."
“… Bodak yellow cover you can thank Tiffany haddash... "
"Hadish, 37, dated the legendary singer at a Thanksgiving weekend party and even shared a selfie to prove it."
The star of "girl's journey" smiles, and Streisand, affectionately known as her "big sister", puts her hand on the shoulder of her new friend and leans down
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Behind them, other partygoers are at the buffet - including stansang's actor husband, James Brolin - but the two stars are busy catching up with the latest musicians on the charts."
"As you all know, I taught my sister about @ cardib today," haddish added a title to the photo on twitter
"Did you teach her a poem, too? "One fan asked
"Yes," the comedian replied



Number  223
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Twister actress was previously married to actor Hank Azaria before their divorce in 1999 after 5 years together and almost two years of marriage.”
“It’s the greatest pleasure I’ve ever known,” Hunt said.”
“I had my daughter and chose to spend time with her.”
““My family came to life.”
“She told PEOPLE back in 2008 that becoming a mother changed her priorities in life.”
“A source tells PEOPLE the former couple, who started dating in 2001, have broken up before in the past and “have had trouble getting along for several years.”Hunt took a step back from the spotlight after she started dating Carnahan and welcomed their daughter.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“They share a 13-year-old daughter, Makena Lei, born in 2004.”
“The actress, 54, and her writer-producer boyfriend Matthew Carnahan, 56, split after 16 years together.”
“Helen Hunt has called it quits with her longtime boyfriend, PEOPLE confirmsHelen Hunt has called it quits with her longtime boyfriend, PEOPLE confirms.”


"The whirlwind actress previously married actor Hank Azaria and divorced in 1999 after five years together and nearly two years of marriage."
"It's the biggest pleasure I've ever known," hunt said
"I have a daughter. I choose to be with her."
"My family is alive."
"She told people in 2008 that being a mother changed the priorities of her life."
"A source told people that the former couple, who started dating in 2001, had broken up in the past and" had difficulty getting along for several years. " Hunter stepped back from the spotlight after he started dating Carnahan and welcoming their daughter
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"They have a 13-year-old daughter named Ma kenareh, who was born in 2004."
The 54 year old actress and her 56 year old playwright and producer boyfriend Matthew Carnahan split after 16 years together
"Helen Hunt has broken up with her boyfriend for many years, and people have confirmed that Helen Hunt has broken up with her boyfriend for many years, and people have confirmed that."



Number  224
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Plus, the couple have hinted that this might not be the last we’ll see of them on screen.”
“Joanna’s cookbook, Magnolia Table, (which bares the same name as their new restaurant), comes out April 24th, and she’s also revealing more details about her next tome, a decorating guide that doesn’t have a release date yet.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Chip and Jo aren't done with the design world just yet!”
“Fixer Upper may be ending, but Chip and Joanna Gaines aren’t going anywhere.”
“The HGTV stars are saying goodbye to their hit show, which airs its last episode Tuesday night, but rest assured there’s plenty the couple has in store for fans after the final credits roll.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“For starters, their spinoff, Behind the Design, premieres Tuesday, April 10, and will dig deeper into how Joanna transforms her previously dilapidated properties into stunning farmhouse-inspired homes.”
“There will be 15 half-hour episodes total, and each will correspond with one of the houses featured on Fixer Upper season five.”
“Image zoom Credit: Joanna Gaines/InstagramOff screen, the couple has big plans for expanding their vast home improvement empire.”


"In addition, the couple hinted that this may not be the last time we see them on the screen."
Joanna's recipe "Mulan table" (the same name as their new restaurant) will be published on April 24, and she also revealed more details of her next book, a decoration guide, which has no date yet
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Chip and Joe are not finished with the design world yet!"
"The shoe repair may be over, but chip and Joanna Gaines are not going anywhere."
"HGTV stars are saying goodbye to their hit show, which will air its final episode on Tuesday night, but rest assured that the couple will have enough fans after the final episode."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"First of all, the derivative behind the design will premiere on April 10 (Tuesday) and will explore in depth how Joanna transformed a previously dilapidated property into an amazing farmhouse style house."
"There are 15 episodes and a half hours in total, and each episode corresponds to a house in season 5 of fixer."
"Thanks to image zooming: Joanna Gaines / instagram off screen, the couple has grand plans to expand their huge empire of home decoration."



Number  225
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Because while we can’t actually eat the rich, we can definitely use them to garner some no-fail fashion hacks for winter outfit ideas to make venturing out into the world a little bit easier.”
“While we still have a ways to go before making a return to shoulder-brushing and face-to-face interaction, these style tips are the perfect training wheels for looking like a human again.”
“With vaccines and the presidential transition underway, a general sense of optimism might have you ready to give loungewear a break—and these looks are a solid starting point.”
“So if you're thinking of dabbling in the art of the outfit once more, read on.”
“While no one has really gone much of anywhere for the past nine months (save for maybe Kim Kardashian and friends on a humble private island), celebrities still delivered low-key street-style looks that might make getting dressed easier.”
“After a year marked by sweatpants and slippers, you may not be brimming with creativity in the style department, but there are winter outfit ideas aplenty when you look to famous people who walked around in 2020.”


"Because although we can't really eat the rich, we can definitely use them to collect some out of the box winter clothing creative fashion tips to make it easier to venture into the world."
"Although we have a long way to go before returning to shoulder brushing and face-to-face interaction, these style tips are the perfect training wheel to make us look like human beings again."
"With the vaccine and the presidential transition going on, a general sense of optimism may prepare you for a break in casual wear, which is a solid starting point."
"So if you want to get involved in fashion art again, please read on."
"Although no one has really been anywhere in the past nine months (except Kim Kardashian and friends on a humble private island), celebrities still offer low-key street looks, which may make it easier to dress."
"After a year marked by sweatpants and slippers, you may not be full of creativity in the fashion department, but when you look at the celebrities walking around in 2020, you will find a lot of winter clothing creativity."



Number  226
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We hope they join us for these last few hours as we journey to the Enchanted Forrest for one more adventure.””
““’Once Upon a Time has been an amazing journey for all of us at ABC Studios and for fans around the world,” said Patrick Moran, president of ABC Studios.”
“The show, created and executive produced by Edward Kitsis and Adam Horowitz, returns for the second half of its final season on March 2, and the finale will air in May, after more than 150 episodes.”
“Once Upon a Time went through a creative and casting revamp at the end of Season 6 when a number of original cast members left, and also relocated from its longtime Sunday home to the lower-trafficked Friday night this season.”
“During the TCA winter press tour in January, ABC Entertainment President Channing Dungey said she was “cautiously optimistic” about an eighth season, pending a meeting with Kitsis and Horowitz, but that was not to be.”
“Related Story In The Financial Fine Print, A Glimpse Of Fragile Oscar Economics“When we first heard Adam and Eddy’s pitch for Once Upon a Time, we knew it was something incredibly special,” Dungey said in a statement today.”
““For seven years, they have captivated us with their creativity and passion while reimagining some of our most beloved Disney fairytales, creating an undeniable global hit.”
“Saying goodbye will be bittersweet but Once Upon a Time will forever be part of the ABC legacy and we can t wait for fans to join us in this epic final chapter Once Upon a Time was a breakout hit when it premiered in fall 2011 starring Ginnifer Goodwin...”
“Jennifer Morrison Lana Parrilla Josh Dallas Robert Carlyle and Jared Gilmore and featuring classic Disney fairytale characters...”
“In addition to strong ratings early in its run, Once fit nicely in the Disney brand with corporate synergies and has been a solid international seller for producer ABC Studios because of the global recognition of its characters.”


"We hope they will join us in the last few hours, and we will take an adventure in the enchanted Forrest."
"It used to be a wonderful journey for all of us at ABC and for fans around the world," said Patrick Moran, President of ABC
"The show, created and produced by Edward kisses and Adam Horowitz, will be broadcast in the second half of the final season on March 2. After more than 150 episodes, the final episode will be broadcast in May."
"Once upon a time, at the end of the sixth season, some original actors left for a creative and cast adjustment, and moved from their long-term Sunday home to the less popular Friday night of the season."
"On TCA's winter reporter tour in January, ABC entertainment president Channing dungee said she was" cautiously optimistic "about Season 8 and was waiting for a meeting with kisses and Horowitz, but that's not true."
"When we first heard Adam and Eddie speak, we knew it was a very special thing," dunkey said in a statement today
"Over the past seven years, they have fascinated us with their creativity and passion, and at the same time, they have re conceived our favorite Disney fairy tales, creating an undeniable global hit."
"It will be bittersweet to say goodbye, but" the past "will always be a part of ABC's tradition. We can't wait for fans to join in this epic final chapter," the past "will shine when it premieres in autumn 2011, starring Jennifer Goodwin..."
"Jennifer Morrison, Lana, parrilla, Josh, Dallas, Robert Carlyle and Jared Gilmore, starring in the classic Disney fairy tale characters..."
"In addition to its early high ratings, once is well integrated into the Disney brand by virtue of corporate synergy, and has always been a reliable international seller for producer ABC Studios due to its globally recognized role."



Number  227
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[RELATED7]For access to exclusive gear videos, celebrity interviews, and more, subscribe on YouTube!”
“On the left is a shot from a July 2016 episode of Mr.”
“The Ghosted star and The Office funnyman appeared on Harry with Harry Connick Jr. and spoke about his recent body transformation.”
“Robinson said that he dropped “about 50lbs” after cutting out alcohol, working out more, and going vegan in his diet.”
““I haven’t been drinking since January.”
“I just put down the alcohol,” Robinson said on the show.”
““I was going to detox.”
“I had heard, I don’t know how true it is, but I heard you can regenerate your liver in six months.”
“I was like, let me see if I can go six months, and I just haven’t gone back, and then [I’ve been] working out and I’ve been trying this vegan lifestyle, too.”Here’s a look at Robinson’s weight change over the past year.”
“Robot compared to a shot from Robinson s appearance on Late Night with Seth Meyers from Sept 27 2017 Michael Parmelee USA Network NBCU Photo Bank Lloyd Bishop NBC NBCU Photo Bank via Getty Images Robinson s known for his burly figure from projects like This Is The End Hot...”


"[related7] to access exclusive equipment videos, celebrity interviews, etc., please subscribe on YouTube!"
"On the left is an episode of snow white in July 2016."
"The ghost star, the office comedian and Harry Connick Jr. appear on Harry's body, telling about his recent physical changes."
Robinson said he lost "about 50 pounds" after abstaining from alcohol, exercising more and eating a vegetarian diet
"I haven't been drinking since January."
"I just put down the wine," Robinson said on the show
"I'm on my way to rehab."
"I've heard of it. I don't know what's going on, but I've heard that your liver can regenerate in six months."
"I thought, let me see if I can go for six months, I just didn't go back, and then (I) have been exercising, and I have been trying this vegan lifestyle." Here's Robinson's weight change over the past year
"Compared with the photo taken by robot and Robinson with Seth Meyers in the late night of September 27, 2017, Michael Pamela nbcu Photo Gallery Lloyd bishop nbcu photo gallery is famous for his burly figure. This project is the last hot one..."



Number  228
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...version Directed by Wayne Blair and choreographed by Hamilton s Andy Blankenbuehler the remake will feature songs from the original Dirty Dancing as well as additional musical performances...”
“In the original movie, Lisa was played by Jane Brucker.”
“ET on ABCAbigail Breslin, Sarah Hyland and Cast of Dirty Dancing Reveal First Photos of RemakeWe can’t wait to “have the time of our lives” when the Dirty Dancing remake airs in May.”
“Eager fans got the first look at the upcoming TV movie on Wednesday when the cast of the ABC adaptation debuted never-before-seen photos of the special on social media.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Scream Queens star Abigail Breslin, who stars as non-corner-dweller Frances “Baby” Houseman, shared sneak peeks of a dancing sequence with on-screen love interest Colt Prattes, who plays Camp Kellerman dance instructor Johnny Castle.”
“Of course, their parts were originally played by Jennifer Grey and Patrick Swayze in the 1987 classic.”
““Casually dancing around a fireplace, as one does,” Breslin, 20, captioned one photo.”
““AND just casually dippin’ around a fireplace.”
“As one also does,” the actress wrote in her follow-up post.”


“…… Directed by Wayne Blair and choreographed by Andy brackenbler of Hamilton, the remake will feature original dirty dance songs and other musical performances... "
In the original film, Lisa was played by Jane Brooke
"Icabi Gail Breslin, Sarah Helan and the actors of dirty dance revealed the remake of the first photo, and we can't wait to 'have our life time' when the dirty dance remake aired in May."
"On Wednesday, ABC's adaptation of the show released its first ever special photo on social media, and eager fans saw the upcoming TV movie for the first time."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Scream Queen" star Abigail Breslin, who plays "baby" housekeeper of off street resident Frances, shares a peek at a dance clip with colt Prates, who plays camp Kellerman dance coach Johnny castle
Of course, their roles were first played by Jennifer gray and Patrick Swayze in the 1987 classic
Breslin, 20, wrote in the title of one photo: "dance around the fireplace at will, just like a person."
"Just hopping around the fireplace."
"It's the same for one person," the actress wrote in a subsequent post



Number  229
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Other international suicide helplines can be found at befrienders.org...”
“Spade was not about elitism: when you enter her shops, you don’t feel intimidated – you feel welcomed.”
“Spade is not as well known in Britain as she is in the US, where her brand is huge (only last year it was sold to Coach for $2.4bn).”
“We thought we knew her.”
“Instead, you saw her smiling and holding her husband’s hand as they walked through the Upper East Side in New York City.”
“She seemed to live like her brand: you never saw pictures of Spade looking sour-faced at black-tie celebrity parties, as you do with most designers.”
“She was a deeply creative woman who devised an entire aesthetic.”
“She coined the filtered, Instagrammed world 20 years before Instagram was invented.”
“Her original adverts, which shot the brand to fame, featured women taking their children to school, or talking with their friends, or eating with their husband – but always looking perfect.”
“For a start, the brand is aspirational, but far more accessible than most designer names, which is why a Kate Spade bag – available for a fraction of the price of a Chanel one – was the first smart handbag for so many women.”


Other international suicide helplines can be found at befrienders.org Website
"Spade is not elitism: when you walk into her store, you don't feel scared - you feel welcome."
"Spade is not as well known in the UK as it is in the US, and her brand is very large (sold to coach for $2.4 billion last year)
"We thought we knew her."
Instead, you see her smiling and holding her husband's hand across the upper east side of New York City
"She seems to live like her brand: you've never seen a picture of spade at a black tie celebrity party, just like most designers."
"She is a very creative woman, she designed a complete set of aesthetics."
"Twenty years before instagram was invented, she created a filtered world of instagram."
"Her original ads made the brand famous, with women taking their children to school, or chatting with friends, or eating with their husbands - but always looking perfect."
"First of all, the brand is ambitious, but it's much more accessible than most designers' names, which is why Kate Spade's handbag (for a fraction of Chanel's) is the first smart bag for so many women."



Number  230
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Their last public event together was at the opening night of The Front Page at the Broadhurst Theatre in NYC in October 2016.”
“Simpson: American Crime Story actor and Buckman often kept private about their relationship.”
“The People v. O.J.”
“Schwimmer and Buckman welcomed daughter, Cleo, now 5, in May 2011.”
“It is the first marriage for both.”
“She relocated to Los Angeles to be with the actor and the pair tied the knot in June 2010.”
“They met when Schwimmer was directing the 2007 romantic comedy Run in London.”
“Buckman 31 have been together for more than 10 years...”
“Our priority is of course our daughter s happiness and well being during this challenging time and so we ask for your support and respect for our privacy as we continue to raise her together and navigate this new chapter for our family The Friends alum 50 and British photographer...”
““It is with great love, respect and friendship that we have decided to take some time apart while we determine the future of our relationship,” the pair tell Us in a statement.”


"Their last public event together was on the front page premiere night of Broadhurst theatre in New York in October 2016."
"Simpson: American crime story actors and Buckman often talk about their relationship in private."
"People v. O.J."
In May 2011, schweimer and Buckman welcomed their five-year-old daughter Cleo
"This is the first marriage of both sides."
"She moved to Los Angeles with the actor and they got married in June 2010."
"They met when Schwimmer directed the 2007 London romantic comedy" the long run. "
"Barkman is 31 years old and has been together for more than 10 years..."
"At this challenging time, our top priority is of course the happiness and well-being of our daughter, so we ask for your support and respect for our privacy, because we will continue to raise her together and open a new chapter for our family - our 50 year old friend and British photographer..."
"It was with great love, respect and friendship that we decided to be apart for a while and determine the future of our relationship," the two told us in a statement



Number  231
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Nick's younger brother and fellow 98 Degrees member Drew Lachey won the mirror ball trophy in season two with partner Cheryl Burke and returned to compete in season 15.”
“A source confirms to ET that the couple is joining the season 25 cast of Dancing With the Stars.”
“RELATED: 'Dancing With the Stars' Season 25 Pros Revealed -- and a Fan Favorite Is Returning to the Dance Floor!”
“"The show isn't holding back this year, they really want this to be a big season and one of the ways they'll do this is with mini rivalries!"”
“...the source says.”
“"There will be the twin rivalry with Drew [Scott] and Nikki Bella and now there are also two couples competing: Nick vs. Vanessa and Maks [Chmerkovskiy] vs. Peta [Murgatroyd]."”
“With two couples competing this season on DWTS, could Nick and Vanessa be paired up with newlyweds Maks and Peta?”
“ABC, when reached for comment, told ET, "We have no comment but appreciate you checking in."”
“'Dancing With the Stars' Season 25 to Feature One of the 'Property Brothers' and Nikki Bella!”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Nick's brother and 98 degree member drew Lach won the mirror ball trophy in season 2 with partner Cheryl Burke and returned to the game in season 15."
"A source confirmed to et that the couple will join season 25 of dance with the stars."
Related report: dance with stars season 25 professional players announced - fans' favorite is to return to the dance floor
"This year's show won't be stagnant. They really hope it's an important season. One of the ways they can do that is with small rivals!"
“…… The source said
"We're going to compete with drew (Scott) and Nicky Bella (Nicky Bella) as twins, and now there are two couples competing: Nick vs Vanessa, max (zimmerkovsky) vs PETA (mugartroyd),"
"With two couples competing on DWT this season, can Nick and Vanessa pair up with newlyweds mark and PETA?"
ABC, when a reporter contacted the comment, told et, "we have no comment, but thank you for checking."
"Dance with the stars season 25 will feature a real estate brother and Nicky Bella!"



Number  232
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You’ve crossed it."”
“(Image: Splash News) (Image: Splash News) (Image: Splash News)Brooklyn showed off his new look as he posed up with his other half for a birthday snap at her party at restaurant Beauty & Essex in Los Angeles.”
“The Spice Girl turned fashion designer has been hobbling around on a pair of crutches lately following a skiing accident, but her style game has officially resumed.”
“Just days after branding herself a "terrible mother" for sending her three youngest kids off to school in the snow, VB has jetted to New York for her eldest's birthday.”
“Brooklyn turns 19 tomorrow and kick-started the celebrations by having breakfast with mum.”
“(Image: Splash News) (Image: Splash News)(Image: Splash News)Victoria, 43, wrapped up warm in a turtleneck and red knit top that she paired with a red plaid skirt and a pair of heeled boots.”
“She wore her hair in a bun and kept her eyes hidden beneath a pair of designer shades as she stepped out with Brooklyn, who was wearing black trousers and a bomber jacket, decorated with patches, that was a gift from his girlfriend, actress Chloe Moretz.”
“Brooklyn moved to New York last year to study photography, but has remained very close to his family, particularly his mum who visits on a regular basis.”
“The teenager flashed photographers a smile as he walked round to the other side of a waiting car, while his mum climbed into the back.”
“Brooklyn recently showed the world how much he loves his mum by getting a tattoo to honour her.”


"You have passed."
"(photo: splash News) (photo: splash News) (photo: splash News) Brooklyn took a photo with her partner at a birthday party at beauty & Essex restaurant in Los Angeles to show off her new look."
"The spice girl fashion designer recently hobbled on crutches after a skiing accident, but her style game has officially resumed."
Just a few days after she called her "bad mother" by sending her three youngest children to school in the snow, VB flew to New York to celebrate her eldest child's birthday
"Brooklyn turns 19 tomorrow, and the celebration starts with breakfast with mom."
"(photo source: splash News) (photo source: splash News) Victoria, 43, is wearing a turtleneck and a red knitted top, paired with a red plaid skirt and a pair of high-heeled boots for warmth."
"With her hair in a bun and her eyes hidden under a pair of designer sunglasses, she went out with Brooklyn in black pants and a patched Baseball Jacket, a gift from his girlfriend and actress Chloe Moretz."
"Brooklyn moved to New York last year to study photography, but he has always maintained a very close relationship with his family, especially his mother, whom he visits regularly."
"When he got to the other side of a waiting car, the teenager flashed a smile at the photographers, while his mother climbed in behind."
"Brooklyn recently showed the world his love for his mother through tattoos."



Number  233
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Leaving work today like…” was written alongside the image.”
“In one hand the man holds a shotgun, while in the other he holds an American flag.”
“Brings Kimberly Guilfoyle to White House for July 4th as He Shares Odd Images of His Dad“A very Happy 4th of July to everyone!” Trump Jr., 40, wrote alongside a series of pictures of the pair posing together on Wednesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It was great meeting all the veterans and active duty service members visiting the White House!”
“Today is America’s birthday, and we are making it GREAT again!” he continued.”
“In one of the photos, the pair smiled with their arms around each other, while in another, Guilfoyle, 49, was seen shaking the president’s hand in the Oval Office.”
“Guilfoyle also documented the festive fourth on her own social media account, sharing a photo of the pair smiling while holding hands outside of the White House.”
““An incredible afternoon at the White House!”
“Thankful and proud to be an American!”


"It's like..." Write next to the picture
This man has a shotgun in one hand and an American flag in the other
Kimberly gilfoyle will be in the White House on July 4 and share with you his father's eccentric image: "happy July 4!"! "Little trump, 40, wrote a series of photos of the two together on Wednesday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's great to see all the veterans and active servicemen visiting the White House!"
"Today is America's birthday, we want to make it great again! "He continued
"In one of the photos, the two hug each other and smile, while in the other, 49 year old gilfoyle shakes hands with the president in the Oval Office."
"Gilfoyle also recorded the fourth scene of the celebration on his social media account, sharing a picture of the two smiling hand in hand outside the White House."
"An incredible afternoon at the White House!"
"As an American, I'm grateful and proud!"



Number  234
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From Haleigh Foutchadvertising...”
“Watch the first trailer below.”
“That film is The Spy Who Dumped Me (a play on the classic James Bond title The Spy Who Loved Me), which stars Kunish and McKinnon as a pair of LA gals who wind up in a spy caper, and Lionsgate has debuted the first trailer for the action comedy.”
“...advertising The Spy Who Dumped Me follows Audrey Kunis and Morgan McKinnon two best friends from L A who get tangled up in a high stakes web of espionage and international conspiracy when Audrey s ex boyfriend turns up at their place with a team of deadly assassins on his...”
“...trail...”
“From there, the fish-out-of-water duo has to swing into action, winding up on the run in Europe on a mission to save the world.”
“Directed and co-written by Susanna Fogel, The Spy Who Dumped Me has a supporting cast to match its fantastic leads, co-starring Justin Theroux, Sam Heughan, Hasan Minhaj, and Gillian Anderson.”
“The film arrives in theaters on August 3, 2018.”
“Here s the official synopsis for The Spy Who Dumped Me The film tells the story of Audrey Mila Kunis and Morgan Kate McKinnon thirty year old best friends from Los Angeles who are unexpectedly thrust into an international conspiracy when Audrey s ex boyfriend Justin Theroux shows up at...”
“You can usually find her sharing Buffy the Vampire Slayer memes on Instagram, rehearsing the Five Movements from The OA, and asking people about their pets.”


"More from Harley fochadvicin..."
"Look at the first trailer below."
"That movie is" the spy who dumped me "(the script of James Bond's classic title" the spy who loves me "), in which kunish and McKinnon play a pair of Los Angeles girls who finally fall into the spy farce. The action comedy Trailer of Lion Gate premieres."
“… Advertising spies who dumped me followed two of Audrey Kunis and Morgan McKinnon's best friends from Los Angeles who tangled in a high-risk cyber espionage and international conspiracy when Audrey's ex boyfriend appeared in their place, his deadly assassin team... "
“… Track... "
"From then on, the fish out of water group must take action to end its escape in Europe and carry out the task of saving the world."
"The spy who dumped me" is directed and co authored by Susannah Fogel, with a supporting role to co star Justin serrux, Sam Hagen, Hassan minhage and Gillian Anderson
"The film will be released on August 3, 2018."
"This is the official profile of the spy who dumped me. This movie tells the story of Audrey Mira Kunis and Morgan Kate McKinnon's 30-year-old good friend from Los Angeles, when Audrey's ex boyfriend Justin Cyrus appears in..."
"You'll usually find her sharing bafi's memes on instagram, rehearsing five OA moves, and asking people about their pets."



Number  235
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here’s to at least 13 more episodes of sharp jokes, loving friendship, and maybe one more Halloween heist directed by devoted fan and Oscar-winner Del Toro (hey, a girl can dream).”
“— Guillermo del Toro (@RealGDT) May 11, 2018But for now, they and all of Brooklyn Nine-Nine’s fans can rest easy.”
“...for at least a sixth season which will run 13 episodes...”
“Ever since we sold this show to Fox I ve regretted letting it get away and it s high time it came back to its rightful home said NBC Entertainment chair Robert Greenblatt referring to the fact that NBCUniversal did in fact own the rights to Brooklyn Nine Nine making...”
“NBC the most likely network to save it...”
““[Creators] Mike Schur, Dan Goor, and [star] Andy Samberg grew up on NBC and we’re all thrilled that one of the smartest, funniest, and best cast comedies in a long time will take its place in our comedy line-up.”
“I speak for everyone at NBC here s to the Nine Nine Fox also canceled its comedies The Mick and Last Man on Earth before announcing that it would be reviving Tim Allen s Last Man Standing from the dead which to say the least feels like something of a...”
“...telling move in our brave new post Roseanne revival world...”
“But it was Brooklyn Nine Nine’s cancellation that drew the most visible outrage, with fans from Lin Manuel Miranda(!)”
“...to Mark Hamill(!!)”


"Here are at least 13 episodes of poignant jokes, love and friendship, and maybe a loyal fan of the director of the Halloween robbery and Oscar winner del Toro (hey, a girl can dream of it)."
"- Guillermo del Toro (@ realgdt) May 11, 2018, but now they and all fans of nine in Brooklyn can rest assured."
“… There will be at least 13 episodes in season 6... "
NBC entertainment chairman Robert Greenblatt said that NBC Universal does own the copyright of Brooklyn 99 production: "since we sold the play to fox, I regret letting it go. Now it's time for it to go back to its legal home."
"NBC is most likely to save its TV network..."
"[creator] Mike Shure, Dan Gul and [starring] Andy Sandberg grew up on NBC, and we're all excited that one of the smartest, funniest, best cast comedies in a long time can take a place in our comedy lineup."
"On behalf of everyone on NBC, before announcing the resurrection of Tim Allen's" resurrection from the dead, "nine nine fox canceled the comedy" Mick and the last man on earth, "which, to say the least, felt a bit like..."
“… Tell us about rosan's action to revive the world in our brave new post - "
"But the cancellation of Brooklyn 99 caused the most obvious outrage, the fans of lynmanuel Miranda (!)"
“… To mark Hamil (!) "



Number  236
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Kardashian fans can breathe a sigh of relief as Kylie Jenner ‘will make a return to social media’MORE : Chicago West’s name is a tribute to Kanye’s late mum Donda...”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“Got a showbiz story?”
“Okay, so now we want a baby pic please and thanks.”
“She tweeted: ‘Hey Chi (shy).’Whatever you think of the name we know young Chi will rock, just like her older siblings North, and Saint do.”
“It’s “Shy”.’And Aunty Khloe also revealed how to pronounce the baby’s nickname, which, let’s face it, is probably what we’re going to go by.”
“No.”
“Confirming that her nickname is Chi, Kim retweeted a message which read: ‘And to everyone who thinks it’s literally pronounced as CHI.”
“(Picture: Splash News)The couple announced their baby’s unique name on Friday and were later forced to reveal how to pronounce their baby daughter’s name.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementKanye, however, let his wife steal the limelight as he opted for a far more casual outfit.”


"More: Kardashian fans can breathe a sigh of relief because Kelly Jenner is" going back to social media. ". More: the name of Chicago West is a tribute to Kanye's late mother, donda... "
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"Is there a story about the show business?"
"OK, now we want a picture of the baby, thank you."
"She tweeted: 'Hey, chi (shy)' whatever you think, the little Chi we know can rock, just like her brother, sister and saint."
"Very shy." Aunt Khloe also revealed how to pronounce the baby's nickname. Let's face it. This may be what we want to say
"No
Jin Yaner confirmed that her nickname was "Chi" and forwarded a message that read: "for all people who think this is" Chi. "
"(photo source: splash News) the couple announced their child's unique name on Friday and were forced to disclose how their youngest daughter's name was pronounced."
However, Kanye let his wife steal the limelight, because he chose a much more casual suit



Number  237
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So it’s safe to say Rihanna could be hitting a high note by folding messages of body positivity into her new fashion brand.”
“With the average woman being a size 16 to 18, there’s certainly demand: The plus-size women’s clothing industry is valued at $17 billion, according to NDP Group.”
“The singer and entrepreneur announced she’s launching a lingerie line called Savage x Fenty, embracing inclusivity by offering women sizes from extra-small to 3X.”
“RiRi celebrated the May 11 launch early with a video ad featuring plus-size model Audrey Ritchie in the campaign clad in a pale pink bra and underwear set.”
“In it, Ritchie references her “really giant” chest.”
““They were double-Ds by the time I was in the eighth grade,” Ritchie says in the clip, where she talks about growing confident in her own skin.”
““I think I feel most sexy in the morning: rolls, stretch marks, cellulite,” she said.”
““Whichever gender you choose to have sex with, you should be proud and find yourself sexually.”SEE ALSO: This new clothing app is the Poshmark for plus-size womenRihanna also offered peeks of her lingerie styles in earlier campaign posts, such as previewing a pink lace bodysuit.”
“The inclusive new line will feature bra sizes ranging from 32A to a 44DD, while underwear sizes come in extra-small to a 3X.”
“More recently, fashion brands like Reformation, Target and Reese Witherspoon’s Draper and James clothing line broke into the market by introducing their own plus-size designs.”


"So, it's safe to say that Rihanna has added the message of physical initiative to the new fashion brand, which may reach a very high level."
"The average woman's size is between 16 and 18, so there must be demand: according to NDP group, the women's plus size industry is valued at $17 billion."
The singer and entrepreneur announced that she will launch a underwear line called savage x Fenty, which will provide women with underwear from super small to three times the size, reflecting inclusiveness
"To celebrate the May 11 launch, Riri launched a video ad in advance, featuring Audrey Ritchie in a light pink bra and underwear set for the campaign."
Ritchie mentioned her "very large" chest in the letter
"By the time I was in eighth grade, they were double D," rich said in the clip, where she talked about growing more confident about her skin
"I think the sexiest things in the morning are curly hair, stretch marks, cellulite," she said
"No matter what gender you choose to have sex with, you should be proud and discover your sex life." See also: this new apparel app is a fashion icon for large women. In early campaign posts, Hannah also provided her underwear styles, such as a preview of Pink Lace tights
"This new collection will introduce bras from 32A to 44dd, while underwear will be three times smaller."
"Recently, fashion brands like transformation, target and Reese Witherspoon's Draper and James collections have come into the market with their own oversized designs."



Number  238
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Entitled ‘RAF’, the song – which debuted in two different versions – features contributions from Migos MC Quavo, Lil Uzi Vert, Playboi Carti and Ocean himself.”
“Earlier this week, a new A$AP Rocky track was premiered on Frank Ocean’s Beats 1 radio show, ‘Blonded’.”
“Rocky has yet to publicly respond to the robbery.”
“The rapper’s relative is not believed to have been physically harmed by the gang, but it is thought that the gang deliberately targeted Rocky’s house for the raid.”
“However, they decided not to take it, and instead left it on a nearby pavement before fleeing the scene.”
“AdvertisementBefore making their getaway, the gang attempted to take a locked safe from the residence.”
“She was then taken through the property by the gang as they proceeded to steal the rapper’s possessions.”
“As reported by TMZ, the armed gang – consisting of three thieves – reportedly pulled a gun on a female relative of Rocky’s who answered the door.”
“The Harlem rapper was the victim of the crime last night (May 16), with reports suggesting that up to $1.5 million worth of jewellery and additional property had been stolen from the residence.”
“A$AP Rocky‘s house in LA has been burgled, with armed robbers reportedly stealing over $1 million of property from the rapper.”


"The song is called 'Royal Air Force' and has two different versions, contributed by migos MC quavo, lil Uzi vert, playboi Carti and ocean himself."
Earlier this week, a new a $AP rocky track premiered on Frank ocean's beats 1 radio show blonde
"Rocky has not publicly responded to the robbery."
"It is believed that the rapper's relatives were not personally injured by the gang, but it is believed that the gang deliberately targeted Rocky's house as a surprise attack."
"However, they decided not to take it. Instead, they put it on the sidewalk nearby and fled the scene."
Before escaping, the gang tried to take a locked safe from their home
"She was then taken into the property by gangsters as they continued to steal the rapper's property."
According to TMZ, the armed group is made up of three thieves who are reported to have pointed a gun at a female relative of Lodge who answered the door
"The Harlem rapper was the victim of a crime last night (May 16) and there were reports that jewelry and extra property worth up to $1.5 million were stolen from the home."
According to reports, Rocky's $1 million house in Los Angeles was stolen, and armed robbers stole more than $1 million from rappers



Number  239
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2""Moana""Trolls"”
“2: Awesome Mix Vol.”
“The excitement will start right away, with Kelly Clarkson and Pink opening the show with a duet.”
“"It’s [Clarkson's] 15th anniversary of winning 'American Idol,' so she’s gonna throw it back to her very first hit, as well as doing her newest single," AMA producer Mark Bracco told ABC News.”
“"And then Pink ... is doing something that has never been done before ... and it’s insane in the best possible way."”
“Selena Gomez's performance of "Wolves" is sure to be a highlight for fans as well.”
“The singer will be taking the stage for the first time since her kidney transplant, and Bracco said that it's bound to be "a very emotional night for her."”
“Another highlight: Christina Aguilera will sing a medley of songs from Whitney Houston's "The Bodyguard" soundtrack, released 25 years ago this week.”
“"Black-ish" star Tracee Ellis Ross hosts the show, and she's most excited for the performance by her mom, the iconic Diana Ross, who will receive this year's Lifetime Achievement Award.”
“"There’s so much of an emphasis on youth, but to see a woman whose career has spanned so many decades, that is still performing, still on stage, still singing live, still looking gorgeous ... it shows you what’s possible," she told ABC News.”


"2" "Mona" "Troll"
"2: great mix"
"The excitement is about to begin. Kelly Clarkson and pink begin with a duet."
"Today is the 15th anniversary of Clarkson's winning American Idol, so she's going to put the song back to her first hit song, as well as her latest single," mark Blake, producer of the American Music Association, told ABC News
"And then pink... Do something you've never done before... In the best way, it's crazy. "
"Selena Gomez's performance in wolf will definitely be a highlight for fans."
"The singer will be on stage for the first time after her kidney transplant, and Blake said it must be a very exciting night for her."
Another highlight: Christina Aguilera will sing a set of songs from Whitney Houston's "bodyguard" soundtrack, which was released this week 25 years ago
"Black" star Tracy Ellis Ross presided over the performance. Her most exciting performance is that of her mother, the iconic Diana Ross, who will win this year's lifetime achievement award
"Too much emphasis on youth, but to see a woman whose career has spanned decades, she is still performing, still on the stage, still singing live, still looking gorgeous... "It tells you what's possible," she told ABC



Number  240
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I am grateful for all I have left."”
“… the memories shared with family and friends stand strong.”
“"My animals and LOVE OF MY LIFE made it out safely and that's all that matters right now.”
“In a social media post, the "Malibu" singer showed her gratitude for being "one of the lucky ones" to have evacuated the area unscathed.”
“The "Malibu" artist's birthday party and well wishes come at a bittersweet time, as she and her future husband's Malibu home was recently destroyed due to the uncontrollable wildfires that burned through California only a few weeks ago.”
“So thankful to have you in my life."”
“"You’re more precious than ever.”
“"Happy birthday to my sweet girl," Hemsworth writes to his fiancée with an image of her beside a colorful balloon display.”
“Peace and love to all," the 57-year-old crooner wrote with an image of the Cyrus brood, which shows the birthday girl waiting with a beaming smile to enjoy her pastel-colored cake.”
“My thoughts and prayers with so many hearts that need mended.”


"I appreciate what I have left."
“…… Shared memories with family and friends are strong. "
"My animals and my love of life have survived safely. That's the most important thing now."
"On social media, the 'Malibu' singer expressed her gratitude as one of the lucky ones, and she left the area intact."
"The Malibu artist's birthday party and best wishes come at a bittersweet time, because her and her future husband's Malibu family were recently destroyed by an uncontrollable wildfire in California a few weeks ago."
"Thank you so much for being in my life."
"You are more precious than ever."
"Happy Birthday to my dear daughter," Hemsworth wrote a picture of her fiancee next to the colored balloon
The 57 year old minstrel wrote in a photo of Cyrus's Nest: "may everyone have peace and love. The birthday girl in this photo is smiling and waiting to enjoy her pink cake."
"My thoughts and prayers, there are so many hearts to repair."



Number  241
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The Bachelorette” airs Mondays at 8 p.m. on ABC, “Jimmy Kimmel Live!” airs 11:35 p.m. on ABC.”
““I woke up the other night and he was over my bed peeling a banana.”“Is this real or is this a joke?”
“Lucas Yancey, 31, didn’t seem too traumatized by his rejection, however, and later in the evening appeared on “Jimmy Kimmel Live!” talking to the late-night host from his Santa Monica, California, apartment.”
“After airing a montage of the nuttiest Whaboom highlights in which Bachelorette Rachel Lindsay looked as confused by his antics as Yancey’s rival contestants, Jimmy Kimmel asked where the catchphrase and signature body gyration came from.”
“Also Read: Why BTS, Kyrie Irving and Lucas Yancey Are TV's Social Media MVPs of the WeekAs predicted, it was inspired by rubber-faced actor Jim Carrey.”
“Apparently producers were more impressed by Yancey’s “Ace Ventura” impersonation, which he listed as one of his special skills along with juggling, than Kimmel.”
““So you wowed them with a movie that came out 25 years ago?” he asked.”
“As for the Whaboom, “there’s always haters and lovers,” Yancey said.”
“Also Read: 'Bachelorette' Contestant Puts the 'Whaboom' Into Reality Dating Show's Limo Arrivals (Video)One of those haters was Blake, especially after Yancey bizarrely told Rachel he didn’t know if he had a crush on him or not.”
“Did he finish the banana?” she asked.”


"Bachelor" aired on ABC at 8 p.m. Monday, "live with Jimmy Kimmel! "ABC broadcast at 11:35 p.m."
"I woke up that night and he was peeling bananas in my bed." "Is it true or is it a joke?"
However, Lucas Jancy, 31, didn't seem to be too hurt by his refusal, and later appeared in the evening's "Jimmy Kimmel live show"! "Talk to your late night host in your apartment in Santa Monica, California."
"After playing a montage clip of one of the craziest whoboom highlights, Rachel Lindsay, the bachelor, looks as confused by her antics as Yancey's competitors, and Jimmy Kimmel asks where catchwords and iconic body spins come from."
"Read another: why BTS, Kyrie Irving and Lucas Yancey are the TV social media MVP predicted by weekas, inspired by rubber faced actor Jim Carrey."
Obviously, the producer was more impressed by the imitation of Yancey's "Ace Ventura", who listed it as one of his specialties along with juggling, rather than Kimmel
"So you surprised them with a movie 25 years ago? "He asked
"As for whaboom," there are always haters and lovers, "Yancey said
"Also read: 'single woman' contestant turns' whaboom 'into reality blind date show limousine arrives (video) one of the hatred is black, especially in Yangxi who strangely tells Rachel that he doesn't know if he has a crush on him."
"Has he finished eating bananas? "She asked



Number  242
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“"We love and admire you, champion," she said.”
“...were all giddy when Rodriguez recently posted a touching message for her boyfriend...”
“On Nov. 2, Rodriguez wrote a touching post about her love for Ronaldo, who is the father of her first child.”
“"What a special day!”
“Let's toast for now without alcohol and instead with your well-deserved trophies.”
“For all of your effort, dedication, sacrifice, and so many hours of training to be at another level.”
“Your life is soccer, and this is clearly reflected on the field.”
“Keep being like this, always striving, and I'll be here by your side, supporting you, giving you love, tranquility and all that you need when you get home," wrote Rodriguez.”
“The Spanish model also told her 32-year-old athlete boyfriend that in good times or in bad times, she would be there for him.”


Submit
"We love you and admire you, champion," she said
“… When Rodriguez recently sent a touching message to her boyfriend, she felt dizzy.... "
"On November 2, Rodriguez wrote a touching post about her love for Ronaldo, the father of her first child
"What a special day!"
"Now let's drink to it. Don't drink. Instead, get the trophy you deserve."
"For all your hard work, dedication, sacrifice, and so many hours of training, I'm going to take you to another level."
"Your life is football, it's clear on the pitch," he said
Rodriguez wrote: "keep doing this, keep working hard, I will be by your side, support you, give you love, peace and everything you need when you go home."
"The Spanish model also told her 32 year old athletic boyfriend that she would be with him in good times and bad."



Number  243
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“The former friends are feuding over cheating accusations.”
“Kelly Dodd isn’t calling a truce with Meghan King Edmonds any time soon!”
“The RHOC stars have been at odds since Edmonds, 32, asked Dodd, 41, if it was true that she was cheating on Michael with her boyfriend — and Dodd responded by telling Edmonds that her husband Jim was having an affair while she was pregnant.”
“Dodd carried their feud over to her Bravo blog, where she commented on her costars’ marriages — and took a stab at the Edmonds’ relationship!”
““How great are our guys?” she wrote before talking about Diko and Peggy Sulahian and Doug and Lydia McLaughlin.”
““Michael too supports my decision to get a breast reduction, even though he thinks my boobs are ‘perfect,’” she continued.”
““He respects that it is my body and whatever makes me happy is his priority.”
“Michael has always been there with me at every medical procedure.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Former friends were at loggerheads over fraud charges."
"Kelly Dodd won't have a truce with Megan King Edmonds soon!"
"RhoC stars have been at loggerheads ever since Edmonds, 32, asked Dodd, 41, if she was cheating on Michael with her boyfriend - Dodd's answer was to tell Edmonds that her husband Jim had an affair during her pregnancy."
Dodd brought their grudges to her blog, where she commented on the marriage of her partners and attacked the relationship between the Edmonds! "
"How good are our people? "She wrote before talking about Deco, Peggy sulashin, Doug and Lydia McLaughlin."
"Michael also supported my decision to shrink my breasts, even though he thought my breasts were 'perfect'," she continued
"He respects my body and anything that makes me happy is his priority."
"Michael's with me every time I'm in the process."



Number  244
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Its previous seasons have tackled different narratives, but have kept certain cast members like Peters and Paulson, and intertwined some plot points through the series.”
“FX previously renewed “AHS” through Season 9.”
“...a series of mysterious teasers...”
“Despite the lack of information so far AHS fans still know more about Season 7 than they did at this point ahead of the previous season Roanoke Murphy and FX kept that installment s theme and title under wraps all the way up until its season premiere whetting appetites with...”
“Lena Dunham is also joining the new season, it was announced on Wednesday.”
“What we do know, however, is that “AHS” veterans Evan Peters and Sarah Paulson are returning, joined by franchise newcomers Billie Lourd (who worked with Murphy on “Scream Queens”) and “Billy on the Street’s” Billy Eichner.”
“Per usual, still little is known about Season 7.”
“You can watch video of the presentation below.”
“A floating barge sprayed a massive wall of water into the air, with the teaser being projected onto the water.”
“The announcement was made with a special presentation in the marina behind the San Diego Convention center.”


"Its first few seasons dealt with different narratives, but retained some actors, such as Peters and Paulson, and interweaved some emotional nodes through the series."
FX updated "ahs" before season 9
“… A series of mysterious provocations... "
"Despite the lack of information so far, AHS fans still know more about Season 7 than they did before last season. Roanoke Murphy and FX kept the theme and title of this season secret until the premiere of season 7, which greatly increased the audience's appetite..."
"Lena Dunham will also join the new season, which was announced on Wednesday
"However, what we know is that ah veterans Evan Peters and Sarah Paulson are coming back, and rookies Billy Lauder (who worked with Murphy on the Scream Queen) and Billy ashner will be coming back as well."
"As a rule, I don't know much about season seven."
"You can watch the video of the presentation below."
A floating barge jetted a huge wall of water into the air and the teaser was thrown to the surface
"This announcement is a special presentation at the dock behind the San Diego Convention Center."



Number  245
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Sending you so much love and healing.””
“!” Jenna Dewan commented on the video.”
“...health struggle that she says knocked her confidence as a woman The singer revealed on Instagram Wednesday that she underwent laparoscopic surgery in December to have six fibroid tumors removed from her uterus...”
“She compared the tumors’ sizes to two apples, three kiwis and a few strawberries — “a fruit bowl of pain everyday,” she wrote — and added that the weight and size of the growths was proportional to being six months pregnant.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I tried to be brave but it was excruciating at times and to be honest I started to doubt if my body would ever feel the same again,” she shared.”
“I had surgery in December and I was so scared despite lots of love from friends and family I felt really alone and my confidence as a woman was knocked FKA twigs who split from fiancé Robert Pattinson last year said she struggled with the decision to come forward about...”
“...her battle...”
“However, a dance session sparked her confidence.”
““Today whilst dancing with Kelly at the choreography house I felt like my strong self again for the first time in a while and it was magical,” she captioned the black and white video of her doing a pole dancing routine.”


"Send you so much love and healing."
"!" Jenna Dewan commented on the video. "
“…… She said her health struggle has hit her confidence as a woman. The singer revealed on instagram on Wednesday that she underwent laparoscopic surgery in December last year and removed six fibromas from her uterus... "
"She compared the size of the tumor to two apples, three kiwifruit and some strawberries - she wrote:" there is a bowl of fruit ache every day - and added that the weight and size of the tumor growth is proportional to six months of pregnancy. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I tried to be brave, but sometimes it was painful, and to be honest, I began to wonder if my body would feel the same," she said
"I had an operation in December last year. Despite the love of many friends and family, I was still scared. I really felt lonely. My self-confidence was like that of a woman who was knocked down. When she broke up with her fiance Robert Pattinson last year, she said that it was difficult for her to make a decision to stand up..."
“… Her fight... "
"But a dance lesson inspired her confidence."
"Today, when Kelly and I were dancing in the choreographer's house, I felt very strong for the first time, which was amazing," she explained in the black-and-white video for her pole dance performance



Number  246
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Megan McCluskey at megan.mccluskey@time.com.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“Following Twitter user Mike Edgette s viral discovery that the official KFC account only follows the five former Spice Girls and six men named Herb a reference to the secret blend of 11 herbs and spices in Colonel Sanders fried chicken recipe the fast food giant has rewarded Edgette with...”
“...a priceless gift...”
““@KFC follows 11 people,” he wrote in an October tweet that has been liked over 715,000 times and retweeted more than 322,000.”
““Those 11 people?”
“5 Spice Girls and 6 guys named Herb.”
“11 Herbs & Spices.”
“I need time to process this.”Now, Edgette has shared that KFC thanked him for his investigative work by commissioning a portrait of its founder giving him a piggyback ride through a beautiful woodland landscape.”
““Dreams DO come true,” he tweeted on Saturday alongside several shots of the glorious painting, adding the hashtag #GiddyUpColonel.”


"To Megan McCluskey Megan McCluskey @ time.com."
Please enter a valid email address
"Following twitter user Mike edgette's viral discovery that KFC's official account only focused on five former Spice Girls and six men named herb, the fast food giant awarded edgette a secret blend of 11 herbs and spices..."
“… Priceless gift... "
"KFC follows 11 people," he wrote in a microblog in October, which had more than 715000 hits and 322000 forwards
"The eleven?"
"Five spice girls and six guys named herb."
"11 herbs and spices."
"I need time to deal with it." Now, edgette tells us that KFC thanks him for his research work and commissioned a portrait of the founder to carry his car through a beautiful woodland
"The dream will really come true," he tweeted on Saturday, along with a few photos of the brilliant painting, labeled "giddy up colon."



Number  247
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’ll know soon enough.”
“So nobody knows anything about the battle in Manhattan that ends with Tony Stark and Peter Parker hitching a ride on the spaceship.”
“Near the end of last week s episode of Agents Of S H I E L D which aired the same Friday that Avengers Infinity War was opening at the box office a character briefly alluded to the weird stuff happening in New York referencing the giant ship that appeared...”
“...in the sky containing Thanos servants and the subsequent battle...”
“This week, the episode “The One Who Will Save Us All” comes right out and says it: Thanos is attacking the earth.”
“However, it’s a bit of a cheat.”
“See, the S.H.I.E.L.D.”
“...agents are currently in an underground facility called the Lighthouse, and the entire grounds, along with the small town under which it sits, have been cut off from the rest of the world.”
“The sole person who learns about Thanos is General Glenn Talbot who is told about the Titan s invasion only because the aliens he s currently ensconced with oh Talbot has traveled to a distant ship far from earth are trying to trick him into going through with a potentially...”
“Far stranger things have happened.”


"We'll find out soon."
"So no one knows anything about the battle of Manhattan, which ended with Tony Stark and Peter Parker on a spaceship."
"When the last episode of agent s hi el d, the endless war of the Avengers, which aired last Friday, was about to open at the box office, a character briefly hinted at strange things that happened in New York and mentioned the giant ship that appeared in New York..."
“… In the sky there are tanos' servants and the subsequent battles... "
"This week, an episode of the people who save us all came out and said: tanos is attacking the earth."
"But it's a bit of cheating."
"Look, s.h.i.e.l.d."
“…… The agent is currently in an underground facility called lighthouse, and the entire site, together with the town, is isolated from the rest of the world. "
"The only person who knows about tanos is general Glenn Talbot, who was told of Titan's invasion only because the alien he's hiding with o'talbot has gone to a distant spaceship far away from the earth, trying to lure him to a possible ship
"Something very strange has happened."



Number  248
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She is also very happy with Harry,&r Read moreOlivia Culpo Enjoys a Boat Party in Miami Ahead of the Super Bowl Olivia Culpo is having fun in Florida ahead of the Super Bowl!”
“Olivia and Harry are currently working together on the upcoming movie Don’t Worry Darling, which she is directing, in addition to starring in alongside Harry and Florence Pugh.”
“Lucy Hale has adopted a new puppy!”
“He was nominated for Best Actor for his role in Ma Rainey’s Black Bottom, Best Supporting Actor for his role in Da 5 Bloods, and was Read moreLucy Hale's New Puppy Ethel Was Once Fostered by This Famous Actress!”
“Chadwick made history becoming the first actor to be nominated for four SAG Awards in a single year.”
“The 33-year-old Creed actor took to Instagram on Friday (February 5) to pay tribute to his late Black Panther co-star after he made history with all of his nominations at the 2021 SAG Awards.”
“A few days earlier, Emily took to Instagram to Read moreMichael B Jordan Honors Late Chadwick Boseman After Making History with SAG Awards Nominations Michael B. Jordan is remembering his late friend Chadwick Boseman.”
“Emily showed off growing baby bump in a short, black sweatshirt paired with black sweatpants, a gray blazer, and tan boots while the 33-year-old film producer sported bright orange sweats for their walk.”
“The 29-year-old pregnant model and actress stepped out for an afternoon walk around the neighborhood with hubby Sebastian Bear-McClard and their dog Colombo on Saturday (February 6) in New York City.”
“Well, after all these years I have just 7 words to say to you: ‘Live from New York, it’s Saturday Night!&r Read moreEmily Ratajkowski Shows Off Bare Baby Bump While Out with Hubby Sebastian Bear-McClard Emily Ratajkowski is showing off her bare belly!”


"She's happy to be with Harry, too, & R read more about Olivia cabo having a boat party in Miami before the Super Bowl! Olivia cabo had a good time in Florida before the Super Bowl!"
"Olivia and Harry are currently working on the upcoming film don't worry, honey, which she is directing and starring in with Harry and Florence pug."
"Lucy Hale has adopted a new puppy!"
"He was nominated for Best Actor for his role in Marlene's" black butt "and best supporting actor for his role in" big five blood ", and got more information. Lucy Hale's new dog Ethel was raised by the famous actress!"
"Chadwick made history as the first actor to be nominated for four sag awards in one year."
"The 33 year old creed actor saluted his late Panther partner on instagram last Friday (February 5) after making history by winning all nominations at the 2021 sag awards ceremony."
"A few days ago, Emily read more on instagram. Michael Jordan made history with his sag nomination in memory of the late Chadwick Bosman. Jordan is remembering his late friend, Chadwick Bosman
Wearing a black sweatshirt, black sweatpants, gray blazer and tan boots, Emily showed the audience the growing baby lump, while the 33 year old filmmaker walked in a bright orange sweatshirt
"The 29 year old pregnant model and actress took a walk in the neighborhood with her husband Sebastian bear mcclard and their dog, Colombo, in New York City on Saturday (February 6) and came out for an afternoon walk."
"Well, over the years, I have only seven words to say to you:" live from New York, today is Saturday night! &Read more Emily latajkovsky shows her naked belly when she's out with her husband Sebastian bell mcclard! Emily latajkovsky shows her naked belly



Number  249
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Based on the looks of this list, we have some pretty exciting weddings to look forward to!”
“Here is your complete guide to every current celebrity engagement.”
“Did we mention that One Direction bandmate Liam Payne put a ring on his girlfriend of two years at the end of August?”
“We're still obsessing over Brooklyn Beckham and Nicola Peltz's romantic engagement, which happened in July.”
“And even during the COVID-19 pandemic in 2020, celebrities haven't allowed the quarantine to stop them from popping the question.”
“Emma Stone and Dave McCary made things official in December that year and so many celebs sported new bling after the holidays!”
“In 2019, we started the year on an exciting foot with Katy Perry and Orlando Bloom and Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez announcing their engagements less than a month apart!”
“It seems that nearly every week, a new celebrity couple got engaged and inspired some major engagement ring envy.”
“As far as the love lives of your favorite celebrities are concerned, several A-list couples have made things official by getting engaged in recent months.”


"Based on what this list looks like, we have some pretty exciting weddings to look forward to!"
"This is a complete guide to all your current celebrity engagements."
"Did we mention one direction? The band's teammate Liam Penn wore a ring to his girlfriend of two years at the end of August?"
"We're still obsessed with the romantic engagement of Beckham and Nicolas Peltz in Brooklyn, which took place in July."
"Even during the 2020 pandemic, celebrities are not allowed to be quarantined to prevent them from asking this question."
"Emma stone and Dave McCarry officially announced it in December that year, so many celebrities put on new jewelry after the festival!"
"In 2019, Katie Perry, Orlando Bloom, Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez announced their date less than a month apart, and we started the new year with exciting steps!"
"It seems that almost every week there's a new celebrity engagement and people are jealous of the engagement ring."
"As far as the love life of your favorite celebrity is concerned, in recent months, several A-level couples have been engaged, which has made things official."



Number  250
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“After teaching us a lesson in couple's twinning over the weekend, let's see if they'll match again tonight on the red carpet.”
“This year's gala will mark their 10th time attending together.”
“Bundchen and Brady, who wed in 2009, made their first joint appearance at the ball in 2008.”
“The duo will serve as co-chairs for tonight's Met Gala, along with Katy Perry and Pharrell Williams.”
“Meanwhile, the Patriots quarterback added some unexpected texture to his outfit with a deep green velvet blazer over black jeans and boots.”
“The supermodel opted for a tailored look with a cropped jacket, tapered trousers, heeled sandals and a circular clutch.”
“The couple was spotted having a twinning moment yesterday, as they sported matching suits and white tees in New York City.”
“The Image DirectGisele Bundchen and Tom Brady were suited up the night before the Met Gala.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"After giving us a weekend couple lesson, let's see if they're going to play on the red carpet tonight."
"This year's party will be their 10th together."
"Bonchen and Brady got married in 2009 and first appeared together at the ball in 2008."
"The pair will co chair tonight's met Party with Katie Perry and Farrell Williams."
Meanwhile, the Patriots quarterback wore a dark green velvet jacket over his black jeans and boots, adding an unexpected touch to his outfit
"The supermodel chose a well tailored look, with a short jacket, tapered pants, high-heeled sandals and a circular clutch."
Yesterday, the couple were seen in New York wearing matching suits and white T-shirts. They were pairing
"Image directors Giselle bunchen and Tom Brady got dressed the night before the met Party."



Number  251
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“$240 million of that share comes from Oscar, a millennial-focused health insurance company Josh founded in 2012.”
“Forbes estimated in 2016 that the Kushners were worth $1.8 billion, with their main sources of income being real estate ($1.15 billion) and venture capital investments ($420 million).”
“Kloss wore a custom Dior gown.”
“The couple tied the knot on October 18, 2018 in a small, Jewish ceremony in Upstate New York with fewer than 80 guests, according to People.”
“He married Kloss in 2018.”
“She regularly gets involved in political campaigns, with Joshua supporting her at political marches including March for Our Lives in 2018.”
“It seems as though Joshua shares his wife's political views—Kloss was vocal about voting for Hillary Clinton.”
“According to The Daily Mail, "Josh and Jared’s parents were Democratic donors until 2016."”
“Forbes also reported that the Democrat did not vote for Trump in the 2016 election.”
“It's important to be open minded and learn from differing opinions."”


"Of that, 240 million came from Oscars, a health insurance company founded by Josh in 2012 that focuses on Millennials."
Forbes estimates in 2016 that the kushners' assets are $1.8 billion, and their main sources of income are real estate (US $1.15 billion) and venture capital (US $420 million)
"Klaus is wearing a custom-made Dior dress."
"According to people, the couple held a small Jewish wedding in upstate New York on October 18, 2018, with less than 80 guests."
"He married Klaus in 2018."
"She has always been involved in political activities, and Joshua has supported her in political processions, including the" March for our lives "in 2018
"It seems that Joshua and his wife share the same political views, and so does cross's vote for Hillary Clinton."
"Josh and Jared's parents were both Democratic donors until 2016," the Daily Mail said
"Forbes also reported that the Democrats did not vote for trump in the 2016 election."
"It's important to be open-minded and learn from different opinions."



Number  252
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Given that Ratajkowski and Gomez are friends, the ladies might be on the same wavelength.”
“When you get bored with not matching, you can always swap shoes to complete your pair.”
“Plus, there’s a bright side to someone having the same mismatched pair as you.”
“Of course, both women looked equally incredible, and likely inspired legions of fans to mismatch their shoe collection as well.”
“On one ear, Ratajkowski sported a gold square, while the other flaunted a silver circle.”
“She also kept the mismatched theme going with different dangly earrings.”
“However, instead of Gomez’s LBD, the supermodel opted to go lighter with an oversized white shirtdress.”
“In early October, three weeks ago, Emily Ratajkowski wore the exact same pair when she was attending a party for Paris Fashion Week.”
“As unconventional as Gomez’s heels were, she wasn’t the first to sport them.”
“And though the shoes complement each other with similar children’s blocks-shaped heels, they are far from identical.”


"Given that ratakikovsky and Gomez are friends, the two ladies may have the same idea."
"When you are tired of not matching, you can always change a pair of shoes to complete your matching."
"In addition, some people and you have the same mismatch, but also have a bright side."
"Of course, these two women look equally incredible, and they are likely to inspire a lot of fans and make their shoe line mismatched."
One ear is wearing a Golden Square, and the other is showing off a silver circle
"She also kept the mismatched theme with different pendant earrings."
"However, the supermodel did not choose Gomez's LBD, but chose the oversized white shirt skirt to look lighter."
"Three weeks ago in early October, Emily ratajkowski was wearing the same pair at a Paris fashion week party."
"Although Gomez's high heels are very unconventional, she is not the first one to wear them."
"Although these shoes as like as two peas of high heels, they are far from the same."



Number  253
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Young love: While she split from One Direction star Zayn Malik in March after a lengthy romance, the couple appear to be rekindling their relationship; seen in 2017”
“...signature long blonde hair was worn in loose curls and caught the wind as she left her apartment building...”
“And Gigi Hadid showed off her impeccable form as she sauntered out of her apartment complex on Tuesday afternoon in New York.”
“The 23-year-old siren went braless wearing a dark blue tank top and turned the gritty city sidewalk as her own special runway.”
“City slicker: Gigi Hadid showed off her impeccable form as she sauntered out of her apartment complex on Tuesday afternoon in New YorkGigi looked stunning in her casually cool summer attire, complete with high-waisted denim trousers which were hemmed just above her ankles.”
“She showed off her supremely slender waistline and opted to go braless underneath a slinky blue top.”
“The Victoria's Secret stunner added inches to her already statuesque form with a pair of nude patent leather pumps.”
“Beauty The 23 year old siren went braless wearing a dark blue tank top and turned the gritty city sidewalk as her own special runway Walk it out The Victoria s Secret stunner added inches to her already statuesque form with a pair of nude patent leather pumps Gigi s...”
“She added even more blue hues to her summery ensemble with a pair of blue lenses and a massive Chanel purse worn across her forearm.”
“The couple were spotted kissing in New York last month and have since made their way back on to each other's social media channels.”


"Young love: after a long romance, she broke up with" one way "star Zane Malik in March, and the couple seem to be rekindling their relationship; photo taken in 2017"
“…… The iconic long golden hair is curly, and it floats away when you leave the apartment... "
"Gigi Hadid showed her impeccable form as she walked out of the apartment building in New York on Tuesday afternoon."
"The 23-year-old siren, wearing a dark blue vest, has no courage to turn the city sidewalk into her own special runway."
"Urban Playboy: Gigi Hadid showed off her impeccable figure when she walked out of the apartment building in New York on Tuesday afternoon. Gigi looked gorgeous in her cool summer clothes and high waisted jeans above her ankles."
"She showed off her extremely slim waistline and chose to slouch under a tight blue top."
"Victoria's Secret stuntman added a few inches to her already sculptural figure with a pair of nude patent leather heels."
"The 23-year-old siren is wearing a dark blue vest. When she" goes out "on her special runway, she turns a corner on the sidewalk of the city. Victoria's Secret stuntman adds a few inches to her original sculptural figure with a pair of nude patent leather high heels gigis..."
"She wore a pair of blue lenses and a huge chanel purse on her forearm, adding more blue to her summer suit."
"Last month, the couple was found kissing in New York and then back on each other's social media channel."



Number  254
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Kanye West and Kim Kardashian West with children North and Saint | Credit: Kim Kardashian/Instagram...”
“Love it,” Kardashian West said while showing off a second, and much more sparkly, purse.”
“5 year old is already celebrating in style...”
“Sharing a photo of one of her daughter’s early birthday gifts — a mini leopard-print handbag that’s worth $750 — Kim Kardashian West gushed, “Oh my god, North is the luckiest girl in the world.”
“Who gets this bag from Alexander Wang?”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After thanking the acclaimed luxury designer, who recently dressed Kardashian West’s younger sister Kylie Jenner and her boyfriend Travis Scott at the Met Gala, the mother of three added, “I might steal this.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletterImage zoom Credit: Kim Kardashian/InstagramAt the time, the KKW Beauty mogul didn’t see that Wang had actually sent her daughter a second bag, but she realized the mistake hours later.”
““Wait, look at this Wang bag that North got, I cannot even believe it.”
“I missed this last night.”
“Enthusiastically, she added, “I’m stealing this !!!!”


"Image zooming Kanye West and Kim Kardashian West and children's north and Saint | image source: Kim Kardashian / instagram..."
"I love it," said Kardashian West, flaunting her second, brighter wallet
"Five year olds are already celebrating..."
"Sharing a picture of one of my daughter's early birthday gifts - a $750 Mini Leopard Print Handbag - Kim Kardashian West gushes," my God, north is the luckiest girl in the world. "
"Who got this bag from Leehom Wang? Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The mother of three thanks the acclaimed luxury designer who recently dressed Kardashian West's sister Kelly Jenner and her boyfriend Travis Scott at a metropolitan celebration, adding: "I might steal this." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, and celebrity mom blogs? "
"Click here to see these and more image zooming credits in people magazine: Kim Kardashian / instagram at that time, the kkw beauty tycoon didn't see Wang Fei actually send her daughter a second bag, but she realized the mistake a few hours later."
"Wait a minute. Look at the Wang Bao I got from the north. I can't believe it."
"I missed this last night."
She added enthusiastically, "I'm stealing this!!"



Number  255
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At the time, a source told Us Weekly, “They were cuddled up and holding hands.””
“Last month, Janet and Jermaine were reportedly spotted together at STK in Atlanta.”
“While Dupri acknowledged that the fans want them to reconcile, he said, "None of this stuff is actually true."”
“It's just speculation, I guess, when somebody gets single,” the 45-year-old pointed out.”
““Nobody has ever seen us together...”
“Watch!”
“He said, “I don't know anything about it.”When asked if they are friends, Dupri answered, “I don't know if that's… We've always been friends… I don't know if we've never not been friends."”
“On Tuesday, Dupri made an appearance on Power 105.1'S Breakfast Club, where he laughed off the rumors.”
“SplashNewsFor months, reconciliation rumors have been swirling about singer Janet Jackson and music producer Jermaine Dupri.”


"At the time, a source told us weekly," they were held together, hand in hand. "
Last month, it was reported that Janet and Jermaine were found together at STK in Atlanta
"While Dupree admits fans want them to reconcile, he said," none of this is true. "
"I think it's just speculation when someone is single," the 45 year old pointed out
"No one has seen us together..."
"Be careful!"
"He said," I don't know anything. "When asked if they were friends, Dupree replied," I don't know if that's We have always been friends I don't know if we've never been friends. "
"On Tuesday, Dupree appeared at the breakfast club of POWER 105.1 and laughed off the rumors."
For months, there have been rumors of a reconciliation between singer Janet Jackson and music producer Jermaine Dupree



Number  256
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Miller will now be recognized by the industry that she completed her certificates for.”
“The reality TV personality also passed her ACE — Adult Continuing Education — class and received a certificate for real estate.”
“Us Weekly exclusively confirmed in December that Miller completed a prison Release Preparation Program and received a certificate in personal finance on December 15.”
“Miller, who has been replaced on Dance Moms by Cheryl Burke, began serving her time at the Victorville, California, federal prison in July.”
“She was also ordered to two years of supervised release and fined $40,000 along with a $120,000 judgment.”
“...owner 51 was sentenced in May 2017 for bankruptcy fraud and bringing 120 000 worth of Australian currency into the United States without reporting it...”
“I am feeling great and ready to turn over a new leaf thank you so much to everyone for your support especially my nearest and dearest I love you all and yes this is me in prison abbyleemiller abbylee dancemoms dance aldc As previously reported The Abby Lee Dance Company...”
“...have been confirmed at this time...”
“I have made friends with both inmates and staff I ve tried to better myself participated in anything offered to me and I am a better person for this experience She continued All the press stories and speculation are not entirely correct however I am feeling hopeful but no dates...”
“I did so with grace, the stories you read about me been a princess are untrue.”


"Miller will now be recognized by the industry in which she completed the certificate."
"The reality TV star also passed a first-class adult continuing education course and got a real estate certificate."
"US weekly exclusively confirmed in December last year that Miller had completed the prison release preparation plan and obtained his personal financial certificate on December 15."
Miller has been replaced as a dance mom by Cheryl Burke, who began serving her sentence at Victorville federal prison in California in July
"She was also jailed for two years, fined 40000 yuan and sentenced to 120000 yuan at the same time."
“…… Owner No. 51 was sentenced for bankruptcy fraud in May 2017 and brought a $120000 worth into the United States without declaration... "
"I feel very good and ready to turn to a new page. Thank you very much for your support, especially my closest friends. I love all of you. Yes, this is what I reported before I was in prison Abbey, Emile, Abbey, ALDC, Abbey..."
“… Currently confirmed... "
"I've made friends with prisoners and staff, I've worked hard to improve myself and participated in any activities offered to me, I'm a better person because of this experience, she continued. All the news reports and guesses are not completely correct, but I feel hopeful, but there is no date..."
"I did it politely. The story you read about me as a princess is not true."



Number  257
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...jumping the gun the show still has to finishing filming and air which will likely prompt a whole new round of conversation as to how ABC has handled discussing this upsetting and highly confusing incident...”
“While I never filed complaints or accusations against anyone associated with Bachelor in Paradise, my team and I felt it was very important to be thorough in getting to the bottom of what had occurred.”
“In a new statement released Thursday, first tweeted out by blogger Reality Steve, former Bachelor in Paradise contestant Corinne Olympios reveals that the independent investigation her team was conducting into what did or did not happen to her on the set of the reality show has come to a close.”
“Last week after Warner Bros finished their internal investigation and stated that they did not find any evidence of misconduct by a cast member Olympios s lawyer Marty Singer released a strongly worded statement suggesting that nothing was to be considered closed until they had completed their own look into...”
“...the incident...”
“In her new statement, Olympios says that she was invited to come back to this season of the show, but declined the offer.”
“In light of the overwhelming amount of misinformation that has been spread in the media, I want to clarify a few things.”
“My intent over the past few weeks has been to learn and understand what happened on June 4.”
“I felt victimized by the fact that others were judging me through conflicting and unsubstantiated reports, while I myself had no recollection of the events that transpired.”
“While Olympios s remarks seem to suggest she will be keeping a low profile for now and nothing either of them have said alludes to whether any settlements have been worked out with ABC as has been wildly speculated to say this is the end of this saga would be...”


“… The shooting and broadcasting of the show still need to be completed, which may lead to a new round of talks about how ABC deals with this disturbing and highly chaotic event... "
"Although I've never complained or charged anyone with anything to do with singles in heaven, my team and I feel it's important to find out what's going on."
"In a new statement released on Thursday, former paradise bachelor Corinne olympios revealed for the first time on twitter that her team is approaching the end of an independent investigation into what happened or didn't happen to her on the reality show."
"Last week, after Warner Bros. completed an internal investigation and said it had found no evidence of misconduct by the actor Olympus, its lawyer, Marty singer, issued a strongly worded statement implying that after they completed their investigation of Nothing can be considered closed until the investigation is completed. "
“… Event
"In a new statement, Olympus said she was invited to perform this season, but declined the invitation."
"In view of the large amount of misinformation spread in the media, I would like to clarify a few things."
"In the past few weeks, my goal has been to understand and understand what happened on June 4."
"I feel victimized when others judge me by contradictory and unfounded reports, while I have no memory of what happened."
"Although Olympus's remarks seem to imply that she will keep a low profile at present, neither of them mentioned whether they have reached any settlement agreement with ABC, because it has been widely speculated that this will be the end of this legend..."



Number  258
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The overall effect is compelling, contemporary, arresting.”Image zoom Credit: Mert Alas and Marcus PiggottHow It’s Done: Bella Hadid’s Sexy Cat Eyes...”
““And then there’s Bella, back for a second season, who brings with her a rock-and-roll attitude that’s also playful and seductive.”
“Image zoom Credit: Mert Alas and Marcus Piggott“This campaign really represents the authentic energy of the brand—modern, sensual, powerful,” Zanotti said in the press release.”
“The inspiration behind the photos was of an “endless summer” which was channeled through a ’90s vibe (re: the high pony and high-cut leotard).”
“The shoot was photographed by Mert Alas and Marcus Piggott and styled by the famed Carine Roitfeld who all have close relationships with Bella, which resulted in “great energy” on set.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“And while the shoot shows her throwing her signature sharp-eyed stares, we couldn’t help but notice that her pantsless bodysuit look is surprisingly similar to Gigi’s past campaigns.”
“Image zoom Credit: Mert Alas and Marcus PiggottBella just reprised her role with the designer shoe brand as the star of its spring 2018 campaign (she previously modeled in the fall 2017 collection ads).”
“And now it looks like she gave a few pointers to little sis Bella Hadid, because her latest Giuseppe Zanotti campaign looks straight from Gigi’s posing playbook.”
“It seems that somewhere in her contract it’s written that “pants are not required.” From Stuart Weitzman to Tommy Hilfiger and even Reebok ads, Gigi has a pattern of going pantsless on set.”


"The overall effect is eye-catching, contemporary and eye-catching." Image zooming credit: how metteras and Marcus pigot do it: Bella Hadid's sexy cat's eye
"And Bella, the second season is back, she brings the attitude of rock music, it's fun, it's tempting."
"Image zooming credit: Mott Arras and Marcus pigot" the movement truly represents the real energy of the brand, modern, perceptual and powerful, Zanotti said in a press release
The inspiration behind these photos comes from an "endless summer", which is a 1990s atmosphere (theme: short ponies and high waisted tights)
"This photo was taken by Mert ARAS and Marcus Piggott. It was designed by the famous Karin rothfield. She has a close relationship with Bella, which makes the set full of" great energy. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"With her trademark sharp eyes, we can't help noticing that her pantless tights look is strikingly similar to Gigi's past campaign."
"Credit for image zooming: Mert alas and Marcus Piggott Bella have just recaptured their roles with designer shoe brands, becoming stars of the spring 2018 event (she was previously a model in the fall 2017 ad Series)."
"Now it seems that she gave some advice to her younger sister, Bella Hadid, because her recent Giuseppe Zanotti campaign seems to have come directly from Gigi's play."
It seems that her contract says "no pants.". From Stuart weizman to Tommy Hilfiger, and even Reebok, Gigi has the habit of wearing pants on set



Number  259
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The VMAs are back in New York for the first time in nine years at Radio City Music Hall.”
“This year, Cardi B leads the way with 10 nominations, followed by music royalty Jay-Z and Beyoncé with eight nominations for their video “APES**T.” Childish Gambino is a close third with seven nominations.”
“The list of VMAs’ presenters includes Tiffany Haddish, Kevin Hart, Millie Bobby Brown and Amandla Stenberg.”
“Luckily, Jennifer Lopez won’t have to worry about handing herself the Video Vanguard Award (although, given her work ethic, she’d find a way).”
“Back in 2011, a series of high-profile presenters stepped in to steer the program (Remember Lady Gaga as the iconic Jo Calderone?).”
“Katy Perry took over the reigns last year after a similarly hostless show in 2016.”
“It’s not the first time the VMAs opted out of a traditional emcee.”
“Monday night’s show will air without a proper host, a representative for MTV confirmed.”
“The 2018 MTV Video Music Awards are going solo.”


"VMA is back in New York for the first time in nine years, performing at the broadcasting City Concert Hall."
"This year, Cardi B topped the list with 10 nominations, followed by music magnates Jay-Z and Beyonce, whose video ape * * t won eight nominations. "The childish Gambino followed with seven nominations."
"The host list of Vmas includes Tiffany hadish, Kevin Hart, Millie Bobbie brown and Mandela Steinberg."
"Fortunately, Jennifer Lopez doesn't have to worry about presenting herself with a video Pioneer Award (though, given her work ethic, she'll do something about it."
"As early as 2011, a series of well-known hosts got involved in the show (remember Lady Gaga is the iconic Jo Calderone?)."
"Katy Perry took over the throne last year after a similar no host show in 2016."
"This is not the first time VMA has chosen to leave the traditional host."
"Monday night's show will be broadcast without a suitable host, confirmed a representative of MTV."
"The 2018 MTV Music Video Awards will be a solo."



Number  260
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ahead, find out where they are now.”
“...biggest names in Hollywood...”
“Telling the story of the everyday foibles and lives of a group of co workers at a paper company in Scranton Pa The Office brought the workplace comedy to new heights and provided a platform to showcase the talents of individuals who have gone on to become some of the...”
“Once famous for the likes of Friends, Will & Grace, and Seinfeld, NBC began a new era of comedy dominance with the workplace comedy that made stars out of Steve Carell, John Krasinski, and Jenna Fischer, while providing a launching pad for Mindy Kaling, Ed Helms, Ellie Kemper, and more.”
“When The Office made its midseason debut on NBC on March 24, 2005, it became a sleeper hit for the network and eventually went on to revive its Thursday night comedy line-up.”


"Ahead, find out where they are now."
“… Hollywood's big brand... "
"About the daily routine and life of a group of colleagues at a paper company in Scranton, Pennsylvania, the office has taken workplace comedy to a new level and provided a platform to show their talents. These people have become
"NBC has been famous for friends, will and grace, Seinfeld and other well-known plays. With the workplace comedies starred by Steve Carrell, John krazinski and Jenna Fischer, NBC has created a new era dominated by comedy, and provided a launching pad for Mindy Carlin, ed Helms and Ellie camper."
"On March 24, 2005, when office premiered in NBC's mid season, it became a hit on NBC and eventually revived the comedy lineup of" Thursday night. "



Number  261
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on ABC.”
“Grey’s Anatomy airs Thursdays at 8 p.m.”
“Former series regular Kim Raver also returned, while Italian actress Stefania Spampinato joined the series as DeLuca’s (Giacomo Gianniotti) sister.”
“Jerrika Hinton, Tessa Ferrer, and Marika Domińczyk all exited after the close of season 13, while Bridget Regan, who originally played Owen’s (Kevin McKidd) presumed-dead sister, was recast with Abigail Spencer.”
“Maggie finds herself at an awkward family dinner, Jackson receives big news, and Richard and Bailey search for the stars of tomorrow.”The introduction of new blood comes as Grey’s has gone through a bit of a casting shakeup.”
“Image zoom Credit: ABC (6)Here’s the logline for Thursday’s episode: “Amelia confronts a difficult situation, while Meredith deals with the fallout from her conversation with Nathan.”
“...known as Glasses who debuted in the premiere...”
“The six actors joining for multi episode arcs as the new interns include Rushi Kota Extant as Vik newcomer Jaicy Elliot as Taryn Alex Blue Davis NCIS as Casey Jeanine Mason Bunheads as Sam Sophia Taylor Ali Faking It as Dahlia and Jake Borelli as the sub intern Levi otherwise...”
“After the season 14 premiere introduced a group of sub-interns, the ABC medical drama will officially welcome a new crop of actual interns during Thursday’s episode, which features Webber (James Pickens Jr.) and Bailey (Chandra Wilson)on the hunt for prospects.”
“Grey's Anatomy: Meet the new internsGrey's Anatomy Close Streaming OptionsGrey’s Anatomy is adding to its ranks.”


"Et on ABC."
"Gray's anatomy is on at 8 p.m. Thursday."
Former serial regular Kim Laffer has also returned, while Italian actress Stefania spampinato joined the series as Giacomo gianniotti's sister
"At the end of season 13, Jessica Hinton, Tessa Ferrer and Marika domintsk all quit, while Bridget Reagan, who originally played Owen's presumed dead sister, plays Abigail Spencer again."
Maggie finds herself at an embarrassing family dinner. Jackson receives big news. Richard and Bailey are looking for tomorrow's stars. "The introduction of new blood is an adjustment in Gray's cast."
Picture zooming credit: ABC (6) this is the line from Thursday's episode: "Amelia faces a difficult situation, and Meredith deals with the consequences of her conversation with Nathan."
“… Glasses for the premiere... "
"As a new intern, six actors joined the arc of multiple episodes, including rushcota, as Vik rookie Jesse Elliott, Tallinn Alex blue Davis, NCIS, Kathy Jennie Mason, Sam Sophia Taylor Ali pretending it was Daria and Jack Borelli as associate intern Levi, otherwise..."
"After the introduction of a group of interns at the premiere of Season 14, ABC's medical drama will officially welcome a new group of interns on Thursday's program, with Weber (James Pickens, Jr.) and Bailey (Chandra Wilson, Jr.) looking for prospects."
"Grey's anatomy: meet the new intern Grey's anatomy approach flow option. Grey's anatomy is increasing its ranking."



Number  262
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click through the gallery below to see the cast of Robert’s hit film Meet the Fockers then and now!”
“We’re still hoping that changes one day, though.”
“Now it makes sense why Robert keeps so private and doesn’t have any personal social media accounts!”
“MUST SEE: ‘Taxi Driver’ Cast Reunites for The Film’s 40th Anniversary!”
“Turns out, he wasn’t really happy with the criticism from the rolls on the platform, as he fired back at every single one with an insulting response.”
“Earlier this year, he hilariously read mean tweets on an episode of Jimmy Kimmel Live.”
“This isn’t the first time Robert has dabbled with social media.”
“Though it’s unclear whether or not the Goodfellas star will make an account on his phone, we’d really love to get an inside look at the iconic star’s life offscreen!”
“MUST SEE: Check out the Cast of ‘Meet the Parents’ Then and Now!”
“He even wrote the word “flawless” across one of the photos of himself!”


"Click on the gallery below to see the actors in Robert's hit movie meet the foggs, then and now!"
"However, we still hope to change one day."
"Now there's a reason why Robert is so private and doesn't have any personal social media accounts!"
"Must see movie: taxi driver crew presents a gift for the 40th anniversary of the movie!"
"It turns out that he was not satisfied with the criticism of the rolling people on stage, because he responded insultingly to every rolling people."
"Earlier this year, he read a caustic tweet in a live episode of Jimmy Kimmel."
"It's not Robert's first foray into social media."
"It's not clear whether the Goodfellas star will make an account on his mobile phone, but we really want to know about the idol star's life off screen!"
"Be sure to see: look at the cast of meet your parents!"
He even wrote the word "flawless" on one of his photos



Number  263
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...hinted...”
“I think we have a general ballpark idea of when we want it to happen but I think because it s not going to be some lavish affair its maybe something that isn t going to require much planning or at least that s what I m telling myself she...”
“And celebrating her great success, Mandy Moore was seen at the NBC Upfronts in New York on Monday.”
“Flaunting her lean physique, the 34-year-old was all smiles as she graced the red carpet.”
“The beauty also talked about what it's like to play a mother when she has yet to have children.”
“Scroll down for videoAll smiles: Mandy Moore was beaming on Monday at NBCUniversal's Upfront Presentation in New York CityMandy's dress featured buckles that cinched in her trim waist.”
“She showcased her long and lean legs and completed her look with white pumps.”
“The star complimented her simple ensemble with a pair of diamond shaped earrings.”
“Beauty Mandy showcased her long and lean legs and completed her look with white pumps Taking notes Appearing on the red carpet with co star Milo Ventimiglia the beauty also talked about what it s like to play a mother when she has yet to have children Mandy s glam...”
“...was kept luminous and radiant for the morning event...”


“… Hint... "
"I think we probably know when we want it to happen, but I think because it won't be a luxury, it may not need too many plans, or at least that's what I told myself, she..."
To celebrate her great success, Mandy Moore appeared on NBC's front line in New York on Monday
"At the age of 34, she shows off her thin physique and has a bright smile on the red carpet."
"The beauty also talked about the feeling of playing a mother when she had no children."
"Scroll down to watch the video AllSmiles:Mandy Moore At nbcuniversal's first press conference in New York City on Monday, Mandy's skirt had buttons on her long waist
"She showed off her slender legs and finished her look with white high heels."
"The star praised her simple combination with a pair of diamond earrings."
"Beauty Mandy showed off her long, thin legs, finished her look with white heels and took notes on the red carpet with the co star Milo Ventimiglia. The beauty also talked about the feeling of playing a mother when she had no children, and the charm of Mandy... "
“… Stay bright and radiant in the morning activities... "



Number  264
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Curtin, Keough and Knickerbocker made guest appearances in the season.”
“[13] The tenth season which premiered on June 8, 2015, saw Rovsek as a friend of the housewives,[14][15] and Meghan King Edmonds joining the cast.”
“While Quinn Fry joined the cast in the sixth episode.”
“The third season premiered on November 6, 2007, which featured Tamra Judge (then Barney) as the latest housewife.”
“After the second season, De La Rosa exited the series as a regular cast member.”
“Bryant appeared as a guest.”
“Tammy Knickerbocker joined the cast for the second season which premiered on January 16, 2007.”
“Bryant left after the first season.”
“"[2]The first season premiered on March 21, 2006, and starred Kimberly Bryant, Jo De La Rosa, Vicki Gunvalson, Jeana Keough and Lauri Waring.”
“...professional athletes...”


"Curtin, Keao and nicobock are guest stars this season."
"[13] season 10 premiered on June 8, 2015, and rovesk is a friend of housewife, and [14] [15] Megan King Edmonds joined the cast."
"And Quinn fry joined the cast in episode six."
The third season premiered on November 6, 2007, and Tamra gage (then Barney) became the latest housewife
"At the end of the second season, Della Rosa dropped out of the series as a regular actor."
"Kobe appeared as a guest."
Tammy nikbok joined the cast in the second season, which premiered on January 16, 2007
"Kobe left after his first season."
"[2] the first season premiered on March 21, 2006, starring Kimberly Bryant, Joe delarosa, Vicky gonwason, Jenna Keao and Laurie walling."
“… Professional athletes... "



Number  265
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click to view the accused in the following fields:”
“The Me Too movement and its impact are ongoing, and the list below is only a snapshot of the allegations that became public during a particular moment in time.”
“Those who reported they were harassed, assaulted, or subjected to misconduct, however, have often said it affected them deeply, leaving some with lasting trauma and sometimes forcing them from their chosen careers.”
“Some say the reported behavior never happened, while others argue that their behavior was not intended to be sexual.”
“Many (though not all) of the people accused have denied the allegations.”
“...sexual misconduct that continues to this day in Hollywood Washington and around the country...”
“We decided to start our list with O Reilly because his departure from Fox helped set the stage for reports against Harvey Weinstein which in turn helped raise awareness around the Me Too movement and kick off the reckoning around...”
“The list was updated periodically until January 2019, and is no longer being updated regularly.”
“Vox compiled a list of influential people from a variety of industries who faced new public accusations of sexual misconduct after Fox News host Bill O’Reilly was forced to resign in April 2017.”
“At the movement’s height, more survivors came forward nearly every day, many of them inspired and emboldened by those who had gone before.”


Click to view defendants in the following fields:
"The me too campaign and its impact are still ongoing, and the list below is just a snapshot of the allegations that were made public at a particular time."
"However, those who report that they have been harassed, assaulted or misbehaved often say that this has had a great impact on them, leaving lasting wounds to some people and sometimes forcing them to give up their chosen career."
"Some people say that the reported behavior never happened, while others think that their behavior is not for sex."
"Many, though not all, of the defendants have denied the charges."
“… Sexual misconduct continues in Hollywood, Washington and across the country to this day... "
"We decided to start our list with O'Reilly because he left fox to help build up the coverage of Harvey Weinstein, which in turn helped raise awareness of the" me too "movement and launched the liquidation..."
"This list has been updated regularly until January 2019, and now it is no longer updated regularly."
"After Fox News Host Bill O'Reilly was forced to resign in April 2017, vox compiled a list of influential people from various industries who are facing new public misconduct charges."
"At the height of the movement, almost every day, more and more survivors come forward, many of them inspired by their predecessors."



Number  266
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartTaylor Swift Makes Impassioned Personal Video Message Urging Fans to VoteHow Celebs Are Encouraging You to Vote in the Midterm Elections 2018Chelsea Handler Poses Topless While She Encourages Her Followers to VoteRelated Gallery...”
“Later, Dr.”
“Evil is back and he’s running for public office!”
“On Monday night’s Tonight Show, host Jimmy Fallon began a segment stating that, on the eve of the midterm elections, one candidate is on hand to present their case for why they deserve Americans' votes.”
“That’s when he presented Mike Myers’ hilariously insidious character from the Austin Powers films.”
““Yes, Jimmy,” he replied when asked about his (not at all real) congressional candidacy.”
““Haven’t you been reading the news?”
“It’s 2018.”
“Evil’s in right now.”
“It’s hip.”


"Embed the code to restart Taylor Swift's passionate personal video messages, urge fans to tell how celebrities encourage you to vote in the 2018 mid-term elections, and encourage her followers to sit in the gallery..."
"Later, doctor."
"The devil is back. He's running for office!"
"On Monday night's tonight show, host Jimmy Fallon started a paragraph saying that on the eve of the mid-term election, a candidate was present to explain why they were worth the American vote."
"At that time, he showed the comical and insidious role of Mike Myers in the Austin Powers movie."
"Yes, Jimmy," he replied when asked about his (not really) congressional candidate
"Didn't you watch the news?"
"It's 2018."
"Evil is at hand."
"It's fashionable."



Number  267
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  268
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Can’t I just love people?””
“Kailyn Lowry Credit Dominique Potter Instagram In June 2016 Lowry posted a cryptic tweet writing Do I have to be gay or straight...”
“On Wednesday Potter shared a photo of herself and Lowry sitting side by side in the car as well as a photo of the pair holding hands with the caption It s all good over on this side Image zoom Kailyn Lowry and Dominique Potter Image zoom Dominique Potter and...”
“WATCH: Teen Mom 2’s Kailyn Lowry Shares Sweet First Family Photos Since Giving Birth to Baby LoWhile Lowry did not reveal who she is dating, it’s rumored her new girlfriend is Dominique Potter, who has frequently shared photos of the two together on Instagram.”
““Well, so far so good,” Lowry said, laughing.”
“It more or less just happened.”“They say those are the best relationships,” Chrisley said.”
““So, it’s not like she was trying to wine and dine me to ask me to be her girlfriend, you know what I mean?”
““We were friends for a year and so it kind of just turned into [a romantic relationship],” Lowry said.”
“Despite being a busy working mother, Lowry said her relationship with her new girlfriend began as a friendship.”
“She has two other children: Isaac Elliot, 7, with ex-boyfriend Jo Rivera, and Lincoln Marshall, 4, with ex-husband Javi Marroquin.”


"Can't I love people?"
"Kailyn Lowry credit Dominique Potter instagram posted a mysterious tweet in June 2016, saying," must I be gay or straight... "
"On Wednesday, Porter shared a picture of her and Lori sitting side by side in the car, as well as a picture of two people holding hands. The title on it was:" everything's OK here. Picture zooming in / out of Caroline Lori and Dominic porter. Picture zooming in / out of Dominic Porter and... "
"Watch: Young mom 2's Karin lorry shares the sweet first family photo after giving birth to her baby. Lori did not disclose her date. It is said that her new girlfriend is Dominic Porter, and she often shares their group photos on instagram. "
"Well, so far so good," lorry said with a smile
"It's more or less just happened." "They say it's the best relationship," says crisley
"So, she doesn't want to invite me to be her girlfriend, but to invite me to eat and drink. Do you know what I mean?"
"We were friends for a year, so it became [a romantic relationship]," Lori said
Laurie said that although she was a busy mother, her relationship with her new girlfriend started with friendship
"She also has two children: 7-year-old Isaac Elliott and ex boyfriend Joe Rivera, 4-year-old Lincoln Marshall and ex husband Javier Malkin."



Number  269
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In her photo she, Jim, and Aspen have signs that read, “Our family is growing by four feet and two heartbeats” and “Edmonds twin boys June 2018.””
“Meghan fans immediately started commenting on her post, praising its brilliance.”
“See her, dare we say equally as gorgeous, copy-cat pic!”
“If imitation is the highest form of flattery, Beyonce, 36, should be VERY proud!”
“After all, Real Housewives of Orange County star, Meghan King Edmonds, 33, completely copied the singer’s internet-breaking pregnancy announcement pic from 2017…and she kind of nailed it!”
“While we’ve seen a few spoofs since Bey’s original hit Instagram last year, Meghan’s is definitely our favorite — her attention to detail is impeccable!”
“The best part?”
“Meghan is ALSO expecting twins in June — just like Beyonce was!”
““If I can’t be Queen Bey I’ll settle for King Edmonds,” Meghan captioned her series of hilarious imitation photos.”
“She followed that up with the captions twinscomingsoon imitationisflattery thisIsNotMyMaternityShoot The reality star posted the impressive pics via Instagram on March 9 and in them she s wearing a mis matched bra and panty set that s nearly identical to...”


"In her photos, she, Jim and Aspen all have slogans that say 'our family is growing at a 4-foot-2 heartbeat' and 'Edmonds twin boys June 2018.'"
"Megan's fans immediately started commenting on her post and praising her brilliance."
"When we see her, we dare to say that she is equally beautiful. Copy the cat picture!"
"If imitation is the highest form of flattery, Beyonce, 36, should be very proud!"
"After all, 33 year old Meghan King Edmonds is the real housewife in" Orange County Star "and she completely copies the singer's pregnancy announcement photos posted on the Internet in 2017 She's sort of done it! "
"Although we've seen some pranks since bey made a splash on instagram last year, Megan's pranks are definitely our favorite - her attention to detail is impeccable!"
"The best part?"
Megan was pregnant with twins in June, just like Beyonce
"If I can't be queen Bay, I'll accept King Edmond," Megan wrote under the title of her series of funny imitations
"She went on to flatter with the title twinscomingsong imitator. This is not my mother's photo. The reality TV star posted impressive photos through instagram on March 9, in which she was wearing a mismatched bra and underpants, almost the same as..."



Number  270
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The story notes that Bullock doesn’t do it for attention, which is why she’s usually quiet about it, and in a statement Bullock says “we have to take care of one another” and that she’s “just grateful” she can do it.”
“News, Bullock has donated more than $5 million to charities and people in need over the years, including $1 million to 9/11 relief efforts, $1 million to help victims of the tsunami in Indonesia in 2004, and another $1 million to the Red Cross after Hurricane Katrina.”
“As noted by E!”
“As it turns out, though, this is far from the first time that Bullock has used her superstar status to help people in need.”
““There are no politics in eight feet of water,” she says, “there are human beings in eight feet of water.” (Bullock presumably missed Donald Trump’s hurricane response, because he seems pretty confident that there’s a ton of politics in eight feet of water.)”
“That’s according to People, which says that Bullock released a brief statement saying that she hopes we can rise above the current political climate and join together to help those in need.”
“(Photo: Getty Images/Film Magic, Jon Kopaloff)A lot of people and organizations have been chipping in to help the Hurricane Harvey relief efforts in Texas, and one particularly charitable famous person is Sandra Bullock, who recently donated $1 million to the American Red Cross.”


"The story points out that Bullock doesn't do it for attention, which is why she is usually silent about it." we have to take care of each other, "Bullock said in a statement, and she" just appreciates "that she can do it
"It is reported that Bullock has donated more than 5 million US dollars to charities and people in need over the years, including 1 million US dollars for 9 / 11 rescue work, 1 million US dollars for helping Indonesian tsunami victims in 2004, and 1 million US dollars for the Red Cross after Hurricane Katrina."
"Just like e!"
"However, it turns out that this is far from the first time that Bullock has used his superstar status to help people in need."
"There's no politics in eight feet of water," she said. "There's people in eight feet of water." (Bullock probably missed Donald Trump's Hurricane response because he seemed confident that there was a lot of politics in eight feet of water.)
"According to people magazine, Bullock issued a brief statement, hoping that we can get rid of the current political climate and help those in need together."
"(photo source: Getty Images / film magic, Jon kopaloff) many people and organizations are helping with hurricane Harvey in Texas. One of the special charity celebrities is Sandra Bullock, who recently donated $1 million to the American Red Cross."



Number  271
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Photo Credit: Bravo]”
“RELATED: Ariana Madix Discusses “Ripple Effect” Jax Taylor’s Cheating Had On Her Relationship With Tom SandovalTELL US- WAS THE HOUSEWARMING PARTY THE RIGHT TIME TO TELL BRITTANY ABOUT THE RECORDING?”
“Brittany finding out while she’s wasted in a room with the entire cast made for great TV, but it had to be a rough night for her.”
“Even one-on-one conversations make it into the episodes.”
“In the grand scheme of things, there is no “private” way to share this with Brittany since they are filming a reality TV show.”
“Lala Kent had a valid point when she told Ariana, “Do you want to ruin her night or do you want to ruin her life?” On the other hand, why couldn’t they just meet up for a hangover brunch the next day and talk to her then?”
“...saying behind her back...”
“In an interview with Daily Pop If anything I was more on Brittany s side it s just that Brittany was so drunk that the last thing I wanted her to do is hear something that traumatic in that state of mind Obviously Brittany deserved to know what Jax was...”
“It was more about the timing and state of drunkenness.”
“Tom made it clear that he wasn’t just siding with his boy Jax when he got into it with Ariana and that viewers thinking he wasn’t on Brittany’s side is the “biggest misconception.”His issue wasn’t that Ariana showed Brittany the recording.”


"[photo source: Bravo]"
Related report: Ariana medix discusses the impact of "chain reaction" Jakes Taylor's deception on her relationship with Tom sandowart - is it time for the housewarming party to tell Brittany to record? "
"Brittany found herself idling away in a room and the whole crew was making a great TV show, but it was a tough night for her."
"Even one-on-one conversations get into the show."
"In big plan things, there's no 'private' way to share this with Brittany because they're filming a reality show."
Lala Kent said to Ariana, "do you want to ruin her night or her life?"? "On the other hand, why can't they have a hangover brunch the next day and talk to her?"
“… Say behind her back... "
"In the interview with daily fashion, if there is anything I support Brittany more, it is that Brittany is too drunk. The last thing I want her to do is to hear some painful words in that mental state. Obviously Brittany should know what Jax is..."
"It's more about the time and state of being drunk."
"Tom made it clear that when he worked with Ariana, he wasn't just on the side of his son Jacques. The audience thought it was" the biggest misunderstanding "that he wasn't on the side of Brittany. His problem is not that Ariana shows Brittany the recording. "



Number  272
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AA Batteries aren’t included and we suggest you get rechargeable batteries for use in your flameless candles.”
“We even found a set of flameless candles on Amazon that change color from blue to red to yellow to green.”
“Lucky me!”
“I didn’t want to spend $100 to $150 on a basket at a Pottery Barn store but I still wanted the look.”
“I love baskets and wanted something for the sideboard in the hallway.”
“This lantern can be used both indoors and outside as well.”
“The lantern on the left actually has a flameless candle with drip effect that can be set on a timer.”
“I also found these metal European-style lanterns that are half the price of the Pottery Barn lanterns on Amazon.com and you get a set of two!.”
“If you are going for quality then yes, buy the Pottery Barn lanterns but if you don’t mind a substitute these or others you find that give you the desired effect.”
“Photo Credit: Pottery BarnMy Walmart faux lantern alternative is plastic but they give the same basic look at the Pottery Barn lanterns.”


"AA batteries are not included. We recommend that you use rechargeable batteries in flameless candles."
"We even found a set of flameless candles on Amazon, changing color from blue to red, from yellow to green."
"I'm so lucky!"
"I don't want to spend $100 to $150 on a basket at a Pottery Barn store, but I still want it that way."
"I like baskets and want to put something in the sideboard in the corridor."
"This lantern can be used indoors and outdoors."
"The lantern on the left actually has a Flameless Candle, which has the effect of dripping water. It can be set on the timer."
"I also found these metal European lanterns. The price is only half that of the Pottery Barn lanterns on board. You get a set of two on Amazon."
"If you want to improve the quality, buy Pottery Barn lights, but if you don't mind these or other alternatives, you'll find that they can achieve the effect you want."
"Photo source: the alternative to potty barnmy Walmart is plastic, but they give potty barns the same basic look."



Number  273
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In-app purchases weren’t mentioned in the preview but seem like a good bet, given Swift’s talent for monetizing her every move: That may be the real secret of the Swift life, which means the Swift Life will be right on brand.”
“The video also teases “Taymojis,” another feature strangely reminiscent of a certain reality TV star’s “Kimojis.” The two may be enemies engaged in a battle over “receipts,” but apparently that hasn’t stopped Swift from taking ample inspiration from Kardashian’s business playbook.”
““Get exclusive pics and video!” In addition to access to Taylor, the app will provide opportunities for Swift fans to connect and network with each other, building on Swift’s already-strong presence on platforms like Twitter, Tumblr, and Instagram.”
““Connect with Taylor!” the video promises.”
“It seems to borrow from the other Kim Kardashian app, the one that isn’t from Glu, the Kim Kardashian West Official App, which offers “premium” content to paid subscribers.”
“According to a first-look video the company released, Swift’s app will be less game and more access.”
“The Swift Life comes from Glu Mobile, the same company responsible for games like Kim Kardashian: Hollywood and Nicki Minaj: The Empire.”
“The app store, which will see the debut of her proprietary app later this year, just in time to coincide with the publicity cycle for the artist’s new album, Reputation, slated for November.”
“The star’s next conquest?”
“Whether she’s sailing by on a UPS truck or loudly proclaiming herself unable to come to the phone because she’s dead, Taylor Swift is increasingly inescapable.”


"There is no mention of in app buying in the preview, but considering Swift's talent of making money every move, it seems to be a good choice: this may be the real secret of Swift's life, which means that Swift's life will be the right brand."
The video also teases another feature "taymojis", which is strangely reminiscent of a reality TV star "kimojis". The two may be enemies fighting over "receipts," but apparently that doesn't stop swift from getting enough inspiration from Kardashian's business play
"Get exclusive pictures and videos! "In addition to visiting Taylor, the app will also provide swift fans with opportunities to connect with each other and the Internet, building on Swift's already strong influence on platforms such as twitter, Tumblr and instagram."
"Contact Taylor! "Video promise."
"It seems to have borrowed from another Kim Kardashian app, rather than Kim Kardashian West's official app, Glu, which provides" premium "content to paying users."
"According to the first video released by the company, Swift's app will reduce games and increase access rights."
"Fast life comes from Glu mobile, a company in charge of games, such as Kim K ardashian:Hollywood And Nicki Minaj:The Empire 。”
"The app store will launch her own app later this year, just in time for the publicity cycle of the artist's new album reputation, which is due to be released in November."
"The next conquest of stars?"
"Whether she's driving by in an UPS truck or announcing that she's dead and can't answer the phone, Tyler swift is becoming increasingly inescapable."



Number  274
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And then we danced the night away under the stars with the best firework display I have ever seen timed to perfection with the music of their first dance.”Image zoom...”
““When she and her new husband rolled up to the dock in that one of a kind boat, we all cheered.”
“Subscribe now for exclusive photos inside the gorgeous celebration — only in PEOPLE!”
“DWTS star Derek Hough thought he knew what to expect when it came to his sister Julianne‘s wedding to NHL star Brooks Laich.”
““I was with Julianne on tour while she was planning everything, and it truly exceeded my expectations,” Derek tells PEOPLE exclusively for this week’s cover story.”
““It was beyond anything I could have imagined.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: © Julianne and Brooks Laich.”
“All rights reserved.”
“Photographed by Sarah FalugoThe intimate, outdoor wedding on July 8 on Lake Coeur d’Alene, Idaho, where the Houghs spent summer holidays growing up, was “a timeless, magical, romantic experience that was truly perfect in every way,” Derek says.”
“There is so much sentimental history on that lake that having an experience which celebrates love created an electric and palpable energy that was felt every minute of every day we were there For all the intimate details inside Hough and Laich s gorgeous Idaho nuptials including exclusive wedding photos...”


"Then we danced all night under the stars, and with the music of their first dance, our fireworks show reached the best state I have ever seen."
"We all cheered when she and her new husband arrived at the dock in that unique boat."
"Now subscribe to exclusive photos of gorgeous Celebrations - people only!"
"DWTS star Derek Hough thinks he knows what will happen when his sister Julianne marries NHL star Brooks LAICH."
"I'm touring with Julian and she's planning everything, which is really beyond my expectations," Derek told people in this week's cover story interview
"It's beyond my imagination." Get push notification of news, functions, etc
"Image scaling credit:? Julianne and Brooks LAICH."
"All rights reserved."
"A close outdoor wedding on July 8 in Lake Cowell Darren, Idaho, was filmed by Sarah farugos, where the hogs spent their summer growing up, and it was" an eternal, magical, romantic experience, perfect in every way, "Derek said
"There's a lot of sentimental history on the lake. There was an experience celebrating love, which created a kind of electric and touchable energy. We can feel it every minute of every day there, including all the intimate details in the gorgeous Idaho wedding of Hoff and rich..."



Number  275
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s a little fun, a little sexy, and a lot hard,” Jenna says.”
““She is a beast.” JJ even named one of her moves the Jenna Squat; it involves some hip-hop-inspired movement.”
“DENNIS LEUPOLDThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“But even if that chemistry was not entirely eclipsed, it at least dimmed enough for the couple to call it quits.”
“That chemistry sparked offscreen as well—the two married in 2009 and, four years later, had their daughter, Everly.”
“You’re also familiar with the crackling chemistry she had with her costar, Channing Tatum.”
“If you’ve seen 2006’s Step Up, you’re familiar with the precise-yet-fluid, insane-strength-requiring moves she’s known for.”
“Dance didn’t only affect Jenna’s sense of modesty; it also shaped her entire future.”
“At 19, Jenna was tapped to join Janet Jackson’s All for You tour—even now, the routines live on in her muscle memory: “I could do ‘Rhythm Nation’ and ‘If’ in my sleep,” she says.”
“She was in kindergarten when her mom enrolled her in dance classes after she noticed Jenna mimicking the moves in Jane Fonda’s Workout.”


"It's a little funny, a little sexy, and it's hard," Jenna said
"She's a beast." JJ even named one of her movements Jenna squat; it contains some hip-hop style movements
"Dennis leupold this content is imported from {embed name}."
"But even if the chemical reaction doesn't completely disappear, it's at least dim enough for the couple to break up."
"This chemical reaction has also attracted off screen attention. The two married in 2009, and four years later, they have a daughter, Avery."
"You're also familiar with her intense relationship with partner Channing Tatum."
"If you've seen the progress in 2006, you'll know that she's known for her precise, fluid, crazy power moves."
"The dance not only influenced Jenna's sense of modesty, but also shaped her whole future."
At the age of 19, Jenna was invited to Janet Jackson's "all for you" tour. Even now, her muscular memory still retains the Convention: "I can perform" rhythm nation "and" if "in my sleep," she says
"When she was in kindergarten, her mother found Jenna imitating Jane Fonda's movements, so she signed up for a dance class."



Number  276
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So I sent my hair and makeup team home,” she said in the video, showing off her half made-up face.”
““You’re Sandra Dee and I’m like Rizzo,” she told her friend.”
“The pair were seated together at the 2018 Academy Awards, held at Los Angeles’ Dolby Theater, both sipping white wine and laughing together through the show.”
“In the opening monologue, host Jimmy Kimmel made a joke about the 2017 Oscars Best Picture flub when Stone’s film La La Land was announced as the winner when it was actually Moonlight that had won.”
““This year, when you hear your name called, don’t get up right away … give us a minute,” Kimmel said.”
“Following the joke, the camera panned to Lawrence pointing at Stone, playfully making fun of her.”
“Us Weekly spotted Stone, 29, and Lawrence, 27, throughout the night having a great time together!”
“In the lobby, the actresses were drinking sauvignon blanc and chardonnay and mingling with Judd Apatow.”
“Lawrence was also overheard making a Grease reference to the Easy A actress.”
“The pair have been pals for years.”


"So I sent my hair and makeup team home," she said in the video, showing her half covered face
"You're Sandra Di and I'm like Rizzo," she told her friend
"At the 2018 Academy Awards ceremony at the Dolby theatre in Los Angeles, the two sat together, sipping white wine and laughing together during the performance."
"In his opening remarks, the host, Jimmy Kimmel, made a joke that when he lost the best picture Oscar in 2017, stone's film laladi was declared the champion, but in fact moonlight won the championship."
"This year, when you hear your name called, don't get up right away Give us a minute, "Kimmel said
"After hearing the joke, the camera turns to Lawrence, points to stone and makes fun of her."
"American weekly found that stone, 29, and Lawrence, 27, had a good time together all night!"
In the lobby, everlasting longing for each other, and Jude Apato and her parents were mixed up.
"Others overheard Lawrence mention someone who is easy to be an actor."
"They have been good friends for many years."



Number  277
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Audiences will be able to find out just how much when the new season of Westworld premieres on HBO on April 22nd.”
“According to Entertainment Weekly, the trailer — HBO’s first Super Bowl commercial in 20 years — was directed by Jonathan Nolan, with some of the footage shot exclusively for the spot.”
“However, not all of the footage in today’s spot may end up in the series itself.”
“It’s not clear whether the new season will adopt that same non-linear storytelling approach, but given the way the first season wrapped up, series creators Jonathan Nolan and Lisa Joy will have plenty of new areas to explore, regardless.”
“Our world.”The first season of Westworld played out like a complex, ever-evolving puzzle, using multiple timelines and narrative misdirection to evoke the same kind of experience that Westworld’s hosts themselves dealt with.”
““From the ashes, build a new world.”
““We can burn it to the ground,” Dolores continues.”
“It soon becomes that the hosts are not happy with the things they discovered in the first season of the show.”
“...guns take out a herd of synthetic creatures before being trampled themselves...”
“The spot begins almost like a commercial with the Westworld resort itself with Dolores commenting in voice over that We built this world together this world where dreams come true But things soon turn dark as the spot looks inside the inner workings of the Delos offices as men with...”


"When the new season of the Western Hemisphere premieres at HBO on April 22, the audience will know how many there are."
According to entertainment weekly, the trailer is HBO's first Super Bowl Commercial in 20 years, directed by Jonathan Nolan, and some of the footage is specifically for live shooting
"However, not all scenes from today's scene will eventually appear in this series."
"It's not clear whether the new season will adopt the same non-linear storytelling style, but considering the way the first season ends, serial creators Jonathan Nolan and Lisa joy will have a lot of new areas to explore anyway."
The first season of our world is like a complex and evolving puzzle, which uses multiple time lines and narrative misleading to evoke the same experience that the Western Hemisphere hosts themselves have dealt with
"From the ashes, build a new world."
"We can burn it to ashes," Dolores continued
"You'll soon find that the hosts are not satisfied with what they found in the first season."
“… Shoot a group of synthetic creatures, and they're trampled on themselves. "
"At the beginning, the attraction was almost like an advertisement. Dolores of the Western World Resort commented in the voice over that we built the world together, the world of dreams come true. But when the attraction saw the internal operation of the Delos office, things soon darkened, just like men and women



Number  278
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more from Yahoo Entertainment:”
“Follow along, will ya?”
“(Image: John Mayer via YouTube)Not all of John Mayer’s videos can feature the Prancercize lady, so he has to get creative in other ways.”
““New Light” is certainly original, with a healthy dose of funny, which are two things that characterize Mayer himself.”
“The singer and guitarist 40 touted the over the top cheesy new release by saying he needed to make a video but nobody could agree on a budget so I went to a place downtown and made this with a company that usually does birthday and bar mitzvah videos The...”
“...low budget production is shot with a green screen stock footage courtesy of the faux Celebrity Status Music Video Service company and let s just say he didn t spend a lot on the wardrobe...”
“The whole thing is just begging for GIFs, as he travels the world (New York!”
“Paris!”
“Malibu!”
“Africa!”


"Read more about Yahoo Entertainment:
"Come with me, will you?"
"(photo: John Mayer on YouTube) not all of John Mayer's videos feature MS praccerize, so he has to be creative in other ways."
"New light is definitely original and has a healthy dose of humor, which are two characteristics of Mayer himself."
"The 40 year old singer and guitarist boasted that the new film was too tacky. He said he needed to make a video, but no one could agree on the budget, so I went to a place downtown and made it with a company that usually makes birthday and bar mitzvah videos..."
“… The low budget production was shot with a green screen stock lens, which was provided by a fake celebrity music and video service company. We can say that he didn't spend a lot of money on the wardrobe... "
"When he travels around the world (New York), the whole thing is begging for gifts!"
"Paris
"Malibu!"
"Africa!"



Number  279
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The superstar had her hair bleached for a few months in the spring of 2016, and both stars attended the Met Gala that May.”
“In the photos, Swift — with her hair swept into a loose up-do — is all dressed up in an emerald-green off-the-shoulder dress, black belt and matching sandals.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The private couple stepped out holding hands during a break in Swift's smash tourAll Dolled Up!”
“Taylor Swift and Joe Alwyn Hold Hands on Rare Public Date Night in LondonTaylor Swift is spending quality time with boyfriend Joe Alwyn during a well-deserved break in between tour stops.”
“The Grammy winner, 28, and her British actor boyfriend, 27, were photographed on a rare public outing Wednesday night in London.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“According to photos obtained by the Daily Mail, the couple enjoyed a date night at Covent Garden’s Hawksmoor steak restaurant.”
“The singer also accessorized her outfit with delicate earrings and her “J” necklace.”
““Flashback to when you met me / Your buzz cut / And my hair bleached,” sings Swift on “Dress,” possibly referencing the haircut Alwyn sported while filming Billy Lynn’s Halftime Walk.”


"The superstar bleached his hair for a few months in the spring of 2016, and both stars attended the metropolitan party in May."
"In the photo, Swift - with loose curly hair - is dressed in an emerald green off shoulder dress, a black belt and matching sandals."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"In Swift's spiking match, the private couple came out hand in hand!"
"Taylor swift and Joe Alvin had a wonderful time together on the rare public date night in London. Taylor swift and her boyfriend Joe Alvin had a good time, which is worthy of appearing between tourist stations."
The 28 year old Grammy winner and her 27 year old British actor boyfriend were photographed on a rare public outing in London on Wednesday night
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to photos obtained by the daily mail, the couple spent a date night at hoxmore steakhouse in Covent Garden."
The singer also adorned her costume with delicate earrings and "J" necklaces
"Think back when you met me / your hair / my hair turned white," swift sings in the skirt, probably referring to Alvin's haircut during the break from filming Billy Lynn



Number  280
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Earlier this year, Khaled also caught flack for a subpar performance at the Coachella Music and Arts Festival, where his sound was similarly cut off when he went over his scheduled time by several minutes.”
““I still stood on stage wit no sound, and when they got the sound to work they want cut my set short … I still rep for my people,” he continued.”
“The rapper/producer, who was scheduled for an hour-long set, performed for less than 20 minutes before fans booed him off the stage, chanting for Yellow Claw, the next DJ, to take over.”
““Due to technical difficulties beyond DJ Khaled and Insomniac’s control, Khaled was not able to perform at his scheduled time on Sunday night at EDC,” Insomniac CEO Pasquale Rotella said to Rolling Stone.”
““He arrived on time and ready to rock the crowd, but equipment issues delayed the performance.”
“Even though there were technical difficulties, he still got onstage and showed his fans love.”On Instagram, Khaled reiterated that his EDC set was compromised by technical issues.”
““They cut my time short and they had me backstage for a hour and half and the sound kept breaking,” he captioned a video clip.”
“Then I heard my fans and I said I m go out even if the sound cuts off and even if they cut my time short I m here for my fans even if the sound man and promoter don t have there stuff together I forgive them thoe love...”
“...is the key...”
“]”“They tried to sabotage my sound,” Khaled said in another post.”


"Earlier this year, Khalid was also caught by flack for a sub standard performance at the cochella Music Festival, where his voice was cut off when he exceeded the scheduled time by a few minutes."
"I'm still standing on stage with no sound, when they get the sound to work, they want to shorten my settings I still represent my people, "he continued
"The rapper / producer was scheduled to perform in an hour's studio. Within 20 minutes of the performance, fans booed him off the stage, shouting for the next DJ, Huang Zhuo, to take over."
"Due to the uncontrollable technical difficulties of DJ Khalid and insomniacs, Khalid was unable to perform at EDC at the scheduled time on Sunday night," insomniacs CEO Pasqual lotra told rolling stone
"He arrived on time to shock the audience, but equipment problems delayed the performance."
"Despite the technical difficulties, he still stood on the stage and showed his love to the fans." On instagram, Khalid reiterated that his EDC setup was affected by technical issues
"They shortened my time and kept me backstage for an hour and a half, and the sound kept ringing," he wrote in a video clip
"Then I heard my fans say, I want to go out, even if the voice is cut off, even if they shorten my time, I am here for my fans, even if the voice people and promoters are not together, I forgive their love..."
“… It's the key... "
"They're trying to destroy my voice," Khalid said in another blog post



Number  281
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drop ’em in a comment below.”
“Your thoughts on those results?”
“In the end, it was Team Big Brother that finished first, making Cody Nickson and Jessica Graf the winners of The Amazing Race Season 30.”
“Host Phil Keoghan wasn’t kidding when he warned that this would be the most challenging physical and mental challenge yet.”
“Following a cookie-making challenge — which was not as fun as it sounds — the teams had to run all over a military ship, collecting pieces to build a damn airplane that would land on the Official Amazing Race Winners’ Mat™.”
“And things only became more difficult when the final three teams traveled to San Francisco, where their kayaking and bridge-climbing skills were put to the test — not to mention their patience, as several players lost their cool and snapped at their well-meaning teammates.”
“(And if you think that was a bad race-car driving pun, you should check out The Bachelor sometime.)”
“Clues based on previous challenges led the teams to their final destination, with Team Yale arriving first, followed by Teams Big Brother and Extreme — which meant, sadly, Alex and Conor had to pump the brakes on their Amazing Race journey.”
“(Don’t get me wrong, I realize that other players had fun with this challenge, but Cody — with those wide eyes and that megawatt smile — just seemed to enjoy it a little too much.)”
“Then came Cody’s absolute favorite part of the finale: getting to smash a bunch of computers and hard drives to pieces with a baseball bat.”


"Put them in the comments below."
"What do you think of these results?"
"In the end, it was the big brother team that won the first place, making Cody Nixon and Jessica Graf the winners of their 30th wonderful season."
"Phil Keoghan, the host, warned that this would be the most challenging physical and mental challenge to date. He was not joking."
"After a biscuit making challenge - which doesn't sound so interesting - the teams had to run around on a warship, collect debris to make a damned plane and land on the official Magic Contest Winner mat ™ .”
"When the last three teams went to San Francisco, things became more difficult. Their kayaking and Bridge climbing skills were tested in San Francisco - not to mention their patience, because a few players lost their cool and were furious with their good teammates."
(if you think that's a bad pun for car driving, you should see a bachelor sometime.)
"According to the clues of the previous challenge, the team finally reached the destination, Yale team arrived first, followed by big brother team and extreme team - which means that, unfortunately, Alex and Kona had to step on the brake during their amazing journey."
"(don't get me wrong, I realize other players are interested in the challenge, but Cody - with wide eyes and a smile - seems to like it a little too much.)
"And then Cody's favorite ending: smashing a bunch of computers and hard drives with a baseball bat."



Number  282
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Laurie Metcalf, who was nominated for Best Supporting Actress for Lady Bird, said, 'As I was told, I got really emotional, you know, because everybody just poured their whole heart and soul into doing this film and I'm so happy for Greta and Saoirse and the whole movie.'”
“My son Alfie called from the UK so I didn’t see the nominations but I learned about them in the best possible way.'”
“'This nomination is for every single one of us who brought our hearts to this film,' she saidHappy lady: Octavia Spencer of The Shape Of Water also talked.”
“Her take: Sally Hawkins, who is nominated for Best Actress in a Leading Role for her work in the The Shape Of Water spoke out too.”
“Which was very sweet of her.'”
“The star also said Tonya contacted her after the Oscar news spread: 'I got a lovely text from her this morning congratulating me saying, "You’re going to the big top, girl!"”
“It’s truly a really special morning for me.'”
“She added, 'I’m just so happy and so thankful to him and for this honor.”
“'It feels too good to be true, especially because my friend Steven [Rogers] wrote this role for me because, and he always said, :I wrote this role for you so you’d win an Oscar."'”
“I’m so grateful.”


"I've been told I'm really excited, you know, because everyone put all their heart into making this film, and I'm happy for Greta and Sawyer and the whole film," said Laurie Metcalfe, who was nominated for Best Supporting Actress in Lady Bird
"My son Alfie called from England, so I didn't see the nominations, but I got to know them in the best way."
"This nomination is for each and every one of us who has given his heart to the film," she said. "Octavia Spencer in the shape of water talked about that as well."
Her point is that Sally Hawkins was nominated for Best Actress for her role in the shape of water, and she said so
"She's so nice."
The star also said that Tonya contacted her after the news of the Oscars spread: "I received a lovely text message from her this morning, congratulating me on saying: 'girl, you're going to the top!"
"It's a special morning for me."
"She added," I'm very happy and very grateful for him and the honor. "
"It feels so good, it can't be true, especially because my friend Steven (Rogers) wrote the role for me, because he always said: I write the role for you, so you can win the Oscar."
"I'm so grateful."



Number  283
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And of course, they make for a great selfie.”
“They're infused with retinol, collagen, aloe, and hyaluronic acid to thicken the under-eye area and disguise discoloration.”
“"When your skin is warm, like when you step outside of a hot shower, you’re able to absorb the maximum amount of serum."”
“"Similar to a space blanket that you see at the end of a marathon, the gold foil works with the warmth of your body to retain heat," she says.”
“She's also a fan of the gold foil eye masks from her own brand, Wander Beauty, especially for their innovative technology.”
“Klorane’s Smoothing & Relaxing Patches ($24), which tighten and brighten the under-eye area in just a few minutes.”
“The one thing she never travels without?”
“Lindsay EllingsonMike Pont/GettyOur contributor Lindsay Ellingson broke down her entire in-flight beauty routine for us, and it was glorious.”
“From frozen spoons to miracle eye creams, see the under-eye cures Selena, Kate, and more swear by below!”
“Because if Selena Gomez says an eye cream really works, and we’re staring at her bright-eyed visage on the red carpet, who are we to deny our faces the same opportunity?”


"Of course, they'll do well in self portraits as well."
They are infused with retinol, collagen, aloe and hyaluronic acid to thicken the underside of the eyes and mask discoloration
"When your skin is warm, like you're out of a hot bath, you can absorb the most serum."
"Similar to the space blanket seen at the end of a marathon, gold foil can keep heat with the warmth of the body," she said
"She's also a fan of her own brand wand beauty gold foil blindfold, especially their innovative technology."
Klorane's smoothing and relaxing patch (US $24) can tighten and brighten the fundus in a few minutes
"Is there one thing she needs to travel?"
"Lindsay Ellingson Mike pont / gettyour writer Lindsay Ellingson broke her whole beauty program for us. It's amazing."
"From frozen spoons to magic eye cream, see eye cures, Serena, Kate, and more!"
"Because if Selena Gomez says eye cream really works, and we stare at her bright eyes on the red carpet, who can deny the same opportunity to our faces?"



Number  284
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Jenner’s big sis was last spotted living her best life in Mexico, with her 24-year-old beau Younes Bendjima at her bikini-clad side.”
“After all, Kourtney has moved on herself.”
“Though Jenner seems to have taken a swipe at Disick, chances are the comment is in good fun.”
“The day after Jenner chimed in on the pic of their outing, the two were photographed dining at Tosconova restaurant in Calabasas.”
“Disick and Richie didn't appear to let the shady comment bother them, however.”
““Aww, Scott and his kids,” Jenner wrote, with a widely grinning emoji that underscored her absolute euphoria for the pair.”
“Getting savage with her iPhone and five words, the model left a comment on the photo of the modern family outing.”
“It would appear that Kendall Jenner agrees — with plenty of apparent sarcasm to go around.”
“How cute, right?”
“In the backseat, a kiddo that appeared to be Penelope Scotland Disick, 5, buckled up.”


Jenna's older sister was last found to be living her best life in Mexico, with 24-year-old boyfriend yones bengima standing next to her bikini
"After all, Courtney has turned over."
"Even though Jenner seems to have attacked Disick, it's probably interesting."
"The day after Jenna broke in to take pictures of their trip, they were photographed dining at toskonova restaurant in Calabasas."
"However, it seems that Disick and rich did not let these gloomy comments disturb them."
"Oh, Scott and his children," Jenner wrote, with a smile on her face highlighting her absolute joy for the couple
"With the iPhone and five words, it became barbaric, and the model left a comment on the photos of modern family travel."
"Kendall Jenner seems to agree - there's a lot of obvious irony."
"How lovely, isn't it?"
"In the back seat, a child who looks like Penelope Scotland Disick, five years old, buttoned up."



Number  285
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While he wasn't invited to perform this year, he just might make the show lineup for 2019.”
“Kimberly SchlapmanGetty ImagesThe Little Big Town singer rocked this jumpsuit with a sweetheart neckline in the most perfect teal hue!”
“The Country Music Television awards show took place on Wednesday night in Nashville, Tennessee, and the biggest stars were all there and dressed to impress.”
“TODAY's own Hoda Kotb headed down to enjoy the show — and even made an appearance on stage, thanks to her dear friend Blake Shelton.”
“Here are some of the best red carpet looks:Hoda KotbAPTODAY's Hoda Kotb showed up to rock the red carpet in leather pants and a silky blazer.”
“So stylish!”
“Kelly ClarksonAPKelly Clarkson wore a velvet black dress with an embellished waist and exaggerated shoulders.”
“She paired it with gold statement earrings and lace-up heels.”
“APCarrie Underwood had a few gorgeous outfit changes throughout the night, but we especially loved her red carpet look.”
“The plunging neckline and structured shoulders of the dress looked great on the singer, who took home the award for female video of the year.”


"Although he is not invited to perform this year, he may be in the lineup in 2019."
Kimberly shipmangotti imagines the little singer in this small town rocking this Jumpsuit with the most perfect cyan sweetheart collar! "
"The country music TV awards ceremony was held in Nashville, Tennessee on Wednesday night, and the most famous stars were there, dressed appropriately and impressed."
"Today, her own Hoda Kotb went to the show and even went on stage to thank her dear friend Blake Shelton."
"Here are some of the best red carpets to look at: Hoda kotbaptoday, Hoda koteb in leather pants and silk coat
"It's so fashionable!"
"Kelly Clarkson Kelly Clarkson is wearing a black velvet dress with embellished waist and exaggerated shoulders."
"She matched it with gold earrings and lace up heels."
"Apcarrie Underwood changed some gorgeous clothes all night, but we especially like her red carpet look."
"The low neckline and well-organized shoulders of this dress look great on this singer, who won the award for best female video of the year."



Number  286
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In recent weeks, Celine ended her main set with a rendition of Queen's 1991 classic The Show Must Go On – which was surely a promise to René, who has been the driving force behind her career and performances since she was a teenager.”
“'I hope that by now you have got the message that tonight's show is very, very personal to me.'”
“His wife said at the same time that Celine had taken charge of his care single-mindedly, and not handed it over to others.”
“'It's been good for her to have something to focus on.'”
“I think it has helped her, too.”
“'He wants her to get outside the home and have her singing to concentrate on.”
“He said: 'Rene wants her to continue working her residency.”
“Clemont said performing had been a good outlet for Celine, during such a difficult time.”
“Rene was said to watch all of her performances at Caesar's Palace in Las Vegas via a special video link set up to their house.”
“He said that despite his condition, Rene had always encouraged Celine, 46, to continue with her Las Vegas residency, which she returned to on December 30.”


"In recent weeks, Celine has finished her main show by singing the Queen's 1991 classic" show must go on "- a promise to Rene, who has been the driving force of her career and performance since she was a teenager."
"I hope you know by now that tonight's show is very, very personal for me."
"His wife also said that Celine took care of him wholeheartedly and didn't leave the matter to others."
"For her, concentration is a good thing."
"I think it helps her, too."
"He wanted her to go out of the house and concentrate on singing."
"He said: 'Rene wants her to continue as a resident."
Clement says acting is a great way for Celine to vent in such a difficult time
"Rene is said to have watched all her performances at Caesar's palace in Las Vegas through a special video link set up at their home."
"He said that despite his situation, Rene has been encouraging Celine, 46, to continue her residence in Las Vegas and return to December 30."



Number  287
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m not an eye roller, but I would be like f–k off,” she said.”
“I’m always touching people, like, ‘Hey!’”She added that she doesn’t even remember seeing the The Game actress at SoulCycle.”
““I’m really nice at SoulCycle actually, because once my endorphins kick in I’m actually almost too friendly.”
““Well you can’t go by that,” Theron said of the false story.”
““What a bitch,” the Monster actress joked.”
“During a round of “Plead the Fifth,” Cohen recapped the rumors and asked Theron what really happened.”
“I’m just being honest.”Then, Dish Nation reported that Theron, 41, was “so pissed off” that she demanded SoulCycle ban Mowry from their spin classes.”
“Charlize was just mean.”
“I know how to approach another celebrity.”
““I wasn’t over-the-top.”


"I'm not an eye opener, but I'll be like f – K off," she said
"I always touch people, like 'Hey! "She added that she didn't even remember seeing a game actress in soul cycle."
"In fact, I'm very good at the soul cycle, because once my endorphins start to secrete, I'm actually too friendly."
"Well, you can't say that," Theron said of the wrong story
"What a bitch," joked the monster actress
In a "fifth defense," Cohen restates the rumors and asks Theron what happened
"I'm just telling the truth." Then, dish nation reported that Theron, 41, was "very angry" and asked them to ban the use of soulcycle Mowry in their rotation class
"Charlize is mean."
"I know how to approach another celebrity."
"I didn't cross the line."



Number  288
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I always do what’s best for my growing baby and put him first!””
“The proud parents additionally told E!, “Sarah, husband Kris and baby Logan are resting.”
“NewsThe baby boy was born via C-section on Monday, according to the outlet, and is named Logan Alexander.”
“He weighed 7 lbs.”
“...and 2 oz., and was 19 inches long.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We are so overjoyed and happy to welcome baby Logan into our family,” Stage and husband Kris Jason told E!”
“...in a statement.”
“Sarah delivered Logan this afternoon and is resting with new baby per the Doctors orders.”
“If something feels off, I don’t do it!”


"I always do the best for my growing baby and put him first!"
"Proud parents told me! "Sarah, husband Chris and baby Logan are resting."
News: the baby boy, Logan Alexander, was born by caesarean section on Monday, according to media reports
"He weighs seven pounds."
“… 2 ounces, 19 inches long. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We are very happy and happy to welcome baby Logan to our family," stage and husband Chris Jason told e! "
“… In a statement. "
"Sarah delivered Logan this afternoon. As the doctor ordered, she was resting with her new baby."
"If I feel something's wrong, I'll quit!"



Number  289
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Netflix The Mind Flayer, also called the Shadow Monster by the kids.”
“Once again, though, a connection was drawn between Eleven and the new monster haunting Hawkins.”
“No one seems to realise Dr. Brenner and Hawkins lab seemed to first plan on using Eleven to spy on Russians by showing her their picture and having her listen to them with her powers.”
“Netflix Eleven (Millie Bobby Brown) listening to a Russian man speak on season one.”
“The Russians are mentioned by various characters (often as a vague allusion to the Cold War) but no one knows how they connect to Hawkins Lab.”
“Bauman had pieces of the story correct, but the things he got wrong were telling.”
“On the opening episode of the second season, Bauman harasses Chief Jim Hopper about his theory involving a Russian child (Eleven) and an elaborate conspiracy with international consequences.”
“Netflix Actor Brett Gelman played the conspiracy theorist.”
“It was ironic to hear Murray Bauman say he thought Eleven was a Russian child, since Eleven was being used by Hawkins Lab to spy on Russians.”
“He’ll get there one day, right?”


"Netflix is a mind beater, and kids call it shadow monster."
"But there's a connection between number 11 and Hawkins's new monster."
"No one seems to realize that Dr. Brenner and the Hawkins lab seem to be the first to plan to use No. 11 to monitor the Russians, show her their photos, and let her listen to them with her power."
"Netflix eleven listened to a Russian man in the first season."
"The Russians are mentioned by all kinds of people (usually vague hints about the cold war), but no one knows how they are connected with the Hawkins laboratory."
"There are several passages in Bauman's story that are right, but he is wrong."
"In the first episode of season 2, Bowman harasses chief Jim hopper, saying his theory involves a Russian child (11 years old) and an elaborate plot with international consequences."
"Netflix actor Brett Gelman plays the conspiracy theorist."
"It's ironic to hear Murray Bowman say that he thought eleven was a Russian child, because eleven was used by Hawkins laboratories to monitor Russians."
"He'll be here one day, won't he?"



Number  290
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That essentially means there’s nothing to lose from closing your account down temporarily - you can pick up where you left off as soon as you resurrect it.”
“12 useful Netflix features you need to know The end If you decide to cancel your Netflix subscription early, your Viewing Activity, recommendations and ratings will still be saved for 10 months.”
“You can help Netflix improve the recommendations it gives you by actually rating the things you watch.”
“12 useful Netflix features you need to know Ratings Unless you’re binge-watching a series and therefore don’t care about anything else Netflix has to offer, suggestions are important.”
“If you spot any rogue-looking activity, you can knock anyone who isn’t supposed to have access to your account off your account, by going back to your Account page and selecting Sign Out of All Devices.”
“12 useful Netflix features you need to know Rogue users The Viewing Activity page has an option called See Recent Account Access, which shows you information about your account, such as when it has been used, on what device and where.”
“If you really don’t want other people to find out what yours is, you can delete it from your viewing history by visiting Netflix’s Viewing Activity page, which you can find in the Account menu.”
“12 useful Netflix features you need to know History We all have our guilty pleasures, though some are guiltier than others.”
“All you need to do is go to your Account page and select Test Participation.”
“12 useful Netflix features you need to know New features Everyone likes getting early access to new features for things they love, and Netflix lets you do just that.”


"It basically means that there's no loss in temporarily closing your account - you can go back to your original state as soon as you restore your account."
"You need to know the final result of 12 useful Netflix features. If you decide to cancel your Netflix subscription in advance, your viewing activities, recommendations and ratings will remain for 10 months."
"You can help Netflix improve its recommendations by scoring what you see."
"12 useful Netflix features you need to know ratings unless you're enjoying a series, so don't care about any of the other features Netflix offers, suggestions are important."
"If you find any activity that looks like rogue, you can remove anyone who should not access your account from your account by going back to your account page and selecting" log off all devices. "
"12 useful features of Netflix you need to know that the rogue user view activity page has an option called" view recent account visits "which displays information about your account, such as how to use it, on what device and where to use it."
"If you really don't want people to know what you're looking for, you can remove it from your viewing history by visiting Netflix's view events page (which can be found in the accounts menu)
"12 useful Netflix features you need to know about history, we all have our own guilt, although some people feel more guilty than others."
"Just go to the account page and choose test participation."
"12 useful Netflix features you need to learn about new features everyone likes to get new features early for what they like, and Netflix allows you to do so."



Number  291
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All indicators point to Wonder Woman being a massive success: it currently holds between 93% and 94% among audiences and critics on Rotten Tomatoes, and in a single day has reclaimed well over than half of its $149million budget.”
“'She’s brave, strong, kind, loving, badass—every adjective you can think of for Wonder Woman, Gal is.'”
“But the director sure is glad she was.”
“Speaking to Playboy, the 45-year-old said her 'heart sank' when the Israeli star was chosen before she had her say.”
“We wouldn t have made the same choice Wonder Woman director Patty Jenkins has admitted her heart sank when Gal Gadot was originally cast but was delighted to be proven wrong Jenkins who places extreme importance on casting and had...”
“...been pushing for the movie to be made for almost a decade watched helplessly as the role of the Amazon princess was dished out by Zack Snyder when making Batman V Superman...”
“'I remember when I read in the news that Wonder Woman had been cast and my heart sank,' she admitted.”
“'I had been talking to the studio for so long about doing it and I was like well “that’s that.” I’m sure we wouldn’t have made the same choice.'”
“But when Jenkins started paying attention to the actress that was chosen for her, she was blown away.”
“Made for her Jenkins who places extreme importance on casting and had been pushing for the movie to be made for almost a decade watched helpless as the role of the Amazon princess was dished out by Zack Snyder when...”


"All the indicators indicate that wonder woman has been a great success: rotten tomato currently accounts for 93% to 94% of the audience and critics, and has recovered more than half of its $149 million budget in one day."
"She is brave, strong, kind and loving. Every adjective you can think of is a villain."
"But the director is glad she is."
"In an interview with Playboy, the 45 year old said her heart sank before she had time to make her stand when the Israeli star was chosen."
"We're not going to make the same choice, and wonder woman director Patty Jenkins admits that when gal gadot first appeared, her heart sank, but she's happy to be proved wrong. Jenkins, who attaches great importance to the cast, and
“… In the past decade, Zach Snyder's role as Amazon Princess in Batman V Superman has been made a mess... "
"I remember when I saw wonder woman cast in the news, my heart sank," she admitted
"I've been talking to the producers for so long, and I think it's good," that's it. "I'm sure we won't make the same choice."
"But when Jenkins started focusing on the actresses chosen for her, she was fascinated."
"Jenkins, who made for her, attaches great importance to the cast and has been promoting the production of this film for nearly a decade. When Zack Snyder released the role of Amazon Princess, she looked at it helplessly..."



Number  292
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The House Bunny star has been seeing her current boyfriend, Michael, since October of last year.”
“The former couple shares co-parenting responsibilities of their five-year-old son Jack.”
“But it was revealed that Anna Faris was also once an angsty teenager as Jimmy Kimmel read excerpts from her childhood diary on his talk show Wednesday night.”
“The 41-year-old funny woman seemed positively embarrassed to relive her younger days as Kimmel flipped through her small pink journal from his interviewing seat.”
“Scroll down for videoTalk about it: Anna Faris was also once an angsty teenager as Jimmy Kimmel read excerpts from her childhood diary on his talk show Wednesday night'This is so mortifying,' Faris said once she handed over the diary.”
“'Please don't let my parents know.”
“I'm so boy crazy.'”
“After flipping through a few pages, Kimmel was delighted to read an excerpt about a boy named Ryan G.'He likes me.”
“I know Ryan likes me,' Jimmy said, reading Faris' words.”
“'He always puts his arm around me and calls me 'honey'—even if he's going with Beth.'”


"Since last October, the otaku star has been dating his current boyfriend Michael."
"The ex couple and their five-year-old son, Jack, raised the children together."
"But it's revealed that when Jimmy Kimmel read an excerpt from her childhood diary on the talk show on Wednesday night, Anna Faris was also an anxious teenager."
"The funny 41 year old woman seems embarrassed because she is reading her pink diary in her interview seat and reliving her youth."
"Scroll down to watch the video talk: when Jimmy Kimmel read an excerpt from her childhood diary on the talk show on Wednesday night, Anna Faris was also an angry teenager. "It's a shame," Faris said after handing in his diary
"Please don't let my parents know."
"I'm crazy."
"After flipping through a few pages, Kimmel happily read an excerpt from a boy named Ryan g." he likes me. "
"I know Ryan likes me," Jimmy said as he read Faris
"He always hugs me and calls me 'honey' - even if he goes with Beth."



Number  293
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““So you know, put up with the bull—-, cash your check and keep it moving because at the end of the day, what someone’s opinion of me sitting in their kitchen in their underwear is not something I’m concerned about.””
“You date people to figure out what you want and don’t want,” she said, and added, “and thankfully, I dodged a bullet on the last one.”In a previous statement to E!”
““Obviously, any breakup you go through, it’s going to be hard, especially when it’s in the public eye and people are watching.”
“I love putting things on social media, so it was all over social media,” Chrisley, 20, told E!’s Daily Pop on Wednesday.”
““That’s my fault at that point, but I’m great today.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After four months of dating, the Chrisley Knows Best star and newly-drafted NBA player — who made their romance Instagram official in June when Kennard, 21, was selected by the Detroit Pistons as the 12th pick of the 2017 NBA draft — broke up in August.”
“Prior to Kennard, she was formerly linked to Memphis Grizzlies player Chandler Parsons and split from longtime boyfriend Blaire Hanks in January after a two-year romance.”
“Although Chrisley and Kennard weren’t meant to be, the reality star learned a great deal about herself through their relationship.”
““I mean, you live and you learn.”
“I’ve learned a lot of things that I don’t want and that’s what relationships are for.”


"So, you know, hold on - cash your check and let it move, because at the end of the day, I don't care what people think of me sitting in the kitchen in my underwear."
"You date people to find out what you want and what you don't want, and thank goodness I missed the last bullet," she said
"Obviously, any breakup you experience is going to be very difficult, especially when it's in the public eye and people are paying attention to it."
"I like to put things on social media, so it's all over social media," 20-year-old crisley told e! Daily pop music on Wednesday
"It's my fault, but I'm great today." Get push notification of news, functions, etc
"After four months of dating, the best star and new NBA player Chris Lee met officially announced their love affair on instagram in June this year. Kennard, 21, was selected by the Detroit Pistons as the 12th pick in the 2017 NBA draft and broke up in August."
"Before Kennard, she had an affair with Chandler Parsons, a Memphis Grizzlies player, and broke up with her boyfriend Blair Hanks, who had been in love for two years, in January this year."
"Although crisley and Kennard are not meant to be, the reality TV star knows a lot about himself through their relationship."
"I mean, you live, you learn."
"I've learned a lot that I don't want. That's the purpose of love."



Number  294
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She's a really awesome singer."”
“"We're friends, and I'm very happy to have collaborated with her.”
“The 25-year-old singer dropped his music video for "How Long" on Friday -- and fans are already buzzing about a possible Selena Gomez reference in the visuals and lyrics of the new song.”
“Puth looks suave as can be as he dances around Los Angeles in the video, until just after the two minute mark, when he seems entranced by a painting of a girl with long, dark hair holding a rose.”
“"She said, 'Boy, tell me honestly, was it real or just for show?"”
“...he sings, leading fans to believe the painting (and perhaps the song as well) are a reference to Gomez.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Charlie Puth Opens Up About Why He Won't Be a Judge On 'American Idol'"I'll admit, I was wrong, what else can I say, girl?”
“Can't you blame my head and not my heart?”
“I was drunk, I was gone, that don't make it right but, promise there were no feelings involved," Puth continues.”
“"I'll admit, it's my fault, but you gotta believe me.”


"She's a great singer."
"We're friends and I'm happy to work with her."
The 25-year-old singer gave up his music video "how long ago" on Friday - fans are already busy with the visual effects of the new song and the possible citations of Serena Gomez in the lyrics
"In the video, booth looks very gentle when dancing in Los Angeles, until two minutes later, he seems to be fascinated by a picture of a girl with long black hair and a rose in his hand."
"She said," son, tell me honestly, is this real or show? "
“…… He sang to convince fans that the painting (and perhaps the song) was a reference for Gomez. "
Exclusive: Charlie booth reveals why he didn't judge "American Idol.". "I admit I'm wrong. What else can I say, girl?"
"Can't you blame my head instead of my heart?"
"I'm drunk and I'm gone, which doesn't mean it's right, but I promise there's no emotion involved," Puss continued
"I admit it's my fault, but you have to believe me."



Number  295
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fun look: Reese was on set on Friday with a sweatshirt that had the names of the BLL characters...”
“Big Little Lies is currently filming its second season which will air on HBO in 2019.”
“All four of the ladies kept it a casual affair in the fashion department.”
“They're flashing big beaming smiles while holding up their ticket stubs.”
“All four of them shared a photo on Instagram of them posing outside the movie theater.”
“Reese, Laura and Zoe got together for some girl time and see Woodley's new film Adrift.”
“...in September This comes after the BLL cast showed up in a big way in support of co star Shailene...”
“Mates And Kidman who won an Emmy for her role on the hit series was seen hugging Reese from behind All kinds of activities The ladies were also seen playing a game of pool Worth the wait Big Little Lies won t premiere until 2019 here the cast is seen...”
“And Kidman, who won an Emmy for her role on the hit series, was seen hugging Reese from behind.”
“Each of their individual posts gushed about the film and Woodley's performance.”


"Interesting look: Reese was wearing a sweatshirt with the name of a Bll character on the set on Friday..."
"Big lies" is currently filming its second season and will be broadcast on HBO in 2019
"These four ladies in the fashion department regard it as a casual thing."
"They hold up the ticket stub and smile brightly."
"All four of them shared a picture of them taking a group photo outside the cinema on instagram."
"Reese, Laura and Zoe got together for a while to watch Woodley's new movie" wandering. "
“…… In September of this year, the actors of Bll appeared in full swing to support the co star Xie Lin.... "
"The Emmy winning partner and Kidman for their role in the hit show are seen embracing Reese behind various activities and playing a billiards game worth waiting for. The big lie won't premiere here until 2019, and the cast will be seen here..."
Kidman won an Emmy for her role in a hit show and hugged Reese from behind
"Each of their posts was full of talk about the film and Woodley's performance."



Number  296
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I feel like everything’s fallen into place, and it’s fallen into place because I’ve given it the time to fall into place," he added.”
“I’ve never been more inspired.”
“I’ve never been more comfortable.”
“I’ve never been happier.”
““I’ve probably had three days apart from her in the last year…but we’re very, very strong.”
“So we went traveling and spent every day for a year together," he said.”
“...a tight bond...”
“So the catalyst of taking a year off was also the fact that my partner quit her job in New York which she s now got back in London which is really cool but we were just basically like let s quit our jobs and have a year of forming...”
““This has been the first time I’ve actually had the time to fall in love properly,” Sheeran told Zane Lowe on Beats 1 Radio last year.”
“I needed to have a year off and spend it with friends and family and Cherry and actually become a human being rather than a touring celebrity," Sheeran told PEOPLE in August 2018.”


He added: "I feel like everything is in place and in place because I've given it time to get in place."
"I've never been so inspired."
"I've never been so comfortable."
"I've never been so happy."
"I may have been separated from her for three days last year But we are very, very strong. "
"So we went on a trip and spent every day of the year together," he said
“… Close ties... "
"So the catalyst for a year off is also my partner who quit her job in New York, and now she's back in London. It's really cool, but we're basically like letting us quit our jobs and take shape for a year..."
"This is the first time I really have time to fall in love," Sheeran told Zane law on beats 1 last year
"I need to take a year off and spend time with friends, family and cherries to really be a person, not a celebrity on tour," Sheeran told people in August 2018



Number  297
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If Dean and Lesley make it, kudos to them!”
“In reality, Bachelor-formed couples do not typically have much staying power, and there is a lot of time left in the year.”
“The Bachelor franchise’s most successful couple, Trista and Ryan Sutter, will be kicking off the games as “grand marshals.” What that means is not entirely clear, but hopefully some of their good luck will rub off on the other contestants.”
“We’ll also see guest spots from former Bachelorettes Rachel Lindsay (especially spicy considering two of her former bachelors are a part of the Winter Games cast) and JoJo Fletcher, as well as current Bachelor Arie Luyendyk Jr.”
“World figure skating champions Tai Babilonia and Randy Gardner are set to appear, as is former Tonya Harding nemesis Nancy Kerrigan.”
“There will also be numerous guest appearances.”
“Not all 24 cast members have been revealed yet, however, we do know there will be ten former US Bachelor contestants (including Unglert, Eric Bigger, Ben Higgins, and Ashley Iaconetti), and 14 international contestants (including Benoit Beausejour Savard from Canada and Jordan Mauger of New Zealand).”
“Now, we don’t know exactly what those “tests” are going to look like, but do not be surprised if it means seeing Dean Unglert shirtless on a ski hill.”
“Except this time, as a press release from ABC states, the competitions will test the contestants’ perseverance in pursuing relationships, as they will be faced with language barriers and cultural differences.”
“The ultimate goal for the contestants is the same as it has always been: to fall deeply and sincerely in love.”


"If Dean and Leslie succeed, thank them!"
"In reality, single couples usually don't have much stamina, and there's a lot of time in the year."
The most successful couple in the bachelor series, Trista and Ryan Sartre, will kick off the Olympic Games as "Grand Marshals". What this means is not entirely clear, but hopefully some of their good luck will affect other contestants
"We'll also see former bachelors Rachel Lindsey (considering that both of her former bachelors are actors at the Winter Olympics) and Joe Fletcher, as well as current bachelors Ariel luyandick Jr., guest stars."
World figure skating champions Tay barbilonia and Randy Gardner will appear, as will former Tony Harding's arch rival Nancy krigan
"There will be a lot of guests on the stage."
"Not all the 24 actors have been revealed, but we do know that there will be 10 former American bachelors (including angert, Eric beagle, Ben Higgins and Ashley yakonetti) and 14 international players (including Benoit bossejou saward from Canada and Jordan Mogg from New Zealand)
"Now, we don't know what these 'tests' are going to look like, but don't be surprised if it means seeing Dean angert shirtless on a ski hill."
"In addition to this time, ABC's press release said the competition will test the willpower of contestants in pursuing a love relationship because they will face language barriers and cultural differences."
"The ultimate goal of the contestants is as always: to fall in love deeply and sincerely."



Number  298
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Dick Clark's New Year's Rockin' Eve is produced by Dick Clark Productions, which shares a parent company with The Hollywood Reporter.”
“ET on ABC.”
“Maren Morris Macklemore and Skylar Grey will also perform during the Ryan Seacrest hosted show...”
“Christina Aguilera is set to headline Dick Clark’s New Year’s Rockin’ Eve with Ryan Seacrest 2019.”
“With her performance from New York's Times Square, the singer will make her return to the celebration for the first time since her 2007 performance.”
“She will take the stage just moments before the ball drops to mark the new year.”
“Shawn Mendes, Camila Cabello, Halsey, Lauren Alaina, Bazzi, Kane Brown, Ciara, Halsey and Weezer are also set to perform during the New Year's Eve special.”
“In addition to their solo performances, Alaina and Brown will team up for a collaboration.”
“Dan + Shay are set to make their debut performance during this year's festivities, while Bastille and New Kids On The Block will return to the program from their second time.”
“Florida Georgia Line and Maren Morris will perform from the Allstate Fan Fest in New Orleans, which will be broadcast live during the show.”


"Dick Clark's new year's Eve is produced by Dick Clark productions, which shares a parent company with Hollywood Reporter."
"Et on ABC."
"Maren Morris macklemore and Skylar grey will also perform on the show hosted by Ryan Seacrest..."
"Christina Aguilera will make the headlines on Dick Clark and Ryan Seacrest's new year's Eve in 2019."
"With her performance in Times Square in New York, the singer will return to the celebration for the first time since her performance in 2007."
"She will be on the stage just before the ball falls to celebrate the new year."
"Sean Mendez, Camilla Cabello, Halsey, Lauren Alena, bazzi, Kane brown, Sheila, Halsey and Weize will also perform in the new year's Eve special."
"Apart from individual performances, Alena and Brown will work together."
"Dan and Shea will make their debut at this year's celebration, and the new children from Bastille and the neighborhood will return to the show for the second time."
"Florida Georgia line and Marlene Morris will perform at the all state fan's day in New Orleans, which will be broadcast live during the performance."



Number  299
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Barr along with Goodman, Gilbert, Laurie Metcalf, Lecy Goranson, Michael Fishman and Sarah Chalke reprise their roles in the revival.”
“The assumed death of Goodman’s character was a shock to fans at the time of the series finale as Barr also revealed that her character was writing her own life story all along since season 1.”
“RELATED VIDEO: How ‘Roseanne’ Went from a Reunion to a Revival!”
“Image zoom Sara Gilbert and John Goodman | Credit: EverettDan’s fate was also previously teased in February when ABC released sneak peek clips of the reboot.”
“Image zoom Roseanne Barr and John GoodmanAfter addressing the unanswered question in the first few minutes, the storyline continued with the introduction of Sara Gilbert’s character Darlene, who has moved back into her childhood home with her gender-fluid child Mark, 9, and 14-year-old daughter Harris.”
“I thought maybe you moved on,” Roseanne quipped.”
““You looked happy.”
“Why does everybody always think I’m dead?” Dan told her, referencing the serious heart attack he suffered at the end of the series finale.”
““What happened?” he said as his wife joked, “I thought you were dead!”“I’m sleeping!”
“The hour-long premiere opened with Dan startled awake by Roseanne as he removed a sleep apnea mask from his face.”


Barr and Goodman, Gilbert, Laurie Metcalf, Lacey glanson, Michael fishman and Sarah chuck play their roles again in the Renaissance
"Assuming Goodman's character dies is a shock to fans when the series ends, Barr also revealed that her character is writing her own life story all the time since the first season."
"Related video: how Rosanna went from Reunion to Renaissance!"
"Picture zooming Sarah Gilbert and John Goodman credit: Everett Dan's fate was also teased in February when ABC released a restart peep clip."
"Image zooming after Rosanna Barr and John Goodman answer this unanswered question in the first few minutes, the story continues to introduce Sarah Gilbert's character Darlene, who moves back to her childhood home with her 9-year-old, mark, and 14-year-old daughter, Harris."
"I think maybe you're gone," joked Rosanne
"You look happy."
"Why do people think I'm dead? "Dan told her about the serious heart attack he suffered at the end of the show."
"What's the matter? His wife joked, "I thought you were dead! "I'm asleep!"
"At the beginning of the hour long premiere, Dan took off a sleep apnea mask from his face and was awakened by Rosanna."



Number  300
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.26666666666666666
Correct number is  80
Total number is  300
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
